The one with all knowledge and strength, at the great Lake Anotatta.”
In this way, truly, the Fortunate One spoke about the former connection with his previous lives
in what is known as the Dhamma Instruction in the Traditions about the Buddha.
In the fourth enquiry, (called) slander, (we hear about) especially great abuse and censuring.
In the past, it seems, the Buddha-to-be was reborn in a Brahminical family,
and was very learned, much respected and worshipped.
Having gone forth in the recluses’ going-forth,
while living on forest roots and fruits in the Himālaya,
he spent his time teaching the mantras
One recluse,
came (to stay) near to him.
Having seen him, being jealous by nature, he slandered that innocent seer (saying):
“This seer is a deceitful sensualist,”
and his pupils also said: “This seer is surely immoral.”
They therefore abused and censured him.
Through that unwholesome deed and its result,
after undergoing suffering in Niraya hell for many thousands of years,
and becoming a Buddha in this his last state, and attaining the highest gains and fame,
he became famous and was like the full moon in the sky.
Right there and then through slander the dissatisfied sectarians,
after making Sundarī slander (him) again,
summoning and bribing some drunken scoundrels,
gave the order (saying): “After murdering Sundarī,
throw her by the rubbish tip near the entrance to Jeta’s Wood.”
And that they did.
Afterwards the sectarians informed the King saying: “We cannot find
The King said: “Search for her”.
After retrieving her from the place where she was thrown,
bringing the bier and showing the King, (they said):
“Look, dear Sir, at what the ascetic Gotama’s disciples have done!”
(Then) about the Fortunate One and his Community of monks,
they went round shouting out dispraise in the whole town,
and placed Sundarī on a platform in the charnel ground.
The King gave the order (saying): “Seek for Sundarī’s murderer!”
Then after the scoundrels had drunk liquor,
they made a commotion (accusing each other, saying): “You murdered Sundarī, you murdered (her)!”
The King’s men, after arresting the scoundrels, brought
The King said: “Look here, did you murder Sundarī?”
“Yes, your majesty.”
“The order was given by whom?”
“By the sectarians, your majesty.”
The King, after having the sectarians brought and bound
said: “Look here, go and shout it out, saying: 'In order to bring the Buddha into disrepute
we ourselves had Sundarī murdered,
the Fortunate One and his disciples didn't do it.”
And that they did.
All the town-dwellers regained confidence.
The King, after executing the sectarians and the scoundrels, had (their bodies) thrown aside.
Then the Fortunate One’s gains and respect grew enormously.
Therefore it is said:
As the brahmin Sutavā I was (greatly) respected and worshipped,
I taught the mantras to my five hundred students in the Great Wood.
The seer Bhīma who had five knowledges and great power came there,
And having seen him coming, I slandered that innocent (seer),
Thereupon I said to my pupils: 'This seer is a sensualist'.
And (all) of the students rejoiced in that (unwholesome) speech of mine.
Thence all the students as they begged for alms from family to family,
Said to the great (body) of people: 'This seer is a sensualist';
Through that deed and through its result these monks (numbering) five hundred
All received (abundant) slander at the hands of Sundarikā.
In the ninth enquiry, (called) a headache, (we hear about how he had) a pain in the head, painful feeling in the head.
In the past, it seems, the Buddha-to-be was reborn as a fisherman in a fisherman’s village.
One day, together with the fishermen,
after going to the place where they murder fish,
and seeing fish being murdered, happiness arose right there,
and also right there and then happiness arose for those he was with.
Through that unwholesome deed,
after undergoing suffering in the four lower realms,
in this his last state of existence, together with those men,
after being born in the Royal Sakya family, and by and by attaining to Buddhahood
he himself suffered from pain in the head.
And about the Sakyan Royalty (and their fate) it is recorded in the discussion in the commentary to the Dhammapada:
in the battle with Viḍūḍabha they all came to destruction.
Therefore it is said:
(Before) I was a fisherman’s son in a fisherman’s village,
Having seen fish being killed it produced a little happiness;
Through that deed and through its result I had a (great) pain in my head,
And all the Sakyans were killed when Viḍūḍabha slay them.
After the Fortunate One completely awakened to Perfect Awakening,
turned the auspicious Dhamma Wheel, instructed Yasa, the son of a good family,
arrived at Uruvelā, and there instructed the thousand yogis,
and together with the former yogis, who were now pollutant-free monks, went to Rājagaha,
° he preached Dhamma to King Bimbisāra and the assembly of twelve myriads
who had come in order to see the Awakened One.
From that twelve myriads who came together with the King
one myriad announced they were devotees,
and eleven myriads were established in the fruit of Stream Entry along with King Bimbisāra.
This devotee (Visākha) was one amongst them,
and at the first meeting he was established with them in the fruit of Stream Entry,
and again afterwards on another day, after hearing the Dhamma he was established in the fruit of a Non-Returner.
After becoming a Non-Returner unlike when returning to the home on other days,
when he came looking round here and there laughing and smiling,
he didn’t come in this way, but he came with calmed faculties and calmed mind.
(His wife) Dhammadinnā got up from the couch,
and looking down the road saw the way he was coming,
and thought: ‘Why (is he) like this?’ and making her way out to meet him
stood at the top of the stairs and stretched out her hand in order to support him.
The devotee waved (her away with) his hand.
She thought: ‘I will see during the morning meal.’
Formerly the devotee ate together with her.
But that day without even looking round
he ate on his own like a meditating monk.
She thought: ‘I will see during the evening time.’
That day the devotee didn’t enter the bedroom,
but set another to watch over the chamber, prepared a suitable bed and lay down.
The female devotee, thinking: ‘I wonder if he has desire for someone else,
or, something was said by a slanderer,
or, whatever can my fault be?’
and she became depressed,
thinking: ‘I am able to live like this for one or two days only’,
having gone to wait on him she worshipped him and stood there.
The devotee asked: “Has Dhammadinnā come at this time?”
“Yes, Noble Sir, I have come, you are not like before,
is there desire for someone else?”
“There is not, Dhammadinnā.”
“Is there some kind of slander?”
“Not that.”
“That being so, (then) whatever can my fault be?”
“You have no fault.”
° “Then why do you not make
conversation with me as normal?”
He thought: ‘I should not broadcast this supermundane (attainment), which is a weighty and serious (matter),
but if I don’t speak,
her heart might break right now and she might die,’
so having sympathy for her, he said:
“Dhammadinnā, having heard the Teacher teach the Dhamma,
I attained what is known as the supermundane state,
and with that attainment such mundane actions are no longer suitable.
If you wish, with your four-hundred millions and my four-hundred millions
there are eighty millions,
take control of this, and be in the position of a Mother or Sister to me, and live on that,
I can carry on with as little as a ball of rice given by you.
If such will not do, then take the wealth and return to your family home.
Or if there is no one else you desire,
I will place you in the position of a Sister or a Daughter and look after you.”
She thought: ‘It is no ordinary person who is speaking thus.
Surely the supermundane state has been penetrated by him.
But can this state only be penetrated by men,
or is it possible for a woman to penetrate it?’
She said this to Visākha:
“Can this state only be attained by men,
or can a woman also attain it?”
“What did you say, Dhammadinnā, for those who are practiced, theirs is the inheritance,
for whoever there is a basis, for him there is the attainment.”
“If that is so, please allow my going forth.”
“Very well, Bhaddā,
not knowing your mind (previously) I did not speak.”
Then he went to King Bimbisāra, worshipped him and stood there.
The King asked: “Why have you come at this time, householder?”
“Dhammadinnā says: ‘Great King, I would go forth.”
“But what is suitable to provide for her?”
“It is suitable to provide nothing other than a golden palanquin, God-King,
and the cleaning of the city.”
The King gave the golden palanquin and had the city cleaned.
Visākha had Dhammadinnā washed with scented water,
decorated with all her decorations, sat her down in the golden palanquin,
gathered their relations around her, and while worshipping with scented flowers and so on,
as though he was perfuming the city, he took her to the nunnery,
and said: “Noble Ladies, you must give Dhammadinnā the going forth.”
The nuns said: “Householder, it is suitable to bear with one or two faults.”
“There are no faults at all, Noble Ladies, she goes forth out of faith.”
Then one learned Elder nun informed her about the five-fold meditation subject beginning with skin,
shaved her hair and gave her the going forth.
Visākha said: “Rejoice in the well-taught Dhamma, Noble Lady,” then worshipped her and departed.
From the day she went forth many gains and much honour arose to her.
Because of that there were obstacles and no chance to develop the ascetic practices.
Then taking the Elder nuns who were her Teacher and Preceptor, she went to the countryside,
made them explain the thirty-eight meditation objects that delight the mind,
and she began to develop the ascetic practices,
and being endowed with resolution she did not tire easily.
A hundred thousand aeons in the past from now
the Teacher Padumuttara arose in the world.
At that time she had become a servant to one family, then having sold her hair,
she gave a gift to (the Buddha’s) Chief Disciple, the Elder Sujāta, and made an aspiration.
Through her being endowed with that aspiration and resolution she did not tire easily,
and in a very few days, having attained Liberation, she thought:
“I ordained in this Dispensation for a purpose, the summit has been attained,
how will my relatives make merit with me in the countryside?
Also the Community of nuns should not be tired out with the (lack of) requisites, I am going to Rājagaha,”
and taking the Community of nuns she went to Rājagaha.
Visākha, having heard: “Dhammadinnā has come, it seems,”
thought: ‘Not long after her going forth she went to the country,
and not long after going she returns again,
what can be up? I will go and see,’
and he came to the nunnery with a second person.
(And) he thought this it seems:
‘Do you take delight, or do you not take delight, Noble Lady?’
(But) this sort of questioning is not for a wise man,
(so) having brought up the five constituents (of mind and body) that provide fuel for attachment, I will question her with a question,
by her answer to the question I will know whether she has delight or no delight.’
At one time the Fortunate One was living near Rājagaha
at the Squirrel’s Feeding Place in Bamboo Wood.
The devotee Visākha approached the nun Dhammadinnā,
and after approaching and worshipping the nun Dhammadinnā, he sat on one side.
While sitting on one side the devotee Visākha
said this to the nun Dhammadinnā:
“ ‘Embodiment, embodiment,’
What, Noble Lady, is said to be embodiment by the Fortunate One?”
“These five constituents (of mind and body) that provide fuel for attachment, friend Visākha,
are said to be embodiment by the Fortunate One, as follows:
the form constituent that provides fuel for attachment
the feelings constituent that provides fuel for attachment
the perceptions constituent that provides fuel for attachment
the (mental) processes constituent that provides fuel for attachment
the consciousness constituent that provides fuel for attachment.
These are the five constituents (of mind and body) that provide fuel for attachment, friend Visākha, that are said to be embodiment by the Fortunate One.”
“Well said, Noble Lady,” said the devotee Visākha,
and after greatly rejoicing and gladly receiving this word of the nun Dhammadinnā,
he asked a further question to the nun Dhammadinnā:
“ ‘The arising of embodiment, the arising of embodiment,’ is said, Noble Lady.
What, Noble Lady, is said to be the arising of embodiment by the Fortunate One?”
“It is that craving which leads to continuation in existence, friend Visākha,
which is connected with enjoyment and passion, greatly enjoying this and that, as follows:
craving for sense pleasures
craving for continuation
craving for discontinuation.
This, friend Visākha, is said to be the arising of embodiment by the Fortunate One.
“ ‘The cessation of embodiment, the cessation of embodiment,’ is said, Noble Lady.
What, Noble Lady, is said to be the cessation of embodiment by the Fortunate One?”
“It is the complete fading away and cessation without remainder of that craving, friend Visākha,
liberation, letting go, release and non-adherence.
This, friend Visākha, is said to be the cessation of embodiment by the Fortunate One.”
“ ‘The path leading to the cessation of embodiment, the path leading to the cessation of embodiment,’
is said, Noble Lady.
What, Noble Lady, is said to be the path leading to the cessation of embodiment by the Fortunate One?”
“It is this noble path with eight factors, friend Visākha, as follows:
right view, right thought,
right speech, right action,
right livelihood, right endeavour,
right mindfulness, right concentration.”
“Is this attachment, Noble Lady, (the same as) these five constituents (of mind and body) that provide fuel for attachment,
or is attachment different from the five constituents (of mind and body) that provide fuel for attachment?”
“This attachment, friend Visākha, is not (the same as) these five constituents (of mind and body) that provide fuel for attachment,
nor is attachment different from the five constituents (of mind and body) that provide fuel for attachment.
But whatever desire and passion there is for the five constituents (of mind and body) that provide fuel for attachment,
that is the attachment right there.”
“But what, Noble Lady, is embodiment view?”
“Here, friend Visākha, an unlearned worldling,
one who doesn’t meet the Noble Ones, who is unskilled in the Noble Dhamma, untrained in the Noble Dhamma,
one who doesn’t meet Good People, who is unskilled in the Good People’s Dhamma, untrained in the Good People’s Dhamma,
views bodily form as self,
or bodily form as in self, or self as in bodily form.
Views feeling as self, or self as endowed with feeling,
or feeling as in self, or self as in feeling.
Views perception as self, or self as endowed with perception,
or perception as in self, or self as in perception.
Views (volitional) processes as self, or self as endowed with (volitional) processes,
or (volitional) processes as in self, or self as in (volitional) processes.
Views consciousness as self, or self as endowed with consciousness,
or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
This, friend Visākha, is embodiment view.”
“But how, Noble Lady, is there no embodiment view?”
“Here, friend Visākha, a learned noble disciple,
one who meets the Noble Ones, who is skilled in the Noble Dhamma, trained in the Noble Dhamma,
one who meets Good People, who is skilled in the Good People’s Dhamma, trained in the Good People’s Dhamma,
doesn’t view bodily form as self, or self as endowed with bodily form,
or bodily form as in self, or self as in bodily form.
Doesn’t view feeling as self, or self as endowed with feeling,
or feeling as in self, or self as in feeling.
Doesn’t view perception as self, or self as endowed with perception,
or perception as in self, or self as in perception.
Doesn’t view (volitional) processes as self, or self as endowed with (volitional) processes,
or (volitional) processes as in self, or self as in (volitional) processes.
Doesn’t view consciousness as self, or self as endowed with consciousness,
or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
Thus, friend Visākha, there is no embodiment view.”
“But what, Noble Lady, is the Eightfold Noble Path?”
“It is this noble path with eight factors, friend Visākha, as follows:
right view, right thought,
right speech, right action,
right livelihood, right endeavour,
right mindfulness, right concentration.”
“But is the eightfold Noble Path, Noble Lady, conditioned or unconditioned?”
“The eightfold Noble Path, friend Visākha, is conditioned.”
“Are the three constituents
or is the eightfold Noble Path comprised within the three constituents?”
“The three constituents are not comprised within the eightfold Noble Path, friend Visākha,
but the eightfold Noble Path is comprised within the three constituents.
Whatever is right speech, friend Visākha, and whatever is right action, and whatever is right livelihood,
these things are comprised within the virtue constituent.
Whatever is right endeavour, and whatever is right mindfulness, and whatever is right concentration,
these things are comprised within the concentration constituent.
Whatever is right view, and whatever is right thought,
these things are comprised within the wisdom constituent.
“But what, Noble Lady, is concentration,
what are the accessories to concentration, what is the development of concentration?”
“Whatever is one-pointedness of mind, friend Visākha, that is concentration,
the four ways of attending to mindfulness are the causes of concentration,
the four right endeavours are the accessories to concentration,
whatever repetition of these things there is, their development, being made much of,
this is the development of concentration herein.”
“But what, Noble Lady, are the processes?”
“There are these three processes, friend Visākha:
the bodily process, the speech process, the mental process.”
“But what, Noble Lady, is bodily process,
what is speech process, what is mental process?”
“In-breathing and out-breathing, friend Visākha, is bodily process,
thinking and reflection is speech process,
perception and feeling is mental process.”
“But why is in-breathing and out-breathing, Noble Lady, bodily process,
why is thinking and reflection speech process,
why is perception and feeling mental process?”
“In-breathing and out-breathing, friend Visākha, are bodily, these things are bound up with the body,
therefore in-breathing and out-breathing is a bodily process.
Having thought and reflected beforehand, friend Visākha, he afterwards breaks forth with a word,
therefore thinking and reflection is a speech process.
Perception and feeling are mental factors, these things are bound up with the mind,
therefore perception and feeling are mental processes.”
“But how, Noble Lady, is the cessation of perception and feeling attained?”
° “A monastic who is attaining the cessation of perception and feeling, friend Visākha,
does not think:
‘I will attain the cessation of perception and feeling,’
or ‘I am attaining the cessation of perception and feeling,’
or ‘I have attained the cessation of perception and feeling.’
But previously his mind has been developed so that it leads to that state.”
“But for a monastic who has attained the cessation of perception and feeling, Noble Lady,
which things cease first:
bodily process, or speech process, or mental process?”
“For a monastic who is attaining the cessation of perception and feeling, friend Visākha,
first speech process ceases, then bodily process ceases, then mental process ceases.”
“But what, Noble Lady, is the emergence from the cessation of perception and feeling?”
° “A monastic who is emerging from the cessation of perception and feeling, friend Visākha,
does not think:
‘I will emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling,’
or, ‘I am emerging from the cessation of perception and feeling,’
or, ‘I have emerged from the cessation of perception and feeling,’
But previously his mind has been developed so that it leads to that state.”
“But for a monastic who has emerged from the cessation of perception and feeling, Noble Lady,
which things arise first:
bodily process, or speech process, or mental process?”
“For a monastic who is emerging from the cessation of perception and feeling, friend Visākha,
first mental process arises, then bodily process arises, then speech process arises.”
“Having emerged from the cessation of perception and feeling, Noble Lady,
how many contacts touch that monastic?”
“Having emerged from the cessation of perception and feeling, friend Visākha,
three contacts touch that monastic:
emptiness contact, desirelessness contact, signlessness contact.”
“For a monastic who has emerged from the cessation of perception and feeling, Noble Lady,
what does his mind incline towards, what does it slope towards, what does it slant towards?”
“For a monastic who has emerged from the cessation of perception and feeling, friend Visākha,
his mind inclines towards seclusion,
“But how many feelings are there, Noble Lady?”
“There are three feelings, friend Visākha:
pleasant feeling, unpleasant feeling, and neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling.”
“But what, Noble Lady, is pleasant feeling, what is unpleasant feeling,
what is neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling?”
“Whatever, friend Visākha, is bodily or mentally pleasant and agreeable feeling:
that is pleasant feeling.
Whatever, friend Visākha, is bodily or mentally unpleasant and disagreeable feeling:
that is unpleasant feeling.
Whatever, friend Visākha, is bodily or mentally neither agreeable nor disagreeable feeling:
that is neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling.”
“But regarding pleasant feeling, Noble Lady: what is pleasant, what is unpleasant,
regarding unpleasant feeling: what is pleasant, what is unpleasant,
regarding neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling: what is pleasant, what is unpleasant?”
“Pleasant feeling, friend Visākha, is pleasant when it persists, unpleasant when it changes,
unpleasant feeling is unpleasant when it persists, pleasant when it changes,
neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling is pleasant when known, and unpleasant when unknown.”
“But for pleasant feeling, Noble Lady, what tendency underlies it,
for unpleasant feeling what tendency underlies it,
for neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling what tendency underlies it?”
“For pleasant feeling, friend Visākha, the tendency to passion underlies it,
for unpleasant feeling the tendency to repulsion underlies it,
for neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling ignorance underlies it.”
“But for all pleasant feeling, Noble Lady, does the tendency to passion underlie it,
for all unpleasant feeling does the tendency to repulsion underlie it,
for all neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling does the tendency to ignorance underlie it?”
“Not for all pleasant feeling, friend Visākha, does the tendency to passion underlie it,
not for all unpleasant feeling does the tendency to repulsion underlie it,
not for all neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling does the tendency to ignorance underlie it.”
“But for all pleasant feeling, Noble Lady, what should be abandoned,
for all unpleasant feeling what should be abandoned,
for all neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling what should be abandoned?”
“For pleasant feeling, friend Visākha, the tendency to passion should be abandoned,
for unpleasant feeling the tendency to repulsion should be abandoned,
for neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling the tendency to ignorance should be abandoned.”
“But for all pleasant feeling, Noble Lady, (is there) a tendency to passion that should be abandoned,
for all unpleasant feeling (is there) a tendency to repulsion that should be abandoned,
for all neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling (is there) a tendency to ignorance that should be abandoned?”
“Not for all pleasant feeling, friend Visākha, (is there) a tendency to passion that should be abandoned,
not for all unpleasant feeling (is there) a tendency to repulsion that should be abandoned,
not for all neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling (is there) a tendency to ignorance that should be abandoned.
Here, friend Visākha, a monastic, quite secluded from sense desires, secluded from unwholesome things,
having thinking, reflection, and the happiness and rapture born of seclusion,
dwells having attained the first absorption.
On that basis passion is abandoned, and herein there is no more underlying tendency to passion.
Here, friend Visākha, a monastic considers thus:
‘When will I dwell having attained that sphere
that the Noble Ones now dwell in having attained that sphere?’
Thus a longing to give attendance towards that unsurpassed freedom arises
and with longing as condition sorrow (arises).
On that basis repulsion is abandoned, and herein there is no more underlying tendency to repulsion.
Here, friend Visākha, a monastic, having given up pleasure, given up pain,
and with the previous disappearence of mental well-being and sorrow,
without pain, without pleasure, and with complete purity of mindfulness owing to equanimity,
dwells having attained the fourth absorption.
On that basis ignorance is abandoned, and herein there is no more underlying tendency to ignorance.”
“But for pleasant feeling, Noble Lady, what is the complement?”
“For pleasant feeling, friend Visākha, the complement is unpleasant feeling.”
“But for unpleasant feeling, Noble Lady, what is the complement?”
“For unpleasant feeling, friend Visākha, the complement is pleasant feeling.”
“But for neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling, Noble Lady, what is the complement?”
“For neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling, friend Visākha, the complement is ignorance.”
“But for ignorance, Noble Lady, what is the complement?”
“For ignorance, friend Visākha, the complement is understanding.”
“But for understanding, Noble Lady, what is the complement?”
“For understanding, friend Visākha, the complement is freedom.”
“But for freedom, Noble Lady, what is the complement?”
“For freedom, friend Visākha, the complement is Nibbāna.”
“But for Nibbāna, Noble Lady, what is the complement?”
“You are not able to grasp, friend Visākha, answers to questions that are beyond your limits,
like immersion in Nibbāna, friend Visākha,
the spiritual life that ends in Nibbāna, that conclusion in Nibbāna.
Desiring this,
approach the Fortunate One and you can ask him about this matter,
and just as the Fortunate One explains, so you should bear it in mind.”
Then the devotee Visākha,
after greatly rejoicing and gladly receiving this word of the nun Dhammadinnā,
having worshipped and circumambulated the nun Dhammadinnā,
approached the Fortunate One,
While sitting on one side the devotee Visākha
° related the whole conversation he had had with the nun Dhammadinnā
to the Fortunate One.
That being said, the Fortunate One said this to the devotee Visākha:
“Wise, Visākha, is the nun Dhammadinnā,
having great wisdom, Visākha, is the nun Dhammadinnā,
if you were to ask me, Visākha, the same matter,
I would answer it in the same way,
in the way the nun Dhammadinnā has answered,
for this is indeed the meaning, and so should you bear it in mind.”
The Fortunate One said this,
and the devotee Visākha was uplifted and greatly rejoiced in what was said by the Fortunate One.
Thus did the story unfold.
Later, as the Teacher was sitting in Jeta’s Wood,
as he was assigning the places of the nuns in order,
regarding this Small Elaberation, as the occasion had arisen,
he placed this Elder Nun in the foremost position in the Dispensation amongst those who talk about Dhamma.
May the gods from all over the universe assemble here
and listen to the King of the Sage’s true Dhamma about heaven and release:
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the Dhamma safeguard!
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
With consciousness it is unattractive, just as it is without (i.e. dead),
seeing this body as unattractive, a monk should develop (the recollection) of the unattractive.
Thus by way of colour, shape, smell, location, and appearance,
the thirty-two (parts) in my body (are like) repulsive corpses.
The (parts) that depend on this body are contemptible, as is what falls from a corpse,
for their recepticle is impure, they are situated in this corpse of a body.
Like a worm in excrement this body arose in what is impure (i.e. the womb),
inside it is full of impurities just like a full lavatory.
Always the impurities overflow like fat (overflows) from a frying pan,
various kinds of worms dwell in it, the same as in a cesspool.
This bodily heap is like a boil, like a disease, or like a sore,
it is incurable, contemptible, just like a rotting corpse.
“I am friendly with the Virūpakkhas, with the Erāpathas I am friendly,
I am friendly with the Chabyāputtas, and friendly with the Kaṇhāgotamakas.
I am friendly with those without feet, with those with two feet I am friendly,
I am friendly with those with four feet, with those with many feet I am friendly.
May the one without feet not hurt me, may the one with two feet not hurt me,
may the one with four feet not hurt me, may the one with many feet not hurt me.
May all beings, all living creatures, all who are born, in their entirety,
may all see prosperity, may nothing bad come to anyone.
The Buddha is measureless! The Dhamma is measureless! The Saṅgha is measureless!
Measurable are creeping things, (such as) snakes, scorpions,
centipedes, spiders, lizards, and rats.
I have made this protection, I have made this safeguard, may (all these) beings go away!
I revere the Fortunate One, I revere the seven Perfect Sambuddhas.”
By this declaration of the truth may you be safe at all times!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
By this declaration of the truth may all disease be destroyed!
Because of ignorance there are (volitional) processes, because of (volitional) processes: consciousness,
because of consciousness: mind and body, because of mind and body: the six sense spheres,
because of the six sense spheres: contact, because of contact: feeling,
because of feeling: craving, because of craving: attachment,
because of attachment: continuation, because of continuation: birth,
because of birth: old age, death,
grief, lamentation, pain, sorrow, and despair (all) originate,
and so this whole mass of suffering comes to arise.
But with the complete fading away and cessation of ignorance, there is the cessation of (volitional) processes,
with the cessation of (volitional) processes, the cessation of consciousness,
with the cessation of consciousness, the cessation of mind and body,
with the cessation of mind and body, the cessation of the six sense spheres,
with the cessation of the six sense spheres, the cessation of contact,
with the cessation of contact, the cessation of feeling,
with the cessation of feeling, the cessation of craving,
with the cessation of craving, the cessation of attachment,
with the cessation of attachment, the cessation of continuation,
with the cessation of continuation, the cessation of birth,
with the cessation of birth, old age, death,
grief, lamentation, pain, sorrow, and despair (all) cease,
and so there is a cessation of this whole mass of suffering.
Through the round of countless births I have wandered without finding
the housebuilder I was seeking: born and suffering again and again.
O housebuilder, now you are seen! You will not build the house again:
all your rafters have been broken, and the ridgepole has been destroyed,
my mind has reached the unconditioned, and craving’s end has been achieved.
With proper discernment I make use of the robe,
only to ward off the cold, to ward off the heat,
to ward off contact with gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, the heat (of the sun), and creeping things,
only as a cover for the shameful parts.
With proper discernment I make use of almsfood,
not for sport, or for showing off, not for ornament, or for adornment,
but only to maintain this body, and to carry on,
to inhibit annoyance, and to assist in the spiritual life,
and so I will get rid of any old feeling,
and not produce any new feeling,
and I will carry on, being blameless, and living comfortably.
With proper discernment I make use of a dwelling,
only to ward off the cold, to ward off the heat,
to ward off contact with gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, the heat (of the sun), and serpents,
only to dispel the trouble of the (varying) seasons, and so as to delight in seclusion.
With proper discernment I make use of the requisite of medicine for support when sick,
only to ward off oppressive feelings that have arisen
and at least be free from oppression.
May the gods from all over the universe assemble here
and listen to the King of the Sage’s true Dhamma about heaven and release:
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the Dhamma safeguard!
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Those (gods) who are peaceful, with peaceful minds, who have taken refuge in the triple refuge, whether here, or above the worlds,
the various earth gods, that group who have taken up, and are engaged in, virtuous deeds all of the time,
may these gods come, those who dwell on the majestic Mt. Meru, that excellent golden mountain,
peacefully, and with good reason, ( to hear) the Sage’s excellent word about entering the stream, and harmony.
May all yakkhas, gods, and deities, from the whole universe,
after partaking of the merits, and of all the thoroughly good fortune
we have acquired, being in harmony, and delighting in the teaching,
be not heedless and grant us complete protection.
May the teaching and the world be on the increase every day,
and may the gods every day protect the teaching and the world.
May you, and all those who are around you, together with
all your relatives, be untroubled, happy, and easy in mind.
(May you be protected) from the king, thieves, humans, and non-humans,
from fire and water, demons, stumps, and thorns,
from unlucky stars, and epidemics,
from what is not the true dhamma, not right view, not a good person,
and from fierce elephants, horses, antelopes, bulls, dogs, snakes, scorpions, poisonous serpents,
panthers, bears, hyenas, wild boars, buffaloes, yakkhas, rakkhasas, and so on,
from the manifold fears, the manifold diseases, the manifold calamities - (from all of these troubles) may you receive protection!
Thus I have heard:
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī
at Anāthapiṇḍika’s grounds in Jeta’s Wood.
There it was that the Fortunate One addressed the monks, saying:
“Monks!”, “Reverend Sir!” those monks replied to the Fortunate One,
and the Fortunate One said this:
“There are these ten things, monks,
that one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on.
What are the ten?
“I have become one who has no (distinctive) appearance”,
one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
“I am bound to others for my livelihood”,
one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
“I should comport myself differently”,
one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
“Can I myself find no fault with my virtue?”
one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
“Will my wise companions in the spiritual life, after testing me, find no fault with my virtue?”,
one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
“There is alteration in, and separation from, all that is dear and appealing to me”,
one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
“It is actions that I own, it is actions that I am heir to, it is actions that I am born from,
whatever actions I perform, whether good or bad,
one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
“In what way do the nights and days pass for me?”
one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
“Do I delight in empty places?”
one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
“Has a state beyond (ordinary) human beings -
These are the ten things, monks,
that one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on.
The Fortunate One said this,
and those monks were uplifted and greatly rejoiced in the Fortunate One’s words.
By this declaration of the truth may you be safe at all times!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
By this declaration of the truth may all disease be destroyed!
May the gods from all over the universe assemble here
and listen to the King of the Sage’s true Dhamma about heaven and release:
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the Dhamma safeguard!
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Comparing a lamp in a breeze, and the destruction of the life continuum,
seeing oneself as similar to others one should develop mindfulness of death.
Just as people who have attained great good fortune here have died,
in the same way will I die death is (surely) coming to me.
Indeed death always comes along with that which has arisen,
it is like a murderer who is seeking an opportunity to kill.
This life is slowly, without turning back, continually, eagerly,
going its way, it rises and falls just as the sun runs its course (and sets).
(Like) lightning, a bubble, dew, a line drawn on water, life (quickly goes to) destruction,
like an executioner in regard to his rival (death) can never be constrained.
Even the two kinds of Victors, who are famous, strong, meritorious, powerful, and of great intelligence,
were quickly slaughtered by death, so what to say about one like me?
When conditions fail there are internal and external adversities,
dying at each and every moment I will die in less (time) than a blink of an eye.
Having developed these four protections one should consider next
the eight great bases for urgency, having non-stop energy.
Birth, old age, sickness, death, the lower realms, the past and future suffering in the round,
the suffering in having to seek food in the present - these are the eight bases for urgency.
If, in the morning and in the evening, one who knows the way,
who desires his own benefit, practises (these meditations) continually,
then after destroying (even) extensive obstacles, that sage
easily attains great happiness, and the distinction of the deathless.
Thus I have heard:
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī
at Anāthapiṇḍika’s grounds in Jeta’s Wood.
There it was that the Fortunate One addressed the monks, saying:
“Monks!”, “Reverend Sir!” those monks replied to the Fortunate One,
and the Fortunate One said this:
“Monks, from the freedom of mind by friendliness meditation,
when practised, developed, made much of,
carried on, established, maintained, augmented, and properly instigated,
eleven advantages are to be expected.
What are the eleven?
He sleeps happily, he wakes up happily, he does not see bad dreams,
he is dear to human beings, he is dear to non-human beings,
the gods protect him, neither fire, poison, or sword can affect him,
he can concentrate his mind quickly, his complexion becomes clear,
he dies unbewildered, and if he penetrates no further, he will (at least) go to the Brahma world.
Monks, from the freedom of mind by friendliness meditation,
when practised, developed, made much of,
carried on, established, maintained, augmented, and properly instigated,
there are these eleven advantages to be expected.”
The Fortunate One said this,
and those monks were uplifted and greatly rejoiced in the Fortunate One’s words.
By this declaration of the truth may you be safe at all times!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
By this declaration of the truth may all disease be destroyed!
May the gods from all over the universe assemble here
and listen to the King of the Sage’s true Dhamma about heaven and release:
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the Dhamma safeguard!
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Thus I have heard:
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī
at Anāthapiṇḍika’s grounds in Jeta’s Wood.
There it was that the Fortunate One addressed the monks, saying:
“Monks!”, “Reverend Sir!” those monks replied to the Fortunate One,
and the Fortunate One said this:
“Formerly, monks, there was a massed battle between the gods and the asuras.
Then, monks, the lord of the gods Sakka addressed the Tāvatiṁsa gods, saying:
“If, dear Sirs, to the gods who have gone into battle
there should arise fear, or terror, or horror,
at that time you could look for the top of my banner.
For to those who look to the top of my banner
whatever fear there may be, or terror, or horror, will be given up.
If you cannot look to the top of my banner,
then you could look for the top of the god-king Pajāpati’s banner.
For to those who look to the top of the god-king Pajāpati’s banner
whatever fear there may be, or terror, or horror, will be given up.
If you cannot look to the top of the god-king Pajāpati’s banner,
then you could look for the top of the god-king Varuṇa’s banner.
For to those who look to the top of the god-king Varuṇa’s banner
whatever fear there may be, or terror, or horror, will be given up.
If you cannot look to the top of the god-king Varuṇa’s banner,
then you could look for the top of the god-king Īsāna’s banner.
For to those who look to the top of the god-king Īsāna’s banner
whatever fear there may be, or terror, or horror, will be given up.
But, monks, to he who looks to the top of the lord of the gods Sakka’s banner,
or who looks to the top of the god-king Pajāpati’s banner,
or who looks to the top of the god-king Varuṇa’s banner,
or who looks to the top of the god-king Īsāna’s banner,
whatever fear there may be, or terror, or horror, may be given up, and may not be given up.
What is the reason for that?
The lord of the gods Sakka, monks, is not free from passion, is not free from hatred, is not free from delusion,
being fearful, terrified, scared, he ran away.
But I say this, monks:
If to you, monks, after going to the wilderness,
or to the root of a tree, or to an empty place,
there should arise fear, or terror, or horror,
at that time you could recollect me thus:
“Such is he, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha,
the one endowed with understanding and good conduct, the Happy One, the One who understands the worlds,
the unsurpassed guide for those people who need taming,
the Teacher of gods and men, the Buddha, the Fortunate One.”
For, monks, to those who recollect me
whatever fear there may be, or terror, or horror, will be given up.
If you cannot recollect me, then recollect the Dhamma thus:
“The Dhamma has been well-proclaimed by the Fortunate One,
it is visible, not subject to time, inviting inspection, onward leading,
and can be understood by the wise for themselves.”
For, monks, to those who recollect the Dhamma
whatever fear there may be, or terror, or horror, will be given up.
If you cannot recollect the Dhamma, then recollect the Saṅgha thus:
“The Fortunate One’s Saṅgha of disciples are good in their practice,
the Fortunate One’s Saṅgha of disciples are straight in their practice,
the Fortunate One’s Saṅgha of disciples are systematic in their practice,
the Fortunate One’s Saṅgha of disciples are correct in their practice,
that is to say, the four pairs of persons, the eight individual persons,
this is the Fortunate One’s Saṅgha of disciples,
they are worthy of offerings, of hospitality, of gifts, and of reverential salutation,
they are an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
For, monks, to those who recollect the Saṅgha
whatever fear there may be, or terror, or horror, will be given up.
The Realised One, monks, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha,
is free from passion, is free from hatred, is free from delusion, not being fearful, not terrified, not scared, he did not run away.”
The Fortunate One said this, and after saying this, the Happy One, the Teacher, said something more:
“In the wilds, at the root of a tree, or in an empty place, monks,
you must recollect the Sambuddha, and there will be no fear for you.
if you can't remember the Buddha, the world’s elder, the man-bull,
then you must remember the Dhamma, which leads out, which is well preached.
If you can't remember the Dhamma, which leads out, which is well preached,
then you must remember the Saṅgha, which is an unsurpassed field of merit.
Thus for those who remember the Buddha, the Dhamma, or the Saṅgha, monks,
(there will be no) fear, or terror, there will be no horror.”
By this declaration of the truth may you be safe at all times!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
By this declaration of the truth may all disease be destroyed!
Not doing any bad deeds, undertaking wholesome deeds,
and purifying one’s mind - this is the teaching of the Buddhas.
Forbearing patience is the supreme austerity, Nibbāna is supreme say the Buddhas.
One gone forth does not hurt another, (nor does) an ascetic harass another.
Not finding fault, not hurting, restraint in regard to the precepts,
knowing the correct measure in food, (living in) a remote dwelling place,
being devoted to meditation - this is the teaching of the Buddhas.
All conditioned things are impermanent, when one sees this with wisdom,
then one grows tired of suffering, this is the path to purity.
All conditioned things are suffering, when one sees this with wisdom,
then one grows tired of suffering, this is the path to purity.
All things are without a self, when one sees this with wisdom,
then one grows tired of suffering, this is the path to purity.
May there be every blessing, and may all of the gods protect you,
by the power of all the Buddhas may you be safe forever!
May there be every blessing, and may all of the gods protect you,
by the power of all that is Dhamma may you be safe forever!
May there be every blessing, and may all of the gods protect you,
by the power of the whole Sangha may you be safe forever!
Whatever bad sign, inauspicious event, or whatever ominous bird shriek there is,
also evil planets, and unpleasant dreams - may they perish through the power of the Buddha!
Whatever bad sign, inauspicious event, or whatever ominous bird shriek there is,
also evil planets, and unpleasant dreams - may they perish through the power of the Dhamma!
Whatever bad sign, inauspicious event, or whatever ominous bird shriek there is,
also evil planets, and unpleasant dreams - may they perish through the power of the Saṅgha!
may those who grieve be without grief - may all living creatures be so!
You should give gifts with confidence, protect your virtue at all times,
find delight in meditation, and (after death) go to the gods.
All the Buddhas’ strength, and whatever strength the Individual Buddhas
and Worthy Ones have, by that power we bind this protection in every way!
May the gods from all over the universe assemble here
and listen to the King of the Sage’s true Dhamma about heaven and release:
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the Dhamma safeguard!
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
In a similar way to oneself, all beings desire happiness,
having seen that one should gradually develop friendliness towards all beings.
May I constantly be happy, free from suffering, and like myself
may my benefactors be happy, neutral persons, and foes also.
In this village, and its surrounding fields, may beings always be happy,
and those in other countries, and people throughout the universe.
Throughout the entire universe may the countless beings, creatures,
and so too (all) women, men, noble ones, and also ignoble ones,
gods, humans, and fallen creatures, and likewise (all beings) in the ten directions.
What should be done by one skilled in goodness, who has comprehended the state of peace:
he ought to be able, straight, and upright, easy to speak to, meek, without conceit,
satisfied (with little), easy to support, free from duties, and light in living,
with faculties at peace, prudent, not forward, and greedless among the families,
he should not do the slightest thing whereby others who are wise might find fault (with him).
“(May all beings) be happy and secure, may all beings in their hearts be happy!
Whatsoever breathing beings there are trembling, firm, or any other (beings),
whether they be long or great, of middle (size), short, tiny, or of compact (body),
those who are seen, and those who are unseen, those who live far away, those who are near,
those who are born, and those who still seek birth may all beings in their hearts be happy!”
No one should cheat another, nor should he despise anyone wherever he is,
he should not long for suffering for another because of anger or resentment.
In the same way as a mother would protect her child, her only child, with her life,
so too towards all beings one should develop the measureless thought (of friendliness).
Towards the entire world he should develop the measureless thought of friendliness,
above, below, and across (the middle), without barriers, hate, or enmity.
Standing, walking, sitting, lying, for as long as he is without torpor,
he should be resolved on this mindfulness, for this, they say here, is the (true) spiritual life.
Without going near a (wrong) view, virtuous, and endowed with (true) insight,
having removed greed towards sense pleasures, he does not come to lie in a womb again.
By this declaration of the truth may you be safe at all times!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
By this declaration of the truth may all disease be destroyed!
Not doing any bad deeds, undertaking wholesome deeds,
and purifying one’s mind - this is the teaching of the Buddhas.
Forbearing patience is the supreme austerity, Nibbāna is supreme say the Buddhas.
One gone forth does not hurt another, (nor does) an ascetic harass another.
Not finding fault, not hurting, restraint in regard to the precepts,
knowing the correct measure in food, (living in) a remote dwelling place,
being devoted to meditation - this is the teaching of the Buddhas.
All conditioned things are impermanent, when one sees this with wisdom,
then one grows tired of suffering, this is the path to purity.
All conditioned things are suffering, when one sees this with wisdom,
then one grows tired of suffering, this is the path to purity.
All things are without a self, when one sees this with wisdom,
then one grows tired of suffering, this is the path to purity.
The lord of great compassion, for the benefit of all living creatures,
having fulfilled all the perfections has attained supreme and Complete Awakening.
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
Succeeding at the root of the Bodhi tree he furthered the Sakyans’ joy -
so may you be successful, may you succeed with the blessing of success!
Having honoured the Buddha treasure, the best and supreme medicine,
of benefit to gods and men, by the blessed power of the Buddha
may all adversities perish, and all suffering come to an end for you!
Having honoured the Dhamma treasure, the best and supreme medicine,
which brings fevers to an end, by the blessed power of the Dhamma
may all adversities perish, and all fear come to an end for you!
Having honoured the Saṅgha treasure, the best and supreme medicine,
worthy of gifts and hospitality, by the blessed power of the Saṅgha
may all adversities perish, and all disease come to an end for you!
Whatever the many and various treasures there are in the world
no treasure is equal to the Buddha: through this (truth) may you be safe!
Whatever the many and various treasures there are in the world
no treasure is equal to the Dhamma: through this (truth) may you be safe!
Whatever the many and various treasures there are in the world
no treasure is equal to the Saṅgha: through this (truth) may you be safe!
For me there is no other refuge, for me the Buddha is the best refuge!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
For me there is no other refuge, for me the Dhamma is the best refuge!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
For me there is no other refuge, for me the Saṅgha is the best refuge!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
May you avoid all calamities and may all disease be destroyed,
may there be no obstacles for you, may you be happy and live long!
May the gods from all over the universe assemble here
and listen to the King of the Sage’s true Dhamma about heaven and release:
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the Dhamma safeguard!
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Recollection of the Buddha, friendliness, unattractiveness, and mindfulness of death -
these are the four protective meditations that a virtuous monk should develop.
Recollecting the Sage’s virtue, and his endless, extensive, good qualities,
the wise monk should develop the recollection of the Buddha first.
Alone he destroyed all the corruptions, and (bad) predispositions,
and being continually and fully pure he is worthy of worship at all times.
The Sage by himself has, in every way, completely awakened to all things
throughout the whole of time, and alone he has arrived at omniscience.
He who never spoke foolish words, has arrived at that glorious state (Nibbāna),
he knew the threefold world system (completely) without leaving anything out.
Overflowing with countless good qualities he is supreme among all beings,
with countless skilful means he tamed those men who could be tamed.
He alone, to the whole world was the teacher of everything good,
he is the highest treasure, having qualities such as good fortune, mastery, and so on.
Being wise in regard to all things compassionate to everybody,
he exceeded (others) in the best qualities, (knowing) what was for his own and others’ good.
Through sympathy he set his mind on the perfections through wisdom he raised himself up,
he raised himself above all things, through sympathy he raised others too.
Even his visible form-body was beyond thought,
what can be said of his spiritual body, which was unique, having powerful knowledge?
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī
at Anāthapiṇḍika’s grounds in Jeta’s Wood.
Then a certain god, towards the end of the night,
whose surpassing beauty lit up the whole of Jeta’s Wood,
approached the Fortunate One,
and after approaching and worshipping the Fortunate One, he stood on one side.
While standing on one side that god addressed the Fortunate One with a verse:
“Many are the gods and the men who have thought about the blessings
hoping for safety: now please say what is the supreme blessing.”
“Not associating with fools, but associating with the wise,
honouring those worthy of honour: this is the supreme blessing.
Living in a suitable place, formerly having done good deeds,
aspiring in a right way oneself: this is the supreme blessing.
Having great learning and craft, and being disciplined and well trained,
and whatever words are well spoken: this is the supreme blessing.
Attendance on one’s mother and father, looking after one’s wife and children,
with works that are not agitating: this is the supreme blessing.
Giving, and living by the Dhamma, and looking after one’s relatives,
(performing) actions that are blameless: this is the supreme blessing.
Abstinence, avoidance of bad deeds, restraint from intoxicating drink,
being heedful regarding (all) things: this is the supreme blessing.
Having respect, being humble, being satisfied and grateful,
listening to Dhamma at the right time: this is the supreme blessing.
Being patient and easily spoken to, seeing ascetics,
discussing Dhamma at the right time: this is the supreme blessing.
Austere, living spiritually, insight into the noble truths,
the experience of Nibbāna: this is the supreme blessing.
He whose mind does not waver, when it is touched by things of this world,
(being) griefless, dustless, and secure: this is the supreme blessing.
Having done as here directed, they are undefeated everywhere,
they go everywhere in safety: for them this is the supreme blessing.”
By this declaration of the truth may you be safe at all times!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
By this declaration of the truth may all disease be destroyed!
May the gods from all over the universe assemble here
and listen to the King of the Sage’s true Dhamma about heaven and release:
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the safeguard!
Reverend Sirs, this is the time for hearing the Dhamma safeguard!
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Reverence to him, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha
Beginning with the aspiration (for Buddhahood, and thinking of) the Realised One’s ten perfections,
ten minor perfections, ten great perfections - altogether thirty perfections -
his five great sacrifices, three ways of conduct, descent into the womb for his final existence, birth,
great renunciation, life of effort, sitting cross legged at the Bodhi tree, victory over Māra,
his penetration and knowledge of omniscience, and his nine supermundane attainments,
and after considering all these Buddha qualities, (going round) the three walls of Vesāli, during the three watches of the night,
the venerable elder Ānanda made this safeguard,
after establishing great compassion in his heart:
The gods in the ten hundred thousand million universes
accepted the order (given) in the city of Vesāli,
and disease, non-human beings, and famine - the threefold fear that had arisen -
quickly disappeared, we will recite that safeguard:
Whatever beings have come together here, whether of the earth or in the firmament,
may the minds of all those beings be happy, and may they listen carefully to what is said.
Therefore, all of you beings, be attentive, be friendly towards this generation of men,
they who bring offerings by day and by night, therefore, being heedful, you must protect them.
Whatever riches there are - here or elsewhere or in the heavens - that excellent treasure
is not equal unto the Realised One, this excellent treasure is in the Buddha:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
(Pollutants’) end, dispassion, deathlessness, excellence: which the concentrated Sakyan sage attained,
there is nothing that is equal to that state, this excellent treasure is in the Dhamma:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
That which the Buddha, the Great One, praised as pure, the concentration said to have prompt (result),
no equal to that concentration is found, this excellent treasure is in the Dhamma:
by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Those eight individuals praised by the good, there are these four pairs (of individuals),
those disciples of the Happy One are worthy of gifts, those things that have been given to them have great fruit,
this excellent treasure is in the Saṅgha: by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Those who have firm and devoted minds, without sense desire in Gotama’s dispensation,
those who have attained, and entered the deathless, are enjoying emancipation, gained for free,
this excellent treasure is in the Saṅgha: by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Just as a locking post stuck fast in the earth does not waver on account of the four winds,
in the same way, I say, is the true person, the one who sees the noble truths completely,
this excellent treasure is in the Saṅgha: by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Those who clearly distinguish the noble truths, which were well preached by the one with deep wisdom,
however great they become in heedlessness still they do not take up an eighth existence,
this excellent treasure is in the Saṅgha: by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
With his attainment of (liberating) insight there are a triad of things that are given up:
embodiment view, uncertainty, and whatever (grasping at) virtue and practices there is.
He is free from (rebirth in) the four lower worlds, he is incapable of the six great crimes.
this excellent treasure is in the Saṅgha: by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Whatever bad action there is that he performs by way of body, or of speech, or of mind,
he is incapable of covering it up, this incapacity is said of one who has seen the state (of peace),
this excellent treasure is in the Saṅgha: by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Just like a tall woodland tree crowned with blossom in the summer months, in the early summer,
in the same way he preached the Dhamma which is best, which goes to Nibbāna, the highest benefit,
this excellent treasure is in the Buddha: by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
The best one, knowing the best, giving the best, brought the best, brought the best, unsurpassed he preached the best Dhamma.
this excellent treasure is in the Buddha: by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
The old is destroyed, and nothing new is produced, (their) minds are unexcited by future rebirth,
they have destroyed the seeds, and have no desire for growth, the wise are still, just as this lamp (is still),
this excellent treasure is in the Saṅgha: by virtue of this truth may there be safety!
Whatever beings have come together here, whether of the earth or in the firmament,
the Realised One is revered by gods and men, we honour the Buddha - may there be safety!
Whatever beings have come together here, whether of the earth or in the firmament,
the Realised One is revered by gods and men, we honour the Dhamma - may there be safety!
Whatever beings have come together here, whether of the earth or in the firmament,
the Realised One is revered by gods and men, we honour the Saṅgha - may there be safety!
By this declaration of the truth may you be safe at all times!
By this declaration of the truth may you have the blessing of success!
By this declaration of the truth may all disease be destroyed!
One should regard someone who shows your faults just like one who points out hidden treasure,
one should keep company with such a sagacious, learned person who reproves you;
One should advise and instruct, and forbid whatever is vile,
One should not keep company with wicked friends, one should not keep company with the ignoble,
The one who drinks Dhamma
Course-makers lead water,
fletchers straighten arrows,
carpenters straighten wood,
Just as solid rock is not shaken by the wind,
Like a lake that is deep, clear and unruffled,
True people surely everywhere renounce,
the good do not talk of desiring sense-pleasures;
when touched by pleasure or by suffering,
Not for one’s own sake and not for another’s sake,
not desiring a child, riches, or a kingdom –
he should not desire his success through corruption;
Amongst humans few people go beyond,
but those who live righteously, conforming with this well-taught Dhamma,
Having abandoned the dark state, the wise one should develop the bright,
One should desire to delight in that place, having given up sense pleasures, and having no possessions,
For those who have well developed with right mind the factors of complete awakening,
having given up grasping, those who delight in being unattached,
The wise, fully understanding this in regard to heedfulness,
When the wise one eliminates heedlessness with his heedfulness,
and mounts the palace of wisdom, griefless, (he looks) on grieving people;
The fool who knows (his) foolishness, is at least wise in that (matter),
Even if a fool attends on a wise man for his whole life long,
If a perceptive man attends on a wise man even for a second,
If one regards oneself as dear one should guard oneself right well,
First one should establish oneself in what is suitable,
Not through a rain of coins is satisfaction found for sense desires,
does not find delight even in heavenly pleasures.
One should make an island for oneself,
soon the wise one should endeavour,
removing the stain, blemishless,
One should make an island for oneself,
soon the wise one should endeavour,
removing the stain, blemishless,
One who would hastily settle a case because of that is not one who stands by Dhamma,
One is not a wise person merely because of speaking much;
Not through silence is a deluded fool (considered to be) a seer,
Understanding the truth of this the wise one, endowed with virtue,
For he who consorts with fools grieves for a long time,
dwelling with fools is always suffering as it is with enemies,
“Here I will dwell during the rains, here during winter and summer”,
It is better to live alone, there can be no friendship with a fool,
one should live alone and not do anything bad,
Like an elephant in battle (endures) an arrow shot from bow
They lead one trained into a crowd, a king mounts one who has been trained,
Noble are the well-trained horses, the well-bred horses from Sindh,
Not by these vehicles can one go to the place beyond destinations,
The tusker named Dhanapālaka
musty in rut, difficult to restrain,
bound, he doesn’t eat (even) a morsel,
When one is torpid and overeats,
sleepy and rolling on the bed,
like a great pig fed on fodder,
Formerly this wandering mind wandered
through desire, pleasure and happiness,
(but) today I will control it wisely,
You should delight in heedfulness, you should always protect your mind,
If you should find a prudent friend
or companion, one who lives well, a wise one,
overcoming all your troubles
If you do not find a prudent friend
or companion, one who lives well, a wise one,
like a king who abandons his conquered kingdom
It is better to live alone, there can be no friendship with a fool,
one should live alone and not do anything bad,
Friends are good whenever need arises,
being content with everything is good,
at the break-up of life merit is good,
Respecting one’s mother is good in the world, also respecting one’s father is good,
Virtuous conduct till old age is good, the establishing of faith is good,
If, by renouncing a small good, he might see a good that is large,
One who desires happiness for oneself by causing suffering for another,
That to be done is rejected, but what is not to be done is done,
But for those who always properly undertake mindfulness of the body
who do not practice what is not to be done, persisting in what is to be done,
Destroying mother and father, and (then) two noble kings,
Destroying mother and father, and two prosperous
Gotama’s disciples always awake to a good wakening,
Gotama’s disciples always awake to a good wakening,
Gotama’s disciples always awake to a good wakening,
Gotama’s disciples always awake to a good wakening,
Gotama’s disciples always awake to a good wakening,
Gotama’s disciples always awake to a good wakening,
The going forth is hard, it is hard to find delight (therein), (but) it is (also) hard to dwell in households that are suffering,
dwelling together with those different is suffering, travellers (in the round of births) are affected by suffering,
The faithful one who is endowed with virtue, and has wealth and fame,
The good are visible
Sitting alone, lying down alone, walking alone, diligent,
Hasten to do wholesome deeds, ward off the mind from wickedness,
Should a person do that which is wicked, he should not do it again and again,
If a person should make merit, he should do it again and again,
Even the wicked one experiences good fortune while the wickedness does not ripen,
Even the fortunate one experiences wickedness as long as the good fortune does not ripen,
One should not despise a little wickedness (thinking): it will not come to me,
through the falling of water drops the water-pot is (quickly) filled,
One should not despise a little merit (thinking): it will not come to me,
through the falling of water drops the water-pot is (quickly) filled,
Like a merchant on a fearful path, with few friends and great wealth,
If there is no wound in his hand he can carry poison with his hand,
One offends against the inoffensive one,
a purified and passionless person,
that wicked deed (then) returns to the fool,
Some are reborn in the womb, (but) those who are wicked in the underworld,
Neither in the sky, nor in the middle of the ocean,
nor after entering a mountain cleft:
there is no place found on this earth
Neither in the sky, nor in the middle of the ocean,
nor after entering a mountain cleft:
there is no place found on this earth,
That wickedness done by oneself, born in oneself, arising in oneself,
By oneself alone is a wicked deed done, by oneself is one defiled,
by oneself is a wicked deed left undone, by oneself is one purified,
The one whose wicked deed is covered over by a good deed –
For the person speaking falsely, who has transgressed in this one thing,
The non-doing of anything wicked, undertaking of what is good,
Bad conduct is a woman’s stain, stinginess is a giver’s stain,
The one who pacifies wicked deeds, small and great, in every way –
The seer who rejects wicked deeds through that is (considered) a seer,
Many wearing the monastic robe around their necks are wicked, unrestrained,
It is better to live alone, there can be no friendship with a fool,
one should live alone and not do wicked things,
Virtuous conduct till old age is good, the establishing of faith is good,
Warding off wickedness one is called a brahmin,
one living austerely is said to be an ascetic,
* because of driving forth (all) stain from oneself
The eightfold is the best of paths, four principles (the best) of truths,
This is the path, there is no other, for insight and for purity,
Having entered upon this path you will make an end to suffering,
Your duty is to have ardour declare the Realised Ones,
All conditions are impermanent, when one sees this with wisdom,
All conditions are suffering, when one sees this with wisdom,
All components (of mind and body)
The one who has not energy at a time for energy,
youthful, strong, (but) given to laziness,
whose mind lacks (right) intention and is indolent –
Verbally guarded, well-restrained in mind,
not doing a wrong deed with the body,
one should purify these three paths of action,
From effort arises wisdom, without effort wisdom is destroyed,
having understood these two paths of development and decline,
Cut down the forest (of defilements)
* For as long as an atom of desire
of a man for a woman is not cut down,
for just so long is the mind in bondage,
Cut off (any) affection for one’s self,
like an autumn lotus (plucked) with the hand,
develop fully the path to peace and
“Here I will dwell during the rains, here during winter and summer”,
That person whose mind is attached and besotted by cattle and children,
Children are not a refuge, nor fathers, not even kin,
Understanding the truth of this the wise one, endowed with virtue,
Whoever has gone for refuge to the Buddha,  the Dhamma and the Saṅgha,
Suffering, arising of suffering, and the overcoming of suffering,
That is a secure refuge, that is the refuge supreme,
The deeply wise sagacious one, skilled in what is path and not path,
He whose victory cannot be undone,
whose victory no one here approaches,
the Buddha, whose range is endless,
* For him there is no desire, attachment,
or craving to lead (him) anywhere,
the Buddha, whose range is endless,
Those wise ones intent on meditation,
It is rare to acquire (birth as a) human, rare is the life of mortals,
The non-doing of anything wicked, undertaking of what is good,
Enduring patience is the supreme austerity,
Nibbāna is supreme say the Buddhas,
for one gone forth does not hurt another,
Not finding fault, not hurting, restraint by the regulations,
knowing the right measure of food, (living in) a remote dwelling,
Not through a rain of coins is satisfaction found for sense desires,
does not find delight even in heavenly pleasures.
* Many people shaken by fear go for refuge
That is not a secure refuge, that is not the refuge supreme,
Whoever has gone refuge to the Buddha,  the Dhamma and  the Saṅgha,
Suffering, arising of suffering, and the overcoming of suffering,
That is a secure refuge, that is the refuge supreme,
A person of good breed is rare, that one is not born everywhere,
The arising of the Buddhas is good, the teaching of the True Dhamma is good,
For those who worship those worthy of worship, whether Buddhas or disciples,
for those who worship such as these, the emancipated, the fearless,
There is no footprint in the sky, there is no ascetic on the outside,
There is no footprint in the sky, there is no ascetic on the outside,
Gotama’s disciples always awake to a good wakening,
That monastic who dwells in loving-kindness, with faith in Buddha’s dispensation,
The sun is radiant by day, the moon shines by night,
the accoutred noble is radiant, the meditating brahmin is radiant,
Long is the night for one awake, long is a league for one tired,
If while roaming one cannot find one better or the same as oneself,
“Sons are mine, riches are mine,” so the fool suffers vexation,
The fool who knows (his) foolishness, is at least wise in that (matter),
Even if a fool attends on a wise man for his whole life long,
If a perceptive man attends on a wise man even for a second,
Stupid fools live having themselves as their own foes,
That deed is not well done, which, having done, one has regret,
But that deed is well done, which, having done, one has no regret,
The fool thinks it sweet, as long as the wicked deed does not ripen,
From month to month the fool may eat food with the tip of kusa-grass,
A wicked deed that has been done, like milk, does not turn all at once,
As far as learning arises for a fool, it is only to his disadvantage,
He may wish for the respect that is lacking, and status amongst the monastics,
“Householders and renunciants should both think this was done by me,
let them (all) be under my sway, in all to be done and not done”,
For the means to gains is one thing, the (path) going to Nibbāna another,
thus knowing this the monastic disciple of the Buddha
The foolish and stupid people cultivate heedlessness,
When the wise one eliminates heedlessness with his heedfulness,
and mounts the palace of wisdom, griefless, (he looks) on grieving people;
One should not despise a little wickedness (thinking): it will not come to me,
through the falling of water drops the water-pot is (quickly) filled,
One offends against the inoffensive one,
a purified and passionless person,
that wicked deed (then) returns to the fool,
The fool does not understand the wicked deeds he is doing,
Come, look upon this world adorned like a king’s gilded chariot,
The miserly go not to the world of the gods,
fools surely do not praise giving,
but the wise one rejoices in giving,
Meeting with the noble is good, living together (with them) is always pleasant,
For he who consorts with fools grieves for a long time,
dwelling with fools is always suffering as it is with enemies,
“Here I will dwell during the rains, here during winter and summer”,
It is better to live alone, there can be no friendship with a fool,
one should live alone and not do anything bad,
For the one who has entered an empty place, a monastic with a peaceful mind,
You are now like a withered leaf,
Yama’s men
you stand at decay’s door,
One should make an island for oneself,
soon the wise one should endeavour,
removing the stain, blemishless,
You are now advanced in age,
you have come to Yama’s presence,
there is nowhere to dwell in between,
One should make an island for oneself,
soon the wise one should endeavour,
removing the stain, blemishless,
The sage gradually, little by little, moment by moment,
As a (rust) stain arises from iron,
and arisen from that, it eats it away,
so with one who is overindulgent
Lack of repetition is the ruin
Bad conduct is a woman’s stain, stinginess is a giver’s stain,
A stain that is worse than that stain, ignorance is the supreme stain,
Life is light for one without shame, with the bold courage of a crow,
living a life with backbiting, recklessness, and defilements.
Life is hard when endowed with shame, for the one constantly seeking purity,
Whoever kills a living being, and speaks a word that is not true,
that person who is devoted to a drink of liquor and wine,
Know it thus, dear sir, a lack of restraint is a bad thing,
The people give according to faith, according to their confidence,
herein the one who becomes dejected because of food and drink (given) to others
For the one in whom this (dejection) is cut off, destroyed at the root, dug up,
There is no fire that is like passion, there is nothing that takes a hold like hatred,
Easy to see are others’ fault, but one’s own is hard to see,
for one sifts other peoples’ faults like they were chaff,
The one who constantly looks for another’s fault, who is an abject complainer,
There is no footprint in the sky, there is no ascetic on the outside,
There is no footprint in the sky, there is no ascetic on the outside,
Warding off wickedness one is called a brahmin,
one living austerely is said to be an ascetic,
* because of driving forth (all) stain from oneself
Why this laughter, why this joy, when the world is constantly burning,
See this beautified manikin, a heap of sores that is raised up,
This body is worn out, a nest of disease, perishing,
Like discarded white gourds
This fortress is made out of bones,
plastered over with flesh and blood,
but hidden within lie old age,
Decorated royal chariots decay,
and the body also decays,
but the good Dhamma does not decay,
The person of little learning increases in age like an ox,
Through the round of countless births and deaths I have wandered without finding
O housebuilder, now you are seen! You will not build the house again:
all your rafters have been broken, and the ridgepole has been destroyed,
Not having lived the holy life, not having gained wealth in their youth,
Not having lived the holy life, not having gained wealth in their youth,
Like a cowherd with a stick drives cattle to pasture,
Virtuous conduct till old age is good, the establishing of faith is good,
Mind precedes thoughts, mind is their chief, (their quality is) made by mind,
if with a base mind one speaks or acts,
through that, suffering follows him like a wheel (follows) the ox’s foot.
Knowing that this body is like a jar,
establishing the mind like a fortress,
fight Māra with the weapon of wisdom,
guard your success, and do not be attached.
Who will know this earth
and the lower realm, together with the gods?
* Who (will reflect) on the well-taught verse of Dhamma
as a good man reflects on a flower?
Living contemplating what is pleasant, uncontrolled in sense faculties,
not knowing the limit in food, indolent, low in energy –
Māra surely overthrows that one, like wind (overthrows) a weak tree.
Through activity, heedfulness, through self-control and through restraint,
the sage should make an island that no flood waters can overcome.
Heedful amongst the heedless ones, || wakeful amongst the ones who sleep,
like a swift horse who abandons || a weak horse, the wise one moves on.
Here he laments, after death he laments,
the wicked one laments in both places,
he laments, he suffers vexation,
seeing the defilement of his own deeds.
Even though reciting abundant scriptures,
the heedless fellow, who does not do (what they say),
like a cowboy counting other’s cattle,
does not partake of the ascetic life.
Just as in a forsaken and discarded heap along the highway
a lotus might arise in that place, with a pure fragrance, delighting the mind,
* so amongst the forsaken, the Perfect Sambuddha’s disciple
outshines blind and ordinary folk through his wisdom.
* For the mind that is difficult to subdue, flighty, flitting wherever it will,
restraint is good, a restrained mind brings happiness.
The wise, fully understanding this in regard to heedfulness,
rejoice in heedfulness, delight in the domain of the Noble.
Who will know this earth
and the lower realm, together with the gods?
Though there are a thousand sayings consisting of useless words,
Though there are a thousand verses consisting of useless words,
One may speak a thousand verses consisting of useless words,
One may conquer a thousand men a thousand times in a battle,
Conquest over self is better than that over other people,
neither gods, nor gandhabbas, nor Māra together with Brahmās,
One might give alms impartially
and one might worship someone with developed self
One person might care for the fire in the woods for a hundred years;
and one might worship someone with developed self for a second –
Whatever the alms or the sacrifice in the world
the one seeking merit may give for a year,
all that comes not to a quarter (of the merit) –
For the one who is constantly worshipping honourable elders,
One might live for a hundred years, unvirtuous and uncomposed,
One might live for a hundred years, lacking in wisdom, uncomposed,
One might live for a hundred years, indolent, with less energy,
One might live for a hundred years without seeing rise and fall,
One might live for a hundred years without seeing the deathless state,
One might live for a hundred years without seeing the supreme state,
Let us live truly happily, without hatred, amongst those who have hatred,
Let us live truly happily, without sickness, amongst those who are sick,
Let us live truly happily, without longing, amongst those who are longing,
We live truly happily enough having no possessions ourselves,
The victor generates hatred, the defeated one finds suffering,
There is no fire like passion, there is no offence like hatred,
Hunger is the supreme sickness, conditions are the supreme suffering,
Health is the supreme gain, content the supreme wealth,
Savouring the taste of solitude, and the taste of peace,
Meeting with
For he who consorts with fools grieves for a long time,
dwelling with fools is always suffering as it is with enemies,
the firm, the wise and the learned,
the virtuous, dutiful and noble –
* (accompany) such a true and intelligent person
Mind precedes thoughts, mind is their chief, (their quality is) made by mind,
if with pure mind one speaks or acts,
Do not cultivate heedlessness, do not be acquainted with delight in sensual pleasure,
for the heedful one, meditating, (surely) attains great happiness.
* For the mind that is difficult to subdue, flighty, flitting wherever it will,
Hard to see, very subtle, flitting wherever it will,
The one who drinks Dhamma lives well, with a clear mind,
True people surely everywhere renounce,
the good do not talk of desiring sense-pleasures;
when touched by pleasure or by suffering,
For the one who is constantly worshipping honourable elders,
If a person should make merit, he should do it again and again,
One who harms with a stick beings who desire happiness,
One who harms not with a stick beings who desire happiness,
One should strive, not be heedless, one should live by Dhamma, with good conduct,
One should live by Dhamma, with good conduct, not with bad conduct,
The miserly go not to the world of the gods,
fools surely do not praise giving,
but the wise one rejoices in giving,
A person of good breed is rare, that one is not born everywhere,
The arising of the Buddhas is good, the teaching of the True Dhamma is good,
If, by renouncing a small good, he might see a good that is large,
One who desires happiness for oneself by causing suffering for another,
Formerly this wandering mind wandered
through desire, pleasure and happiness,
(but) today I will control it wisely,
Friends are good whenever need arises,
being content with everything is good,
at the break-up of life merit is good,
Respecting one’s mother is good in the world, also respecting one’s father is good,
Virtuous conduct till old age is good, the establishing of faith is good,
* There are flowing streams of affection and
mental happinesses for a person,
pleasure-dependent they seek happiness,
That monastic who dwells in loving-kindness, with faith in Buddha’s dispensation,
By oneself one should censure self, by oneself one should be controlled,
The monastic, having much happiness, with faith in the dispensation of the Buddha,
If one regards oneself as dear one should guard oneself right well,
First one should establish oneself in what is suitable,
He should do himself as he would advise another (to do),
For the self is the friend of self, for what other friend would there be?
That wickedness done by oneself, born in oneself, arising in oneself,
The one who has an exceeding lack of virtue, like a deadly creeper covering a Sal tree,
Easily done are things not good, and unbeneficial for oneself,
* Whoever reviles the worthy teaching of the Noble Ones who live by Dhamma,
that stupid one, depending on wicked views,
By oneself alone is a wicked deed done, by oneself is one defiled,
by oneself is a wicked deed left undone, by oneself is one purified,
One should not neglect one’s own good for another’s, however great;
Not the wrongs of others, or what others have done or have not done
If while roaming one cannot find one better or the same as oneself,
“Sons are mine, riches are mine,” so the fool suffers vexation,
Stupid fools live having themselves as their own foes,
Course-makers lead water,
fletchers straighten arrows,
carpenters straighten wood,
Not for one’s own sake and not for another’s sake,
not desiring a child, riches, or a kingdom –
he should not desire his success through corruption;
One should desire to delight in that place, having given up sense pleasures, and having no possessions,
One may conquer a thousand men a thousand times in a battle,
Conquest over self is better than that over other people,
neither gods, nor gandhabbas, nor Māra together with Brahmās,
Everyone trembles at the stick, everyone is in fear of death,
Everyone trembles at the stick, for all of them life is dear,
One who harms with a stick beings who desire happiness,
One who harms not with a stick beings who desire happiness,
Course-makers lead water,
fletchers straighten arrows,
carpenters straighten wood,
One should make an island for oneself,
soon the wise one should endeavour,
removing the stain, blemishless,
One should make an island for oneself,
soon the wise one should endeavour,
removing the stain, blemishless,
The sage gradually, little by little, moment by moment,
All components (of mind and body) are without self, when one sees this with wisdom,
Cut off (any) affection for one’s self,
like an autumn lotus (plucked) with the hand,
develop fully the path to peace and
One who desires happiness for oneself by causing suffering for another,
As a border town is guarded on the inside and the outside,
so one should watch over oneself, and you should not let the moment pass,
Noble are the well-trained horses, the well-bred horses from Sindh,
Not by these vehicles can one go to the place beyond destinations,
By oneself one should censure self, by oneself one should be controlled,
Self is the protector of self, self is the refuge of self,
Warding off wickedness one is called a brahmin,
one living austerely is said to be an ascetic,
* because of driving forth (all) stain from oneself
Everyone trembles at the stick, everyone is in fear of death,
Everyone trembles at the stick, for all of them life is dear,
One who harms with a stick beings who desire happiness,
One who harms not with a stick beings who desire happiness,
Do not say anything harsh, spoken to they might answer back to you,
If you make no sound like a gong that is broken,
Like a cowherd with a stick drives cattle to pasture,
The fool does not understand the wicked deeds he is doing,
Whoever offends with a stick those who are inoffensive and harmless
harsh feelings, loss (of his wealth), and the break up of the body,
(there may be) danger from the King, or slander that is terrible,
also his houses may be consumed by flames and fire,
Not going naked, nor matted hair, nor mud,
nor fasting or lying on stony ground,
dust and dirt, (or) striving while squatting,
Even if he were to adorn himself,
(but) is peaceful, trained, settled, spiritual,
and has put aside the stick
Whatever person in the world is found restrained by conscience,
Like a good horse restrained by the whip,
you should be ardent and spiritually intense.
Having faith, virtue and energy,
concentration and investigation of the Dhamma.
One who has understanding and good conduct, mindfulness,
Course-makers lead water,
fletchers straighten arrows,
carpenters straighten wood,
Gaining demerit and a bad destiny,
and (only) the small delight of a scared man with a scared woman,
and kings who apply heavy punishment,
* Whoever has laid down the stick (used) against fearful and fearless beings,
Being friendly with the hostile, calm amongst those holding a stick,
For the one who has reached his goal, who grieves not, being released on all sides,
The mindful ones who are striving do not delight in a dwelling,
For those who have no stores,
for those whose resort is the liberation that is empty or signless,
For him whose pollutants are destroyed, who is not dependent on the foods,
for him whose resort is the liberation that is empty or signless,
For the one whose senses are stilled,
like horses well-trained by their charioteer,
who has abandoned conceit, who is without pollutants –
One untroubled just like the earth,
steadfast just like a city-post,
like a lake mud-free –
His mind is calm, his speech and his actions are also calm,
The person who is beyond (mere) faith,
Whether in the village or wilds, whether on low or on high ground,
The delightful wildernesses where the people do not delight,
For the one whose destiny is unknown to gods, gandhabbas and men –
Mind precedes thoughts, mind is their chief, (their quality is)
if with a base mind one speaks or acts,
Mind precedes thoughts, mind is their chief, (their quality is) made by mind,
if with pure mind one speaks or acts,
“He abused me, he struck at me, he overcame me, he robbed me,”
“He abused me, he struck at me, he overcame me, he robbed me,”
For not by hatred do hatreds cease at any time in this place,
The others do not understand that we should restrain ourselves here,
Living contemplating
not knowing the limit in food, indolent, low in energy –
Living contemplating the unpleasant, well-controlled in sense faculties,
and knowing the limit in food, faithful, with energy aroused –
The one who, while still impure, would wear the renunciant’s robe,
The one who, steady in virtue, throws out (any) impurity,
Finding the essential in what is unessential, and seeing the unessential in what is essential,
Knowing the essential in what is essential,
Just as the rain penetrates a house with thatching that is poor,
Just as rain does not penetrate a house with thatching that is good,
Here
the wicked one laments in both places,
he laments, he suffers vexation,
Here he rejoices, after death he rejoices,
the meritorious one rejoices in both places,
he rejoices, he greatly rejoices,
Here he suffers, after death he suffers,
the wicked one suffers in both places,
he suffers, thinking: “I have done wickedness,”
Here she is happy,
the righteous one is happy in both places,
she is happy, thinking: “I have done merit,”
Even though reciting abundant scriptures,
the heedless fellow, who does not do (what they say),
like a cowboy counting other’s cattle,
Even though reciting but few scriptures,
but living righteously in accordance with Dhamma,
abandoning greed, hate and delusion,
understanding aright, with mind well-released,
that one, unattached here and hereafter,
Just like a beautiful flower, which has colour, but lacks fragrance,
Just like a beautiful flower, which has colour, and has fragrance,
Even if a fool attends on a wise man for his whole life long,
If a perceptive man attends on a wise man even for a second,
That deed is not well done, which, having done, one has regret,
But that deed is well done, which, having done, one has no regret,
Should a person do that which is wicked, he should not do it again and again,
If a person should make merit, he should do it again and again,
Even the wicked one experiences good fortune while the wickedness does not ripen,
Even the fortunate one experiences wickedness as long as the good fortune does not ripen,
One should not despise a little wickedness (thinking): it will not come to me,
through the falling of water drops the water-pot is (quickly) filled,
One should not despise a little merit (thinking): it will not come to me,
through the falling of water drops the water-pot is (quickly) filled,
One who harms with a stick beings who desire happiness,
One who harms not with a stick beings who desire happiness,
Finding blame in what is blameless, not seeing blame in what is blameable,
Knowing blame in what is blameable, and no blame in what is blameless,
If you should find a prudent friend
or companion, one who lives well, a wise one,
overcoming all your troubles
If you do not find a prudent friend
or companion, one who lives well, a wise one,
like a king who abandons his conquered kingdom
Restraint of eye is good, restraint of ear is good,
restraint of body is good,
restraint of mind is good, restraint is everywhere good,
One who controls his hands, controls his feet,
controls his speech, controls the (mind) supreme,
with inner delight
That monastic who restrains the mouth, who speaks well, and who is modest,
The one who finds pleasure in the Dhamma, delights in Dhamma, reflects on Dhamma,
One should not despise one’s own gains, one should not live envious of others,
Even if a monastic gains little he should not despise his gains,
The one who does not have fondness at all for mind and body,
That monastic who dwells in loving-kindness, with faith in Buddha’s dispensation,
Please bail out this boat, monastic, when bailed out it will go lightly,
One should cut off five, one should abandon five, one should cultivate five more,
Meditate, monastic, do not be heedless,
do not let your mind swirl around in strands of desire,
do not, heedless, swallow a (hot) iron ball,
There is no concentration for one without wisdom, there is no wisdom for one without concentration,
For the one who has entered an empty place, a monastic with a peaceful mind,
Whoever has right mindfulness regarding the rise and fall of the components (of mind and body)
This is the very beginning for the wise monastic here:
One should resort to spiritual friends, ones of pure life, ones who are diligent,
one should be of friendly disposition, one who will be skilful in his conduct,
Just as striped jasmine casts off its withered flowers,
Calm in body and calm in speech, having calmness and composure,
By oneself one should censure self, by oneself one should be controlled,
Self is the protector of self, self is the refuge
The monastic, having much happiness, with faith in the dispensation of the Buddha,
That young monastic who is devoted to the Buddha’s dispensation,
A monastic delighting in heedfulness, seeing danger in heedlessness,
A monastic who delights in heedfulness, seeing danger in heedlessness,
For the means to gains is one thing, the (path) going to Nibbāna another,
thus knowing this the monastic disciple of the Buddha
Even if he were to adorn himself,
(but) is peaceful, trained, settled, spiritual,
and has put aside the stick towards all beings,
One is not a monastic merely through eating others’ almsfood,
* If he is one who lives the holy life here, warding off both merit and demerit,
Not merely through virtue or vows, or through great learning,
do I attain the happiness of renunciation, not practised by worldly people;
People surrounded by craving
crawl round like a hare in a trap,
therefore he should remove craving –
One should not follow lowly things,
One should strive, not be heedless, one should live by Dhamma, with good conduct,
One should live by Dhamma, with good conduct, not with bad conduct,
One should see it as a bubble, one should see it as a mirage,
Come, look upon this world adorned like a king’s gilded chariot,
Whoever was heedless before, but later is not heedless,
The one whose wicked deed is covered over by a good deed –
This world is blind, few here have true insight,
Geese go through the path of the sky, they go through the firmament by their power,
For the person speaking falsely, who has transgressed in this one thing,
The miserly go not to the world of the gods,
fools surely do not praise giving,
but the wise one rejoices in giving,
Having sole sovereignty over the earth, or going to heaven,
For those who have well developed with right mind the factors of complete awakening,
having given up grasping, those who delight in being unattached,
Whatever the alms or the sacrifice in the world
the one seeking merit may give for a year,
all that comes not to a quarter (of the merit) –
Whatever person in the world is found restrained by conscience,
Just so, when one who has performed merit goes from this world unto the next,
This is something of old, Atula, this is not something of today:
they blame the one who sits silently, they blame the one who talks a lot,
Bad conduct is a woman’s stain, stinginess is a giver’s stain,
Whoever kills a living being, and speaks a word that is not true,
that person who is devoted to a drink of liquor and wine,
* If he is one who lives the holy life here, warding off both merit and demerit,
The seer who rejects wicked deeds through that is (considered) a seer,
Respecting one’s mother is good in the world, also respecting one’s father is good,
That one who is overcome by these low cravings and attachments in the world,
Whoever overcomes this low craving in the world, which is difficult to get past,
Calm in body and calm in speech, having calmness and composure,
That young monastic who is devoted to the Buddha’s dispensation,
* Whoever in the world does not take what is not given, long, short,
For the one who has no longings in this world or in the next world,
Abandoning delight and aversion, cooled off and free from cleaving,
The one who speaks falsely goes to the underworld,
and he who says: ‘I did not do’ what he has done,
both of these are just the same when they have gone
Many wearing the monastic robe around their necks are wicked, unrestrained,
It’s better to have eaten a glowing iron ball, like a flame of fire,
There are four states the man who is heedless,
the man who consorts with other man’s wives, undergoes:
he gains demerit, an uncomfortable bed,
Gaining demerit and a bad destiny,
and (only) the small delight of a scared man with a scared woman,
and kings who apply heavy punishment,
As jagged
Whatever lax deed there is and that vow which is defiled,
If he would do what should be done, he should be firm in his effort,
Better undone is a wrong-doing, a wrong-doing one later regrets,
As a border town is guarded on the inside and the outside,
so one should watch over oneself, and you should not let the moment pass,
They are ashamed of what is not shameful, not ashamed of what is shameful,
Seeing fear in what is not fearful, not seeing fear in what is fearful,
Finding blame in what is blameless, not seeing blame in what is blameable,
Knowing blame in what is blameable, and no blame in what is blameless,
Some are reborn in the womb, (but) those who are wicked in the underworld,
Whoever offends with a stick those who are inoffensive and harmless
harsh feelings, loss (of his wealth), and the break up of the body,
(there may be) danger from the King, or slander that is terrible,
also his houses may be consumed by flames and fire,
Engaging oneself in what is not suitable, not engaging in what is suitable,
Do not associate at any time with those who are loved or with those unloved,
Therefore do not hold (anything) as loved, for losing those who are loved is loathsome.
From love there arises grief, from love there arises fear,
From fondness there arises grief, from fondness there arises fear,
From delight there arises grief, from delight there arises fear,
From desire there arises grief, from desire there arises fear,
From craving there arises grief, from craving there arises fear,
Endowed with virtue and insight, principled, knowing the truths,
The one with desire arisen for the undeclared,
When one who lives abroad for a long time comes safely from afar,
Just so, when one who has performed merit goes from this world unto the next,
One should advise and instruct, and forbid whatever is vile,
Everyone trembles at the stick, for all of them life is dear,
If one regards oneself as dear one should guard oneself right well,
One should abandon anger, one should abandon conceit,
one should overcome every fetter,
without clinging to mind and bodily form,
Whoever should hold back arisen anger just like a swerving chariot,
Through kindness
One should speak out the truth, one should not get angry, when requested give, if only a little,
Those sages without violence, constantly restrained in body,
For those who are always wakeful, who train both by day and by night,
This is something of old, Atula, this is not something of today:
they blame the one who sits silently, they blame the one who talks a lot,
There was not and there will not be, and at present there is not found
The one who, after being examined day by day, is praised by the wise,
one who is like a golden coin, who is there worthy to blame him?
One should guard against bodily anger, one should be restrained bodily,
One should guard against verbal anger, one should be restrained verbally,
One should guard against mental anger, one should be restrained mentally,
The wise are restrained bodily, then they are restrained verbally,
An agitated, unsteady mind, difficult to guard, difficult to ward,
Like a fish thrown up on dry land, pulled out from its watery home,
* For the mind that is difficult to subdue, flighty, flitting wherever it will,
Hard to see, very subtle, flitting wherever it will,
* Those who will restrain the mind that roams far,
For the one with unsettled mind, who does not know the True Dhamma,
For the one with mind free of lust, for the one with mind unperplexed,
Knowing this body is (frail) like a jar,
establishing the mind like a fortress,
fight Māra with the weapon of wisdom,
Before long has passed by, alas, this body will lie on the ground,
Whatever an aggressor might do to an aggressor, or an enemy to an enemy –
Mother and father  might not do for him, or other relatives,
Just as the rain penetrates a house with thatching that is poor,
Just as rain does not penetrate a house with thatching that is good,
One should desire to delight in that place, having given up sense pleasures, and having no possessions,
Hasten to do wholesome deeds, ward off the mind from wickedness,
The non-doing of anything wicked, undertaking of what is good,
Formerly this wandering mind wandered
through desire, pleasure and happiness,
(but) today I will control it wisely,
You should delight in heedfulness, you should always protect your mind,
Meditate, monastic, do not be heedless,
do not let your mind swirl around in strands of desire,
do not, heedless, swallow a (hot) iron ball,
For the one who has entered an empty place, a monastic with a peaceful mind,
Who will know
and the lower realm,
Who (will reflect)
The trainee
and the lower realm, together with the gods.
The trainee (will reflect) on the well-taught verse of Dhamma
Knowing that this body is just like froth,
understanding it has the nature of a mirage,
cutting off Māra’s flower-tipped (arrows),
* Death takes up and carries away the one whose mind is attached to collecting flowers,
* The End-Maker
Just as a bee, without hurting the flower, its colour or scent,
Not the wrongs of others, or what others have done or have not done
Just like a beautiful flower, which has colour, but lacks fragrance,
Just like a beautiful flower, which has colour, and has fragrance,
Just as from a heap of flowers one might make a lot of garlands,
The fragrance of flowers goes not against the wind,
nor does sandalwood or pinwheel or white jasmine,
but the fragrance
Sandalwood, pinwheel, then water lily and striped jasmine,
Pinwheel and sandalwood fragrance are insignificant,
* Māra cannot find the path
Just as in a forsaken and discarded heap along the highway
* so amongst the forsaken, the Perfect Sambuddha’s disciple
Just as striped jasmine casts off its withered flowers,
Strive and cut off the stream, remove desire, brahmin,
When a brahmin has, through two things,
For whom the near shore, the far shore or both do not exist,
The meditator sitting down, the one who is dustless, who has done his duty, without pollutants,
The sun is radiant by day, the moon shines by night,
the accoutred noble is radiant, the meditating brahmin is radiant,
Warding off wickedness one is called a brahmin,
one living austerely is said to be an ascetic,
* because of driving forth (all) stain from oneself
A brahmin should not hit a brahmin, nor should he abandon him,
It is no little good for the brahmin:
when the mind is held back from what is dear,
whenever his mind turns back from violence,
For whom there is no wrong-doing bodily, verbally or mentally,
That one from whom one learned Dhamma taught by the Perfect Sambuddha,
Not because of matted hair, family or birth is one a true brahmin,
Why do you have your hair matted, stupid one, and why your deer-skin?
That one who wears discarded clothes, who is lean
I do not call one a brahmin simply because of being born from a (certain) womb,
that one is just one who says ‘bho’
Whoever has cut off all the fetters surely does not tremble,
(Whoever) has cut off the thong, the strap, the rope, together with the bridle,
Whoever, being pure, forbears with punishment, bondage and abuse,
(Whoever is) controlled of mind, dutiful, virtuous, taint-free,
Like water on the lotus leaf, like a mustard seed on a needle,
Whoever knows right here the destruction of his suffering,
The deeply wise sagacious one, skilled in what is path and not path,
(Whoever) doesn’t mix with either householders or the houseless,
* Whoever has laid down the stick (used) against fearful and fearless beings,
Being friendly with the hostile, calm amongst those holding a stick,
Whoever has dropped off passion and hatred, conceit and anger,
(Whoever) speaks a word of truth that is informed and is not coarse,
* Whoever in the world does not take what is not given, long, short,
For the one who has no longings in this world or in the next world,
For the one who has no desires, who, through knowledge, is without doubt,
Whoever here has overcome clinging to both merit and demerit,
(Whoever) just like the moon is stainless, pure, clear and undisturbed,
He who has crossed the difficult and dangerous path through births and deaths and delusion,
the meditator who has crossed over to the further shore, free of lust and free of doubt,
Whoever, giving up sensual desires, would wander homeless here,
Whoever, giving up craving, would wander homeless here,
Abandoning the human yoke, overcoming the divine yoke,
Abandoning delight and aversion, cooled off and free from cleaving,
Whoever knows in every way beings’ passing and their rebirth,
For the one whose destiny is unknown to gods, gandhabbas and men –
For whom there is nothing in the past, the future or the present,
A noble leader, heroic, a great seer, victorious,
Whoever knows their former lives, and sees heaven and the downfall,
and has attained birth’s destruction, the sage, accomplished in deep knowledge,
Even if he were to adorn himself,
(but) is peaceful, trained, settled, spiritual,
and has put aside the stick towards all beings,
For a human who lives life heedlessly
craving increases like a clinging creeper,
he rushes from one place to another
That one who is overcome by these low cravings and attachments in the world,
Whoever overcomes this low craving in the world, which is difficult to get past,
This I say to you: “Good luck to as many as have assembled here”,
dig up the root of craving, like one seeking the root
Just as when the root remains firm and untroubled
though the tree was cut down, it grows again,
so when the tendency to craving is not rooted out
He in whom the thirty-six streams
Streams are flowing everywhere, the creepers remain where they grow,
* There are flowing streams of affection and
mental happinesses for a person,
pleasure-dependent they seek happiness,
People surrounded by craving
crawl round
attached and clinging to fetters
People surrounded by craving
crawl round like a hare in a trap,
therefore he should remove craving –
The one who is free from desires, who is intent on the forest,
(though) free from the forest, runs back to the forest,
come here and look at that person,
That bondage is not so strong say the wise,
that is made of iron or wood or reeds,
* impassioned and excited they seek out
that bondage is strong say the wise,
dragging down the lax, hard to get free from,
having cut this down they wander about
Those who are impassioned by passion follow the stream
like a spider a web made by itself,
having cut this away the wise proceed,
Be free of the past, be free of the future,
be free of the present, after crossing over (all) existence,
with mind liberated in every way,
For a person crushed by thoughts
and pierced by passion, contemplating the attractive,
craving increases much more,
Whoever has delight in the calming of thoughts,
who always mindfully cultivates what is unattractive,
will surely abolish this (craving),
Having gone to the end, without trembling, without craving, without impurity,
Without craving, without attachment, skilled in words and their explanation,
knowing how syllables are arranged, which come before and which after,
All-Conquering, All-Wise am I,
undefiled regarding all things,
having given up everything, liberated through craving’s destruction,
The gift of the Dhamma surpasses all other gifts,
the taste of the Dhamma surpasses all other tastes,
the love of the Dhamma surpasses all other loves,
Riches destroy the stupid one who does not seek the way beyond,
Fields are ruined by grassy weeds, these people are ruined by passion,
Fields are ruined by grassy weeds, these people are ruined by hatred,
Fields are ruined by grassy weeds, these people are ruined by delusion,
Fields are ruined by grassy weeds, these people are ruined by desire,
Through the round of countless births and deaths I have wandered without finding
O housebuilder, now you are seen! You will not build the house again:
all your rafters have been broken, and the ridgepole has been destroyed,
* For him there is no desire, attachment,
or craving to lead (him) anywhere,
the Buddha, whose range is endless,
From craving there arises grief, from craving there arises fear,
There is no fire that is like passion, there is nothing that takes a hold like hatred,
Whoever, giving up craving, would wander homeless here,
One who would hastily settle a case because of that is not one who stands by Dhamma,
The one who settles for other people without haste, justly and impartially,
One is not a wise person merely because of speaking much;
One is not a Dhamma-bearer merely through speaking much,
but the one who, having heard a little, sees Dhamma for himself,
One is not an elder because one’s head has grey hair,
In whom is truth, Dhamma, non-violence, restraint and (good) training,
Not by eloquence only, or by a beautiful complexion,
for the one in whom this is cut off, destroyed at the root, dug up,
Not through a shaven head is one an ascetic, (if) one lacks vows,
The one who pacifies wicked deeds, small and great, in every way –
One is not a monastic merely through eating others’ almsfood,
* If he is one who lives the holy life here, warding off both merit and demerit,
Not through silence is a deluded fool (considered to be) a seer,
The seer who rejects wicked deeds through that is (considered) a seer,
Not through hurting breathing beings one is noble,
Not merely through virtue or vows, or through great learning,
do I attain the happiness of renunciation,
Endowed with virtue and insight, principled, knowing the truths,
Heedfulness is the deathless state, heedlessness the state of the dead,
The wise, understanding this difference in regard to heedfulness,
Those who meditate all the time, constant and firm in their effort,
For he who is active, mindful,
pure in deeds, considerate,
self-controlled, living by Dhamma,
Through activity, heedfulness, through self-control and through restraint,
The foolish and stupid people cultivate heedlessness,
Do not cultivate heedlessness, do not be acquainted with delight in sensual pleasure,
for the heedful one, meditating, (surely) attains great happiness.
When the wise one eliminates heedlessness with his heedfulness,
and mounts the palace of wisdom, griefless, (he looks) on grieving people;
Heedful amongst the heedless ones, wakeful amongst the ones who sleep,
Through heedfulness Maghavā
A monastic who delights in heedfulness, seeing danger in heedlessness,
A monastic who delights in heedfulness, seeing danger in heedlessness,
You should delight in heedfulness, you should always protect your mind,
There are seven underlying tendencies:
The underlying tendency to sensual desire,
the underlying tendency to repulsion,
the underlying tendency to conceit,
the underlying tendency to wrong views,
the underlying tendency to uncertainty,
the underlying tendency to passion for continuation,
the underlying tendency to ignorance.
Wherein is the underlying tendency to sensual desire?
Herein is the underlying tendency to sensual desire.
Wherein is the underlying tendency to repulsion?
Herein is the underlying tendency to repulsion.
Wherein is the underlying tendency to conceit?
Herein is the underlying tendency to conceit.
Wherein is the underlying tendency to wrong views?
Herein is the underlying tendency to wrong views.
Wherein is the underlying tendency to uncertainty?
Herein is the underlying tendency to uncertainty.
Wherein is the underlying tendency to passion for continuation?
Herein is the underlying tendency to passion for continuation.
Wherein is the underlying tendency to ignorance?
Herein is the underlying tendency to ignorance.
There are, monastics, these four bases of spiritual power, which, when developed and made much of,
lead to going from the near shore to the far shore.
Which four?
Here, monastics, a monastic
cultivates the basis of spiritual power that is concentration of desire accompanied by the volition of striving,
he cultivates the basis of spiritual power that is concentration of energy accompanied by the volition of striving,
he cultivates the basis of spiritual power that is concentration of thought accompanied by the volition of striving,
he cultivates the basis of spiritual power that is concentration of investigation accompanied by the volition of striving.
These, monastics, are these four bases of spiritual power, which, when developed and made much of,
lead to going from the near shore to the far shore.
There are, monastics, these five strengths.
Which five?
The faith strength,
the energy strength,
the mindfulness strength,
the concentration strength,
the wisdom strength.
These, monastics, are the five strengths.
And how, monastics, does a monastic cultivate the five strengths,
make much of the five strengths,
so they tend to Nibbāna, incline to Nibbāna, lead to Nibbāna?
Here, monastics, a monastic cultivates the faith strength,
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment,
cultivates the energy strength,
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment,
cultivates the mindfulness strength,
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment,
cultivates the concentration strength,
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment,
cultivates the wisdom strength,
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment.
Thus, monastics, a monastic cultivates the five strengths,
make much of the five strengths,
so they tend to Nibbāna, incline to Nibbāna, lead to Nibbāna.
There are four factors of a stream-enterer.
Here, venerable friends, a noble disciple is endowed with perfect confidence in the Buddha (thus):
Such is he,
the one endowed with understanding and good conduct, the Happy One, the one who understands the worlds,
the unsurpassed guide for those people who need taming,
the Teacher of gods and men, the Buddha, the Fortunate One.
Here, venerable friends, a noble disciple is endowed with perfect confidence in the Dhamma (thus):
The Dhamma has been well-proclaimed by the Fortunate One,
it is visible, not subject to time, inviting inspection, onward leading,
and can be understood by the wise for themselves.
Here, venerable friends, a noble disciple is endowed with perfect confidence in the community (thus):
The Fortunate One’s community of disciples are good in their practice,
the Fortunate One’s community of disciples are upright in their practice,
the Fortunate One’s community of disciples are systematic in their practice,
the Fortunate One’s community of disciples are correct in their practice,
that is to say, the four pairs of persons, the eight individual persons,
this is the Fortunate One’s community of disciples,
they are worthy of offerings, of hospitality, of gifts, and of reverential salutation,
they are an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
He is endowed with virtue that is agreeable to the noble ones (thus):
it is unbroken,
praised by the wise, unattached to, leading to concentration.
There are, monastics, these four noble truths.
Which four?
The noble truth of suffering,
the noble truth of the arising of suffering,
the noble truth of the cessation of suffering,
the noble truth of the practice leading to the cessation of suffering.
Now what, venerable friends, is the noble truth of suffering?
Birth is suffering,
also old age is suffering,
also sickness is suffering,
also death is suffering,
also grief, lamentation, pain, sorrow, and despair, is suffering,
also not to obtain what one longs for is suffering,
in brief, the five components (of mind and bodily-form) that provide fuel for attachment are suffering.
Now what, venerable friends, is the noble truth of the arising of suffering?
It is that craving which leads to continuation in existence,
which is connected with enjoyment and passion, greatly enjoying this and that, as follows:
Craving for sense pleasures,
craving for continuation,
craving for discontinuation.
This, venerable friends, is called the noble truth of the arising of suffering.
Now what, venerable friends, is the noble truth of the cessation of suffering?
It is the complete fading away and cessation without remainder of that craving –
liberation, letting go, release, and non-adherence.
This, venerable friends, is called the noble truth of the cessation of suffering.
Now what, venerable friends, is the noble truth of the practice leading to the cessation of suffering?
It is this noble path with eight factors, as follows:
Right view,
right thought,
right speech,
right action,
right livelihood,
right endeavour,
right mindfulness,
right concentration.
There are, monastics, these five components (of mind and bodily-form) that provide fuel for attachment.
What five?
The bodily-form component that provides fuel for attachment,
the feelings component that provides fuel for attachment,
the perceptions component that provides fuel for attachment,
the volitions component that provides fuel for attachment,
the consciousness component that provides fuel for attachment.
And what, monastics, is bodily-form?
The four great elementals and bodily-form derived from the great elementals.
This, monastics, is said to be bodily-form.
And what, monastics, are feelings?
There is, monastics, this group of six feelings:
Feeling arising from eye-contact,
feeling arising from ear-contact,
feeling arising from nose-contact,
feeling arising from tongue-contact,
feeling arising from body-contact,
feeling arising from mind-contact.
This, monastics, is said to be feelings.
And what, monastics, are perceptions?
There is, monastics, this group of six perceptions:
The perception of forms,
the perception of sounds,
the perception of smells,
the perception of tastes,
the perception of tangibles,
the perception of thoughts.
This, monastics, is said to be perceptions.
And what, monastics, are volitions?
There is, monastics, this group of six intentions:
An intention based on forms,
an intention based on sounds,
an intention based on smells,
an intention based on tastes,
an intention based on tangibles,
an intention based on thoughts.
This, monastics, is said to be volitions.
And what, monastics, is consciousness?
There is, monastics, this group of six consciousnesses:
Eye-consciousness,
ear-consciousness,
nose-consciousness,
tongue-consciousness,
body-consciousness,
mind-consciousness.
This, monastics, is said to be consciousness.
There are, monastics, for the Realised One these ten strengths of a Realised One,
endowed with these strengths the Realised One claims the place of the leader,
and roars the lion’s roar among the assembly, and sets rolling the supreme wheel.
Which ten?
Here, monastics, the Realised One
knows as it really is the possible as possible, and the impossible as impossible.
Since, monastics, the Realised One
knows as it really is the possible as possible, and the impossible as impossible,
this, monastics, is for the Realised One a strength of a Realised One,
and the Realised One, having this strength, claims the leader’s place,
he roar’s the lion’s roar, and sets the supreme wheel rolling.
Furthermore, monastics, the Realised One
regarding deeds undertaken in the past, future or present,
knows as it really is the result in terms of possibilities and causes...
Furthermore, monastics, the Realised One
knows as it really is the practice leading to all destinations...
Furthermore, monastics, the Realised One
knows as it really is the world’s manifold elements and various elements...
Furthermore, monastics, the Realised One
knows as it really is other beings’ manifold inclinations...
Furthermore, monastics, the Realised One
knows as it really is the disposition of other beings’ and other persons’ faculties...
Furthermore, monastics, the Realised One –
the absorptions, freedoms, concentrations, attainments,
and the rising from and purity in regard to the defilements – knows them as it really is...
Furthermore, monastics, the Realised One
recollects various previous existences, such as:
one life, two lives, three lives, four lives, five lives,
ten lives, twenty lives, thirty lives, forty lives,
fifty lives, a hundred lives, a thousand lives, a hundred thousand lives,
innumerable aeons of devolution, innumerable aeons of evolution, innumerable aeons of devolution and evolution (thus):
in such and such a place I had this name, this family, this class, this food,
this experience of pleasure and pain, this life term;
passing away from there I arose in another state of existence,
and in that place I had this name, this family, this class, this food,
this experience of pleasure and pain, this life term,
and passing away from there I arose here,
and so with their characteristics and with their details he recollects his various previous existences...
Furthermore, monastics, the Realised One
with the divine eye which is purified and surpasses that of (normal) men
sees the passing away and arising of beings,
inferior, superior, beautiful, ugly, in a good destiny, in a bad destiny,
and he knows beings arise according to their (good and bad) actions:
These venerables who are endowed with bad bodily conduct,
endowed with bad verbal conduct, endowed with bad mental conduct,
who blamed the noble ones, were ones of wrong view, and undertook deeds based on wrong view,
at the break-up of the body, after death,
arise in the lower world, in an unhappy destiny, in the fall, in the nether region;
and these venerables who are endowed with good bodily conduct,
endowed with good verbal conduct, endowed with good mental conduct,
who did not blame the noble ones, were ones of right view, and undertook deeds based on right view,
at the break-up of the body, after death,
arise in a good destiny, a heavenly world.
Thus with the divine eye which is purified and surpasses that of (normal) men
he sees the passing away and arising of beings,
inferior, superior, beautiful, ugly, in a good destiny, in a bad destiny,
and he knows beings arise according to their (good and bad) actions...
Furthermore, monastics, the Realised One
through the destruction of the pollutants, without pollutants, freed in mind, freed through wisdom,
dwells having known, having directly experienced, and having attained (Nibbāna) himself in this very life.
Since, monastics, the Realised One
through the destruction of the pollutants, without pollutants, freed in mind, freed through wisdom,
dwells having known, having directly experienced, and having attained (Nibbāna) himself in this very life,
this, monastics, is for the Realised One a strength of a Realised One,
and the Realised One, having this strength, claims the leader’s place,
he roar’s the lion’s roar, and sets the supreme wheel rolling.
There are, monastics, for a Realised One these ten strengths of a Realised One,
endowed with these strengths the Realised One claims the place of the leader,
and roars the lion’s roar among the assembly, and sets rolling the supreme wheel.
The wisdom there is from being attentive, is knowledge from learning,
the wisdom there is from restraint after listening (to Dhamma), is knowledge from virtue,
the wisdom there is from concentrating after restraint, is knowledge from cultivating meditation,
the wisdom there is from acquiring (the right) conditions, is knowledge from (understanding) the relationship of things,
the wisdom there is from defining after abbreviating things in the past, future and present
the wisdom there is through contemplating the changes in presently arisen things
the wisdom there is from contemplating dissolution from reflecting on an object, is knowledge of insight,
the wisdom there is understanding fearful (things), is knowledge of danger,
the wisdom there is from being steady in reflection and desiring freedom, is knowledge of the equanimity of conditions,
the wisdom there is from emerging and turning away from the external, is knowledge of change of lineage,
the wisdom there is from emerging and turning away from both (the internal and the external), is knowledge of the path,
the wisdom there is from the calming of undertakings, is the knowledge of fruition,
the wisdom there is from contemplating the road to cutting off (defilements), is the knowledge of freedom,
the wisdom there is from seeing things that arose at that (time), is the knowledge of reflection,
the wisdom there is from defining the internal (sense-spheres), is the knowledge of various internal (sense-spheres),
the wisdom there is from defining the external (sense-spheres), is the knowledge of various external (sense-spheres),
the wisdom there is from defining conduct, is the knowledge of various conduct,
the wisdom there is from defining the four states (of existence), is the knowledge of various planes (of existence),
the wisdom there is from defining the nine states, is the knowledge of various states,
the wisdom there is from deep knowledge, is the knowledge of the state of being known,
the wisdom there is from full knowledge, is the knowledge of the state of being decided,
the wisdom there is from giving up, is the knowledge of the state of being abandoned,
the wisdom there is from cultivation, is the knowledge of the state of having one taste,
the wisdom there is from realisation, is the knowledge of the state of having contact,
the wisdom there is from various meanings, is the knowledge of the analytic knowledge of meaning,
the wisdom there is from various truths, is the knowledge of the analytical knowledge of truth,
the wisdom there is from various language usages, is the knowledge of the analytical knowledge of language,
the wisdom there is from various inspired speeches, is the knowledge of the analytical knowledge of inspired speech,
the wisdom there is from various dwellings, is the knowledge of the state of having dwellings,
the wisdom there is from various attainments, is the knowledge of the state of attainment,
the wisdom there is from various dwellings in attainments, is the knowledge of the state of dwelling in attainment,
the wisdom there is from cutting off the pollutants with balance and purity,
the wisdom there is from a predominance of insight, the achievement of dwelling in peace, and excellent intent
* the wisdom there is from wielding control by possessing two strengths, three allayments of conditions,
the wisdom there is from completing the round for one with full knowledge, is the knowledge of final emancipation,
the wisdom there is from absence, cessation and the right cutting off of all conditions
the wisdom there is from the finishing of (unwholesome) power, of variety and separation, is the knowledge of the state of being austere,
the wisdom there is from being active, resolute and supportive, is the knowledge of exerting energy,
the wisdom there is from making clear different states, is the knowledge of pointing out their meaning,
the wisdom there is from inclusivity and penetrating unity and variation in all things
the wisdom there is from understanding, is the knowledge of patience,
the wisdom there is from experiencing, is the knowledge of scrutiny,
the wisdom there is from application, is the knowledge of dwelling within limits,
the wisdom there is from predominance, is the knowledge of turning away through perception,
the wisdom there is from variety, is the knowledge of turning away through intention,
the wisdom there is from determination, is the knowledge of turning away through thought,
the wisdom there is from emptiness, is the knowledge of turning away through knowledge,
the wisdom there is from relinquishing, is the knowledge of turning away through freedom,
the wisdom there is from being real, is the knowledge of turning away through truth,
* the wisdom there is from success in defining mind and body,
the wisdom there is from the scrutiny of the signs of unity and variation in sound through the pervasion of thought
* the wisdom there is from the scrutiny of the pervasion of three thoughts through the sensitivity of the faculties,
and unity and variation in conscious conduct
* the wisdom there is from the scrutiny of the rounds of conditioned existence
the wisdom there is from the state of having insight into the signs of variation and unity in forms, through illumination
the wisdom there is from mastery of the three (supermundane) faculties with their sixty-four modes
the wisdom there is from having full knowledge, is the knowledge of suffering,
the wisdom there is from having given up, is the knowledge of arising,
the wisdom there is from having experienced, is the knowledge of cessation,
the wisdom there is from having cultivated, is the knowledge of path,
knowledge of suffering,
knowledge of the arising of suffering,
knowledge of the cessation of suffering
knowledge of the practice leading to the cessation of suffering,
analytic knowledge of meaning,
analytic knowledge of truth,
analytic knowledge of language,
analytic knowledge of inspired speech,
knowledge of the disposition of others’ faculties,
knowledge of the dispositions and underlying tendencies of beings,
knowledge of the twin miracle,
knowledge of the attainment of great kindness,
knowledge of omniscience,
knowledge of unobstructiveness.
These are the seventy-three knowledges.
Of these seventy-three knowledges sixty-seven are common to disciples,
and (the last) six are not common to disciples.
There are eighteen qualities of a Buddha:
There is no wrong bodily conduct for a Realised One,
there is no wrong verbal conduct,
there is no wrong mental conduct,
the Buddha’s knowledge of the past is unobstructed,
the Buddha’s knowledge of the future is unobstructed,
the Buddha’s knowledge of the present is unobstructed,
all the deeds done by way of body do not return to the Buddha, the Fortunate One,
all the deeds done by way of speech do not return to the Buddha, the Fortunate One,
all the deeds done by way of mind do not return to the Buddha, the Fortunate One,
he does not have a loss of (wholesome) desire,
he does not have a loss of energy,
he does not have a loss of mindfulness,
he does not play around,
he does not cry out,
he does not tremble,
he does not use force,
he does not have a worried mind,
he does not have an unwholesome thought.
There are two (aspects of) sense desires:
Sense desire for objects,
and sense desire as defilements.
What is sense desire for objects?
(Desire for) pleasing forms,
pleasing sounds,
pleasing smells,
pleasing tastes,
pleasing tangibles;
spreads, shawls,
male and female servants,
goats, chickens and pigs,
elephants, cows, horses, mares;
fields, lands,
silver, gold,
villages, towns, capital cities, kingdoms, countries,
stores and treasuries,
whatever enticing objects there are, these are the objects of sense desires.
Furthermore, past sense desires, future sense desires, present sense desires;
internal sense desires, external sense desires, internal and external sense desires;
inferior sense desires, middling sense desires, excellent sense desires;
sense desires leading to the downfall, sense desires leading to human state, sense desires leading to the heavenly state, sense desires that are present;
sense desires having signs, sense desires not having signs, sense desires for the signs of others;
sense desires that are possessed, sense desires that are not possessed,
sense desires that are cherished, sense desires that are uncherished;
all things in the sensuous worlds,
all things in the form worlds,
all things in the formless worlds;
objects of craving, grounds of craving,
sense desires that are expected, sense desires that are enticing, sense desires that are intoxicating.
These are said to be the sense desires for objects.
What are sense desires as defilement?
Sense desire as impulse, desire, passions,
sense desire as passionate impulse,
sense desire as thought, sense desire as passion, sense desire as passionate desire.
In sense desires, whatever passionate impulse, passionate desire,
joy in desire, craving in desire,
affectate desire, feverous desire,
infatuated desire, cleaving desire,
flood of desire, yoke of desire,
attachment to desire, the hindrance of passionate impulse...
This is said to be sense desires as defilements.
Purity by way of body is threefold,
purity by way of speech is fourfold,
purity by way of mind is threefold.
What is the purity by way of body which is threefold?
Here, someone, having given up killing living creatures, refrains from killing living creatures.
Having put the stick aside, having put the sword aside, bashful, sympathetic,
he lives compassionate and benefitting all living beings.
Having given up taking what has not been given, he refrains from taking what has not been given.
Whatever wealth and provisions belong to another,
whether in the village, or the wilderness,
he does not steal whatever has not been given.
Having given up sexual misconduct, he refrains from sexual misconduct.
Whatever (women) are protected by mother,
protected by father,
protected by mother and father,
protected by brother,
protected by sister,
protected by relatives,
protected by clan,
protected by Dhamma,
have a husband,
who are wards,
or even one who has been garlanded (in engagement),
not offending against such in practice.
This is the purity by way of body which is threefold.
What is the purity by way of speech which is fourfold?
Here, someone, having given up false speech, refrains from false speech.
If to either a council, an assembly, a gathering of relatives, a gild gathering,
or a royal court he is brought as a witness (and told):
Come friend, what you know, that you speak;
then not knowing he says: I do not know, or knowing he says: I know,
not seeing he says: I did not see, or seeing he says: I saw.
Not for the sake of his self, or for the sake of another or for the sake of a trifling material gain,
does he speak words that amount to false speech.
Having given up malicious speech, he refrains from malicious speech.
Having heard it from here, he does not announce it there in order to break those people up,
or, having heard it from there, he doesn’t announce it here in order to break these people up.
Thus he reconciles, reunites and rejoins those who have been broken up,
delighting in concord, devoted to concord, rejoicing in concord,
he is a speaker of words that bring concord.
Having given up rough speech, he refrains from rough speech.
Whatever words are blameless, pleasing to the ear, loving, heart-endearing,
polite, agreeable to the many-folk, pleasing to the many-folk,
he is a speaker of such words.
Having given up frivolous talk, he refrains from frivolous talk.
He is one who speaks on time, who speaks truthfully, who speaks with meaning, who speaks on Dhamma, who speaks on discipline.
He is a speaker of timely words worthy of recording,
that are reasonable, to the point, and endowed with meaning.
This is the purity by way of speech which is fourfold.
What is the purity by way of mind which is threefold?
Here someone is without avarice.
Whatever wealth and provisions belong to another, he is not avaracious for that, (thinking):
Alas, what is another’s, that (should be) mine.
He is someone with good-will, with intentions that are not corrupt, (thinking):
These beings who are enemies, may they be free from oppression and untroubled,
may they take care of themselves and be happy.
He is someone with right view, who sees correctly, (thinking):
There are gifts,
there are offerings,
there are sacrifices,
there are fruit and result for well-done and badly-done deeds,
there is this world,
there is the next world,
there are (obligations towards) mother,
there are (obligations towards) father,
there are spontaneously born (heavenly) beings,
there are in this world monastics and brahmins who have practiced and attained correctly,
and those who, themselves having directly realised it with their deep knowledge, make known this world and the next world.
This is the purity by way of mind which is threefold.
These are the ten types of wholesome deeds.
He dwells suffusing one direction with a mind full of friendliness,
likewise the second (direction), third (direction) and fourth (direction).
So up and down and across (the middle), everywhere, in every place,
* he dwells suffusing the entire world with a mind full of friendliness,
that is extensive, grown great, immeasurable,
without hatred, without ill-will,
furthermore, he dwells suffusing one direction with a mind full of kindness,
likewise the second (direction), third (direction) and fourth (direction).
So up and down and across (the middle), everywhere, in every place,
* he dwells suffusing the entire world with a mind full of kindness,
that is extensive, grown great, immeasurable,
without hatred, without ill-will,
furthermore, he dwells suffusing one direction with a mind full of gladness,
likewise the second (direction), third (direction) and fourth (direction).
So up and down and across (the middle), everywhere, in every place,
* he dwells suffusing the entire world with a mind full of gladness,
that is extensive, grown great, immeasurable,
without hatred, without ill-will,
furthermore, he dwells suffusing one direction with a mind full of equanimity,
likewise the second (direction), third (direction) and fourth (direction).
So up and down and across (the middle), everywhere, in every place,
* he dwells suffusing the entire world with a mind full of equanimity,
that is extensive, grown great, immeasurable,
without hatred, without ill-will.
There are, monastics, these four confidences of a Realised One,
endowed with these confidences the Realised One claims the place of the leader,
and roars the lion’s roar among the assembly, and sets rolling the supreme wheel.
Which four?
While claiming to be a Perfect Sambuddha these things have not been awakened to:
herein, that an ascetic or a brahmin,
or a god or a māra or a brahmā or anyone in the world,
will reprove me (like this) with truth,
with just cause, monastics, this I do not see,
and not seeing, monastics, this just cause
I dwell having attained safety, having attained fearlessness, having attained confidence,
while claiming to be one with pollutants destroyed these pollutants are not destroyed:
herein, that an ascetic or a brahmin,
or a god or a māra or a brahmā or anyone in the world,
will reprove me (like this) with truth,
with just cause, monastics, this I do not see,
and not seeing, monastics, this just cause
I dwell having attained safety, having attained fearlessness, having attained confidence,
those things called obstacles by you are unable to obstruct whoever practises them:
herein, that an ascetic or a brahmin,
or a god or a māra or a brahmā or anyone in the world,
will reprove me (like this) with truth,
with just cause, monastics, this I do not see,
and not seeing, monastics, this just cause
I dwell having attained safety, having attained fearlessness, having attained confidence,
when the Dhamma is taught with meaning to someone,
it does not lead the one who practices it to the complete destruction of suffering:
herein, that an ascetic or a brahmin,
or a god or a māra or a brahmā or anyone in the world,
will reprove me (like this) with truth,
with just cause, monastics, this I do not see,
and not seeing, monastics, this just cause
I dwell having attained safety, having attained fearlessness, having attained confidence.
There are, monastics, these four confidences of a Realised One,
endowed with these confidences the Realised One claims the place of the leader,
and roars the lion’s roar among the assembly, and sets rolling the supreme wheel.
Here, monastics, a monastic having completely transcended perceptions of form,
with the disappearance of perceptions of (sensory) impact,
not attending to perceptions of variety, (understanding): This is endless space,
abides in the sphere of endless space,
having completely transcended the sphere of endless space, (understanding): This is endless consciousness,
he abides in the sphere of endless consciousness,
having completely transcended the sphere of endless consciousness, (understanding): This is nothing,
he abides in the sphere of nothingness,
having completely transcended the sphere of nothingness,
he abides in the sphere of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
There are, monastics, these four ways of practice.
Which four?
Practice which is painful and slow in knowledge,
practice which is painful and quick in knowledge,
practice which is pleasant and slow in knowledge,
practice which is pleasant and quick in knowledge.
And what, monastics, is the practice which is painful and slow in knowledge?
Here, monastics, one person constitutionally has great passion,
and constantly he experiences pain and sorrow which is born of passion,
he constitutionally has great hatred,
and constantly he experiences pain and sorrow which is born of hatred,
he constitutionally has great delusion,
and constantly he experiences pain and sorrow which is born of delusion.
And for him these five faculties
The faith faculty,
the energy faculty,
the mindfulness faculty,
the concentration faculty,
the wisdom faculty.
Thus these five faculties are feeble
and he is slow in achieving the immediate result of the destruction of the pollutants.
This, monastics, is called the practice which is painful and slow in knowledge.
And what, monastics, is the practice which is painful and quick in knowledge?
Here, monastics, one person constitutionally has great passion,
and constantly he experiences pain and sorrow which is born of passion,
he constitutionally has great hatred,
and constantly he experiences pain and sorrow which is born of hatred,
he constitutionally has great delusion,
and constantly he experiences pain and sorrow which is born of delusion.
And for him these five faculties manifest in excess:
The faith faculty,
the energy faculty,
the mindfulness faculty,
the concentration faculty,
the wisdom faculty.
Thus these five faculties are in high measure
and he is quick in achieving the immediate result of the destruction of the pollutants.
This, monastics, is called the practice which is painful and quick in knowledge.
And what, monastics, is the practice which is pleasant and slow in knowledge?
Here, monastics, one person constitutionally does not have great passion,
and he does not constantly experience pain and sorrow which is born of passion,
he constitutionally does not have great hatred,
and he does not constantly experience pain and sorrow which is born of hatred,
he constitutionally does not have great delusion,
and he does not constantly experience pain and sorrow which is born of delusion.
And for him these five faculties manifest feebly:
The faith faculty,
the energy faculty,
the mindfulness faculty,
the concentration faculty,
the wisdom faculty.
Thus these five faculties are feeble
and he is slow in achieving the immediate result of the destruction of the pollutants.
This, monastics, is called the practice which is pleasant and slow in knowledge.
And what, monastics, is the practice which is pleasant and quick in knowledge?
Here, monastics, one person constitutionally does not have great passion,
and he does not constantly experience pain and sorrow which is born of passion,
he constitutionally does not have great hatred,
and he does not constantly experience pain and sorrow which is born of hatred,
he constitutionally does not have great delusion,
and he does not constantly experience pain and sorrow which is born of delusion.
And for him these five faculties manifest in excess:
The faith faculty,
the energy faculty,
the mindfulness faculty,
the concentration faculty,
the wisdom faculty.
Thus these five faculties are in high measure
and he is quick in achieving the immediate result of the destruction of the pollutants.
This, monastics, is called the practice which is pleasant and quick in knowledge.
These, monastics, are the four ways of practice.
And how, monastics, is mindfulness while breathing developed?
How, when it has been made much of, does it yield great fruit and bring great advantages?
Here, monastics, a monastic who has gone to the wilderness, or to the root of a tree,
or to an empty place, sits down.
After folding his legs crosswise, setting his body straight,
and establishing mindfulness at the front,
ever mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out.
While breathing in long, he knows: I am breathing in long,
while breathing out long, he knows: I am breathing out long,
while breathing in short, he knows: I am breathing in short,
while breathing out short, he knows: I am breathing out short,
he trains like this: Experiencing the whole body I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Experiencing the whole body I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Making the bodily processes calm I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Making the bodily processes calm I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Experiencing joy I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Experiencing joy I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Experiencing pleasure I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Experiencing pleasure I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Experiencing the mental processes I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Experiencing the mental processes I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Making the mental processes calm I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Making the mental processes calm I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Experiencing the mind I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Experiencing the mind I will breathe out,
he trains like this: gladdening the mind I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Gladdening the mind I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Concentrating the mind I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Concentrating the mind I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Freeing the mind I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Freeing the mind I will breathe out.
he trains like this: Contemplating impermanence I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Contemplating impermanence I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Contemplating dispassion I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Contemplating dispassion I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Contemplating cessation I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Contemplating cessation I will breathe out,
he trains like this: Contemplating letting go I will breathe in,
he trains like this: Contemplating letting go I will breathe out.
Like this, monastics, is mindfulness while breathing developed.
Like this, when it has been made much of, it yields great fruit and brings great advantages.
There are four absorptions:
First absorption,
second absorption,
third absorption,
fourth absorption.
Herein what is the first absorption?
Here at whatever time a monastic cultivates the path to rebirth in the form (worlds),
quite secluded from sense desires,
secluded from unwholesome thoughts,
having thinking, reflection, and the happiness and joy born of seclusion,
dwells having attained the first absorption based on the earth-object.
At that time there is absorption with five factors:
Thinking,
reflection
joy,
happiness,
one-pointedness of thought.
This is said to be the first absorption.
(Also) the rest of the thoughts associated with the absorptions.
Herein what is the second absorption?
Here at whatever time a monastic cultivates the path to rebirth in the form (worlds),
with the calming down of thinking and reflection,
with internal clarity, and one-pointedness of mind,
being without thinking, without reflection, having the happiness and joy born of concentration,
he dwells having attained the second absorption based on the earth-object.
At that time there is absorption with three factors:
Joy,
happiness,
one-pointedness of thought.
This is said to be the second absorption.
(Also) the rest of the thoughts associated with the absorptions.
Herein what is the third absorption?
Here at whatever time a monastic cultivates the path to rebirth in the form (worlds),
with the fading away of joy he dwells equanimous,
mindful, fully aware, experiencing happiness through the body,
about which the Noble Ones declare: He dwells pleasantly, mindful, and equanimous,
he dwells having attained the third absorption based on the earth-object.
At that time there is absorption with two factors:
Happiness,
one-pointedness of thought.
This is said to be the third absorption.
(Also) the rest of the thoughts associated with the absorptions.
Herein what is the fourth absorption?
Here at whatever time a monastic cultivates the path to rebirth in the form (worlds),
having abandoned pleasure, abandoned pain,
and with the previous passing away of mental happiness and sorrow,
without pain, without pleasure, and with complete purity of mindfulness owing to equanimity,
he dwells having attained the fourth absorption based on the earth-object.
At that time there is absorption with two factors:
Equanimity,
one-pointedness of thought.
This is said to be the fourth absorption.
(Also) the rest of the thoughts associated with the absorptions.
Root condition,
object condition,
predominance condition,
preceding condition,
prior condition,
arising together condition,
mutually arising condition,
support condition,
strong support condition,
arising before condition,
arising later condition,
habitual condition,
(intentional) deed condition,
result condition,
nutriment condition,
faculty condition,
absorption condition,
path condition,
association condition,
disassociation condition,
presence condition,
absence condition,
disappearance condition,
non-disappearance condition.
Here, monastics, a monastic
regarding bad and unwholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen
generates desire for their non-arising,
(in this regard) he endeavours, instigates energy, exerts his mind, and makes an effort,
regarding bad and unwholesome thoughts that have already arisen
he generates desire for their abandonment,
(in this regard) he endeavours, instigates energy, exerts his mind, and makes an effort,
he generates desire for the arising of wholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen,
(in this regard) he endeavours, instigates energy, exerts his mind, and makes an effort,
* regarding wholesome thoughts that have arisen he generates desire for their endurance, persistence,
multiplication, extension, cultivation, and fulfilment,
What are bad and unwholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen?
The thought of sensual pleasure,
the thought of ill-will,
the thought of harming.
These are bad and unwholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen.
What are bad and unwholesome thoughts that have already arisen?
These are bad and unwholesome thoughts that have already arisen.
What are wholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen?
These are wholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen.
What are wholesome thoughts that have arisen?
These are wholesome thoughts that have arisen.
There are, great king, four analytic knowledges:
The analytic knowledge of meaning,
the analytical knowledge of truth,
the analytical knowledge of language,
the analytical knowledge of inspired speech.
Whoever would ask me a question relating to the analytic knowledge of meaning,
I will speak to him comparing meaning with meaning,
I will speak comparing reason with reason,
I will speak comparing cause with cause,
I will speak comparing method with method,
I will make him be without doubt,
I will separate him from perplexity,
I will satisfy him with an answer to the question.
Whoever would ask me a question relating to the analytic knowledge of the truth,
I will speak to him comparing truth with truth,
I will speak comparing the deathless with the deathless,
I will speak comparing the unconditioned with the unconditioned,
I will speak comparing Nibbāna with Nibbāna,
I will speak comparing emptiness with emptiness,
I will speak comparing the uncaused with the uncaused,
I will speak comparing the desireless with the desireless,
I will speak comparing the lust-free with the lust-free,
I will make him be without doubt,
I will separate him from perplexity,
I will satisfy him with an answer to the question.
Whoever would ask me a question relating to the analytic knowledge of language,
I will speak to him comparing language with language,
I will speak comparing (the opening) line with (the opening) line,
I will speak comparing the following line with the following line,
I will speak comparing letter with letter,
I will speak comparing junction with junction,
I will speak comparing consonant with consonant,
I will speak comparing attribute with attribute,
I will speak comparing sound with sound,
I will speak comparing vowel with vowel,
I will speak comparing designation with designation,
I will speak comparing expression with expression,
I will make him be without doubt,
I will separate him from perplexity,
I will satisfy him with an answer to the question.
Whoever would ask me a question relating to the analytic knowledge of inspired speech,
I will speak to him comparing inspired speech with inspired speech,
I will speak comparing simile with simile,
I will speak comparing mark with mark,
I will speak comparing essence with essence,
I will make him be without doubt,
I will separate him from perplexity,
I will satisfy him with an answer to the question.
Wholesome thoughts,
unwholesome thoughts,
thoughts without consequences.
What are wholesome thoughts?
When at that time a wholesome thought in the sensuous worlds has arisen,
connected with well-being, joined with knowledge,
taking a form as object, or a sound as object,
or a smell as object, or a taste as object,
or a tangible as object, or a thought as object,
or whatever it begins with,
at that time there is contact, there is feeling, there is perception, there is intention, there is thought;
there is thinking, there is reflection,
there is joy, there is happiness, there is one-pointedness of mind;
there is the faith faculty, there is the energy faculty, there is the mindfulness faculty,
there is the concentration faculty, there is the wisdom faculty,
there is the mind faculty, there is the well-being faculty, there is the life faculty;
there is right view, there is right thought, there is right endeavour,
there is right mindfulness, there is right concentration;
there is the faith strength, there is the energy strength,
there is the mindfulness strength, there is the concentration strength, there is the wisdom strength,
there is the conscience strength, there is the shame strength;
there is no greed, there is no hate, there is no delusion;
there is no avarice, there is no ill-will,
there is right view, there is conscience, there is shame;
there is bodily calm, there is mental calm,
there is bodily lightness, there is mental lightness,
there is bodily plasticity, there is mental plasticity,
there is bodily workableness, there is mental workableness,
there is bodily proficiency, there is mental proficiency,
there is bodily uprightness, there is mental uprightness;
there is mindfulness, there is full awareness,
there is calm, there is insight,
there is support, there is balance.
At that time, these or other
formless thoughts are conditionally originated.
These are wholesome thoughts.
What are unwholesome thoughts?
When at that time an unwholesome thought in the sensuous worlds has arisen,
connected with well-being, joined with knowledge,
taking a form as object, or a sound as object,
or a smell as object, or a taste as object,
or a tangible as object, or a thought as object,
or whatever it begins with,
at that time there is contact, there is feeling, there is perception, there is intention, there is thought;
there is thinking, there is reflection,
there is joy, there is happiness, there is one-pointedness of mind;
there is the energy faculty, there is the concentration faculty,
there is the mind faculty, there is the well-being faculty, there is the life faculty;
there is wrong view, there is wrong thought,
there is wrong endeavour, there is wrong concentration;
there is the energy strength, there is the concentration strength,
there is no conscience strength, there is no shame strength;
there is greed, there is delusion, there is avarice, there is wrong view,
there is no conscience, there is no shame,
there is calm, there is support, there is balance.
At that time, these or other
formless thoughts are conditionally originated.
These are unwholesome thoughts.
What are thoughts without consequences?
When at that time in the sensuous worlds a good deed has been done,
has been accumulated, (and) as a result an eye-consciousness has arisen,
connected with equanimity, taking form as object,
at that time there is contact, there is feeling, there is perception, there is intention, there is thought,
there is equanimity, there is one-pointedness of mind,
there is the mind faculty, there is the equanimity faculty, there is the life faculty.
At that time, these or other
formless thoughts are conditionally originated.
These are thoughts without consequences.
There are, monastic, these six elements:
The earth element,
the water element,
the fire element,
the wind element,
the space element,
the consciousness element.
And what, monastic, is the earth element?
The earth element may be internal or may be external.
And what, monastic, is the internal earth element?
Whatever is inside, in oneself,
that is hard or has become solid, and is attached to, like this:
Hairs of the head,
body hairs,
nails,
teeth,
skin,
flesh,
sinews,
bones,
bone-marrow,
kidneys,
heart,
liver,
pleura,
spleen,
lungs,
intestines,
mesentery,
undigested food,
excrement,
or whatever else there is that is inside, in oneself,
that is hard or has become solid, and is attached to,
this, monastic, is said to be the internal earth element.
Now, that which is the internal earth element,
and that which is the external earth element, is only the earth element:
This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it ought to be seen, as it really is, with right wisdom.
Having seen it like this, as it really is, with right wisdom,
one loses interest in the earth element, one detaches the mind from the earth element.
And what, monastic, is the water element?
The water element may be internal or may be external.
And what, monastic, is the internal water element?
Whatever is inside, in oneself,
that is water, or has become watery, and is attached to, like this:
Bile,
phlegm,
pus,
blood,
sweat,
fat,
tears,
grease,
spit,
mucus,
synovial fluid,
urine,
or whatever else there is that is inside, in oneself,
that is water, or has become watery, and is attached to,
that, monastic, is said to be the internal water element.
Now, that which is the internal water element,
and that which is the external water element, is only the water element:
This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it ought to be seen, as it really is, with right wisdom.
Having seen it like this, as it really is, with right wisdom,
one loses interest in the water element, one detaches the mind from the water element.
And what, monastic, is the fire element?
The fire element may be internal or may be external.
And what, monastic, is the internal fire element?
Whatever is inside, in oneself,
that is fire, or has become fiery, and is attached to, like this:
That by which one is heated, by which one grows old, by which one is burned up,
by which what is eaten, drunk, chewed, and tasted, gets completely digested,
or whatever else there is that is inside, in oneself,
that is fire, or has become fiery, and is attached to,
that, monastic, is said to be the internal fire element.
Now, that which is the internal fire element,
and that which is the external fire element, is only the fire element:
This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it ought to be seen, as it really is, with right wisdom.
Having seen it like this, as it really is, with right wisdom,
one loses interest in the fire element, one detaches the mind from the fire element.
And what, monastic, is the wind element?
The wind element may be internal or may be external.
And what, monastic, is the internal wind element?
Whatever is inside, in oneself, that is wind, or has become windy, and is attached to, like this:
Winds that go up, winds that go down, winds in the bowels,
winds in the belly, winds that go through the limbs, in-breath, out-breath,
or whatever else there is that is inside, in oneself,
that is wind, or has become windy, and is attached to,
this, monastic, is said to be the internal wind element.
Now, that which is the internal wind element,
and that which is the external wind element, is only the wind element:
This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it ought to be seen, as it really is, with right wisdom.
Having seen it like this, as it really is, with right wisdom,
one loses interest in the wind element, one detaches the mind from the wind element.
And what, monastic, is the space element?
The space element may be internal or may be external.
And what, monastic, is the internal space element?
Whatever is inside that is space, or has become spacy, and is attached to, like this:
Ear-holes, nose-holes, the door of the mouth,
and that by which what is eaten, drunk, chewed, and tasted is swallowed,
that place where what is eaten, drunk, chewed, and tasted settles,
and the lower part by which that which is eaten, drunk, chewed, and tasted goes out,
or whatever else there is that is inside, in oneself,
that is space, or has become spacy, airy, or has become airy,
open, or has become open, untouched by flesh and blood, and is attached to,
that, monastic, is said to be the internal space element.
Now, that which is the internal space element,
and that which is the external space element, is only the space element:
This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it ought to be seen, as it really is, with right wisdom.
Having seen it like this, as it really is, with right wisdom,
one loses interest in the space element, one detaches the mind from the space element.
Then there remains consciousness, purified and cleansed.
What does one cognise with that consciousness?
One cognises: Pleasant,
one cognises: Pain,
one cognises: Neither-painful-nor-pleasant.
A contact, monastic, that is experienced as pleasant
arises conditioned by pleasant feeling.
Experiencing a pleasant feeling one knows:
I am experiencing a pleasant feeling.
With the cessation of the contact experienced as pleasant,
whatever feeling arising from that, that is to be experienced as pleasant,
the contact arising conditioned by pleasant feeling,
that ceases, that is allayed, that he knows.
A contact, monastic, that is experienced as painful
arises conditioned by painful feeling.
Experiencing a painful feeling one knows:
I am experiencing a painful feeling.
With the cessation of the contact experienced as painful,
whatever feeling arising from that, that is to be experienced as painful,
the contact arising conditioned by painful feeling,
that ceases, that is allayed, that he knows.
A contact, monastic, that is experienced as neither-painful-nor-pleasant
arises conditioned by neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
Experiencing a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling one knows:
I am experiencing a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
With the cessation of the contact experienced as neither-painful-nor-pleasant,
whatever feeling arising from that, that is to be experienced as neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling,
the contact arising conditioned by neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling,
that ceases, that is allayed, that he knows.
Now what, venerable friends, is the noble truth of the practice leading to the end of suffering?
It is this noble path with eight factors, as follows:
Right view,
right thought,
right speech,
right action,
right livelihood,
right endeavour,
right mindfulness,
right concentration.
Now what, venerable friends, is right view?
That, venerable friends, which is knowledge about suffering,
knowledge about the arising of suffering,
knowledge about the cessation of suffering,
knowledge about the practice leading to the cessation of suffering.
This, venerable friends, is called right view.
Now what, venerable friends, is right thought?
The thought of renunciation,
the thought of good-will,
the thought of non-violence.
This, venerable friends, is called right thought.
Now what, venerable friends, is right speech?
Refraining from false speech,
refraining from malicious speech,
refraining from rough speech,
refraining from frivolous talk.
This, venerable friends, is called right speech.
Now what, venerable friends, is right action?
Refraining from killing living creatures,
refraining from taking what has not been given,
refraining from sexual misconduct.
This, venerable friends, is called right action.
Now what, venerable friends, is right livelihood?
Here, venerable friends, a noble disciple, having given up wrong ways of livelihood,
earns his living by a right way of livelihood.
This, venerable friends, is called right livelihood.
Now what, venerable friends, is right endeavour?
* Here, venerable friends, a monastic regarding bad and unwholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen
generates desire for their non-arising,
(in this regard) he endeavours, instigates energy, exerts his mind, and makes an effort,
regarding bad and unwholesome thoughts that have already arisen
he generates desire for their abandonment,
(in this regard) he endeavours, instigates energy, exerts his mind, and makes an effort,
he generates desire for the arising of wholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen,
(in this regard) he endeavours, instigates energy, exerts his mind, and makes an effort,
* regarding wholesome thoughts that have arisen he generates desire for their endurance, persistence,
multiplication, extension, cultivation, and fulfilment,
(in this regard) he endeavours, instigates energy, exerts his mind, and makes an effort.
This, venerable friends, is called right endeavour.
Now what, venerable friends, is right mindfulness?
Here, venerable friends, a monastic dwells contemplating (the nature of) the body in the body,
ardent, fully aware and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
he dwells contemplating (the nature of) feelings in feelings,
ardent, fully aware and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
he dwells contemplating (the nature of) the mind in the mind,
ardent, fully aware and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
he dwells contemplating (the nature of) things in (various) things,
ardent, fully aware and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
This, venerable friends, is called right mindfulness.
Now what, venerable friends, is right concentration?
Here, venerable friends, a monastic, quite secluded from sense desires,
secluded from unwholesome thoughts,
having thinking, reflection, and the joy and happiness born of seclusion,
dwells having attained the first absorption,
with the calming down of thinking and reflection,
with internal clarity, and one-pointedness of mind,
being without thinking, without reflection, having the happiness and joy born of concentration,
he dwells having attained the second absorption,
with the fading away of joy he dwells equanimous,
mindful, fully aware, experiencing happiness through the body,
about which the Noble Ones declare: He dwells pleasantly, mindful, and equanimous,
he dwells having attained the third absorption,
having abandoned pleasure, abandoned pain,
and with the previous passing away of mental happiness and sorrow,
without pain, without pleasure, and with complete purity of mindfulness owing to equanimity,
he dwells having attained the fourth absorption.
This, venerable friends, is called right concentration.
This, venerable friends, is called the noble truth of the practice leading to the cessation of suffering.
Wholesome thoughts,
unwholesome thoughts,
thoughts without consequences;
thoughts connected with pleasant feeling,
thoughts connected with painful feeling,
thoughts connected with neither painful nor pleasant feeling;
thoughts with results,
thoughts that have resultant nature,
thoughts that are neither results nor have resultant nature;
thoughts that are attached to and favourable to the attachments,
thoughts that are not attached to (but) are favourable to the attachments,
thoughts that are not attached to and are not favourable to the attachments;
thoughts that are defiled and connected with the defilements,
thoughts that are not defiled (but) are connected with the defilements,
thoughts that are not defiled and are not connected with the defilements;
thoughts that are with thinking and reflection,
thoughts that are without thinking (but) have reflection alone,
thoughts that are without thinking and without reflection;
thoughts that are united with joy,
thoughts that are united with pleasure,
thoughts that are united with equanimity;
thoughts that are to be given up through vision (of the first path),
thoughts that are to be given up through cultivation (of the rest of the paths),
thoughts that are to be given up neither through vision (of the first path) nor through cultivation (of the rest of the paths);
thoughts that have roots that are to be given up through vision (of the first path),
thoughts that have roots that are to be given up through cultivation (of the rest of the paths),
thoughts that have roots that are neither to be given up through vision (of the first path) nor through cultivation (of the rest of the paths);
thoughts that go towards increase (of rebirths),
thoughts that go towards decrease (of rebirths),
thoughts that go towards neither decrease nor increase (of rebirths);
those in training,
those no longer in training,
those neither in training nor no longer in training;
thoughts that are limited,
thoughts that are very great,
thoughts that are immeasurable;
thoughts that are limited sense-objects,
thoughts that are very great sense-objects,
thoughts that are immeasurable sense-objects;
thoughts that are inferior,
thoughts that are middling,
thoughts that are excellent;
thoughts that are wrongful and have a fixed destiny,
thoughts that are righteous and have a fixed destiny,
thoughts that do not have a fixed destiny;
thoughts that have path as their objects,
thoughts that have path as their roots,
thoughts that have path as their predominant (factor);
thoughts that have arisen,
thoughts that have not arisen,
thoughts that are arising;
thoughts that are past,
thoughts that are future,
thoughts that are present;
thoughts that are past objects,
thoughts that are future objects,
thoughts that are present objects;
thoughts that are his own,
thoughts that are another’s,
thoughts that are his own and another’s;
thoughts that are external objects,
thoughts that are internal and external objects;
thoughts that are visible and have impingement,
thoughts that are not visible and have impingement,
thoughts that are not visible and do not have impingement.
There are, monastics, four cultivations of meditation.
Which four?
There is, monastics, the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to a pleasant abiding here and now,
there is, monastics, the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to the acquisition of knowledge and insight,
there is, monastics, the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to mindfulness and full awareness,
there is, monastics, the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to the destruction of the pollutants.
And what, monastics, is the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to a pleasant abiding here and now?
Here, monastics, a monastic, quite secluded from sense desires,
secluded from unwholesome thoughts,
having thinking, reflection, and the joy and happiness born of seclusion,
dwells having attained the first absorption,
with the calming down of thinking and reflection,
with internal clarity, and one-pointedness of mind,
being without thinking, without reflection, having the happiness and joy born of concentration,
he dwells having attained the second absorption,
with the fading away of joy he dwells equanimous,
mindful, fully aware, experiencing happiness through the body,
about which the Noble Ones declare: He dwells pleasantly, mindful, and equanimous,
he dwells having attained the third absorption,
having abandoned pleasure, abandoned pain,
and with the previous passing away of mental happiness and sorrow,
without pain, without pleasure, and with complete purity of mindfulness owing to equanimity,
he dwells having attained the fourth absorption.
This, monastics, is the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to a pleasant abiding here and now.
And what, monastics, is the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to the acquisition of knowledge and insight?
Here, monastics, a monastic applies his mind to the perception of light,
he determines the perception by day,
as by day, so by night, as by night, so by day.
Thus with an open mind, which is receptive, he cultivates his illumined mind.
This, monastics, is the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to the acquisition of knowledge and insight.
And what, monastics, is the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to mindfulness and full awareness?
Here, monastics, a monastic knows feelings arising,
knows them persisting, knows them vanishing,
he knows perceptions arising,
knows them persisting, knows them vanishing,
he knows thoughts arising,
knows them persisting, knows them vanishing.
This, monastics, is the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to mindfulness and full awareness.
And what, monastics, is the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to the destruction of the pollutants?
Here, monastics, a monastic
dwells contemplating the arising and falling away of the five components that provide fuel for attachment (thus):
This is bodily-form, this is the arising of bodily-form, this is the disappearance of bodily-form;
this is feelings, this is the arising of feelings, this is the disappearance of feelings;
this is perceptions, this is the arising of perceptions, this is the disappearance of perceptions;
this is volitions, this is the arising of volitions, this is the disappearance of volitions;
this is consciousness, this is the arising of consciousness, this is the disappearance of consciousness.
This, monastics, is the cultivation of meditation, which, when developed and made much of,
leads to the destruction of the pollutants.
These, monastics, are the four cultivations of meditation.
There are these ten thoughts, monastics,
that one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on.
What are the ten?
I have become one who has no (distinctive) appearance
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this,
I am bound to others for my livelihood
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this,
I should comport myself differently
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this,
can I myself find no fault with my virtue?
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this,
will my wise companions in the spiritual life, after testing me,
find no fault with my virtue?
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this,
there is alteration in, and separation from, all that is dear and appealing to me
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this,
it is deeds that I own, it is deeds that I am heir to, it is deeds that I am born from,
deeds are my kinsfolk, deeds are my refuge –
whatever deeds I perform, whether good or bad,
to that I will be the heir
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this,
in what way do the nights and days pass for me?
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this,
do I delight in empty places?
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this,
has a state beyond (ordinary) human beings –
the distinction of what is truly noble knowledge and insight – been attained by me?
Will I at the end, when questioned by my companions in the spiritual life,
not be embarrassed?
– one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on this.
These are the ten thoughts, monastics,
that one who has gone forth should frequently reflect on.
Here, monastics, a monastic dwells contemplating (the nature of) the body in the body,
ardent, fully aware and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
he dwells contemplating (the nature of) feelings in feelings,
ardent, fully aware and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
he dwells contemplating (the nature of) the mind in the mind,
ardent, fully aware and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
he dwells contemplating (the nature of) things in (various) things,
ardent, fully aware and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
And how
Here a monastic in regard to himself –
from the sole of the feet upwards, from the hair of the head down, bounded by the skin,
and filled with manifold impurities – reflects (thus):
There are in this body:
Hairs of the head,
body hairs,
nails,
teeth,
skin,
flesh,
sinews,
bones,
bone-marrow,
kidneys,
heart,
liver,
pleura,
spleen,
lungs,
intestines,
mesentery,
undigested food,
excrement,
bile,
phlegm,
pus,
blood,
sweat,
fat,
tears,
grease,
spit,
mucus,
synovial fluid,
urine.
He practices, develops, makes much of that sign, and fixes its definition...
And how does a monastic dwell contemplating (the nature of) the feelings in the feelings in regard to himself?
Here a monastic when experiencing a pleasant feeling
knows: I experience a pleasant feeling;
when experiencing an unpleasant feeling
he knows: I experience an unpleasant feeling;
when experiencing a neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling
he knows: I experience a neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling,
or, when experiencing a sensual pleasant feeling
he knows: I experience a sensual pleasant feeling;
or, when experiencing a spiritual pleasant feeling
he knows: I experience a spiritual pleasant feeling;
or, when experiencing a sensual unpleasant feeling
he knows: I experience a sensual unpleasant feeling;
or, when experiencing a spiritual unpleasant feeling
he knows: I experience a spiritual unpleasant feeling;
or, when experiencing a sensual neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling
he knows: I experience a sensual neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling;
or, when experiencing a spiritual neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling
he knows: I experience a spiritual neither-unpleasant-nor-pleasant feeling.
He practices, develops, makes much of that sign, and fixes its definition...
And how does a monastic dwell contemplating (the nature of) the mind in the mind in regard to himself?
Here a monastic when the mind has passion knows: My mind has passion,
or, when the mind is without passion he knows: My mind is without passion;
or, when the mind has hate he knows: My mind has hate,
or, when the mind is without hate he knows: My mind is without hate;
or, when the mind has delusion he knows: My mind has delusion,
or, when the mind is without delusion he knows: My mind is without delusion;
or, when the mind is collected he knows: My mind is collected,
or, when the mind is scattered he knows: My mind is scattered;
or, when the mind has become very great he knows: My mind has become very great,
or, when the mind has not become very great he knows: My mind has not become very great;
or, when the mind is surpassable he knows: My mind is surpassable,
or, when the mind is unsurpassable he knows: My mind is unsurpassable;
or, when the mind is concentrated he knows: My mind is concentrated,
or, when the mind is not concentrated he knows: My mind is not concentrated;
or, when the mind is liberated he knows: My mind is liberated,
or, when the mind is not liberated he knows: My mind is not liberated.
He practices, develops, makes much of that sign, and fixes its definition...
And how does a monastic dwell contemplating (the nature of) things in (various) things in regard to himself?
And how does a monastic dwell contemplating (the nature of) things in (various) things in regard to himself?
Here a monastic having sensual desire in himself
knows: There is sensual desire in myself;
or, not having sensual desire in himself
he knows: I do not have sensual desire in myself.
How there is an arising of sensual desire that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is an abandonment of sensual desire that has arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is a non-arising of abandoned sensual desire again in the future,
that also he knows.
Having ill-will in himself
he knows: There is ill-will in myself;
or, not having ill-will in himself
he knows: I do not have ill-will in myself.
How there is an arising of ill-will that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is an abandonment of ill-will that has arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is a non-arising of abandoned ill-will again in the future,
that also he knows.
Having sloth and torpor in himself
he knows: There is sloth and torpor in myself;
or, not having sloth and torpor in himself
he knows: I do not have sloth and torpor in myself.
How there is an arising of sloth and torpor that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is an abandonment of sloth and torpor that has arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is a non-arising of abandoned sloth and torpor again in the future,
that also he knows.
Having agitation and worry in himself
he knows: There is agitation and worry in myself;
or, not having agitation and worry in himself
he knows: I do not have agitation and worry in myself.
How there is an arising of agitation and worry that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is an abandonment of agitation and worry that has arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is a non-arising of abandoned agitation and worry again in the future,
that also he knows.
Having doubt in himself
he knows: There is doubt in myself;
or, not having doubt in himself
he knows: I do not have doubt in myself.
How there is an arising of doubt that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is an abandonment of doubt that has arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is a non-arising of abandoned doubt again in the future,
that also he knows.
Having the mindfulness factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: There is the mindfulness factor of complete awakening in myself;
or, not having the mindfulness factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: I do not have the mindfulness factor of complete awakening in myself.
How there is an arising of the mindfulness factor of complete awakening that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is fulfilment of the cultivation of the mindfulness factor of complete awakening that has arisen,
that also he knows.
Having the investigation of the (nature) of things factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: There is the investigation of the (nature) of things factor of complete awakening in myself;
or, not having the investigation of the (nature) of things factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: I do not have the investigation of the (nature) of things factor of complete awakening in myself.
How there is an arising of the investigation of the (nature) of things factor of complete awakening that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is fulfilment of the cultivation of the investigation of the (nature) of things factor of complete awakening that has arisen,
that also he knows.
Having the energy factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: There is the energy factor of complete awakening in myself;
or, not having the energy factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: I do not have the energy factor of complete awakening in myself.
How there is an arising of the energy factor of complete awakening that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is fulfilment of the cultivation of the energy factor of complete awakening that has arisen,
that also he knows.
Having the joy factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: There is the joy factor of complete awakening in myself;
or, not having the joy factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: I do not have the joy factor of complete awakening in myself.
How there is an arising of the joy factor of complete awakening that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is fulfilment of the cultivation of the joy factor of complete awakening that has arisen,
that also he knows.
Having the calmness factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: There is the calmness factor of complete awakening in myself;
or, not having the calmness factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: I do not have the calmness factor of complete awakening in myself.
How there is an arising of the calmness factor of complete awakening that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is fulfilment of the cultivation of the calmness factor of complete awakening that has arisen,
that also he knows.
Having the concentration factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: There is the concentration factor of complete awakening in myself;
or, not having the concentration factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: I do not have the concentration factor of complete awakening in myself.
How there is an arising of the concentration factor of complete awakening that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is fulfilment of the cultivation of the concentration factor of complete awakening that has arisen,
that also he knows.
Having the equanimity factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: There is the equanimity factor of complete awakening in myself;
or, not having the equanimity factor of complete awakening in himself
he knows: I do not have the equanimity factor of complete awakening in myself.
How there is an arising of the equanimity factor of complete awakening that has not arisen,
that he knows;
and how there is fulfilment of the cultivation of the equanimity factor of complete awakening that has arisen,
that also he knows.
He practices, develops, makes much of that sign, and fixes its definition...
(The great man has) fingers without spaces,
graduated fingers,
rounded fingers,
copper-coloured nails,
prominent nails,
glossy nails,
hidden ankles,
even feet,
he proceeds like an elephant,
he proceeds like a lion,
he proceeds like a goose,
he proceeds like a bull,
he has limbs turning to the right,
kneecaps that are charming on all sides,
fullsome genitals,
a navel without defects,
a deep navel,
a navel turning to the right,
beautiful thighs like a plantain,
hands that are shaped like Erāvaṇa’s
graduated limbs,
smooth limbs,
pure limbs,
well-arranged limbs,
every limb is neither too big nor too small,
unsluggish limbs,
limbs free of spots and so on,
graduated, pleasant limbs,
purified limbs,
limbs that have the strength of a million elephants,
a prominent nose,
a well-shaped nose,
red gums,
clean teeth,
very purified sense faculties,
rounded canine teeth,
red lips like fruits,
a long face,
deep lines of the hands,
long lines,
straight lines,
well-shaped, pleasant lines,
a proportionate body,
fullsome cheeks,
long and large eyes,
eyes that are clear in five ways,
eyelashes like reeds,
a soft and thin red tongue,
a long tongue,
long and pleasant ears,
veins that are not varicose,
veins that are not hidden,
a charming head shaped like an umbrella,
a long and broad forehead that is radiant,
well-shaped eyebrows,
black eyebrows,
smooth eyebrows,
regular eyebrows,
large eyebrows,
long eyebrows,
graceful limbs,
extremely bright limbs,
extremely agreeable limbs,
very pure limbs,
soft limbs,
glossy limbs,
a fragrant body,
even body-hairs,
maintaining very fine in- and out-breaths,
a well-shaped mouth,
a pleasant and slender waist,
a fragrant mouth,
a fragrant head,
black hair,
hair turning to the right,
well-shaped hair,
glossy hair,
smooth hair,
untangled hair,
a beautiful, bejewelled halo.
There are, venerable friends, these seven factors of awakening.
Which seven?
The mindfulness factor of complete awakening,
the investigation of (the nature of) things factor of complete awakening,
the energy factor of complete awakening,
the joy factor of complete awakening,
the calmness factor of complete awakening,
the concentration factor of complete awakening,
the equanimity factor of complete awakening.
There are, venerable friends, these seven factors of awakening.
Monastics, a monastic who, at whatever time, dwells contemplating (the nature of) the body in the body,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
at that time has mindfulness established and he is not forgetful,
and monastics, at whatever time
a monastic’s mindfulness is established and he is not forgetful,
at that time the mindfulness factor of complete awakening has been undertaken for that monastic...
Living mindfully in this way he investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
and monastics, at whatever time
a monastic living mindfully in this way investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
at that time the investigation (of the nature) of things factor of complete awakening has been undertaken for that monastic...
For he who is investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
and monastics, at whatever time
for a monastic investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
at that time the energy factor of complete awakening has been undertaken for that monastic...
For he who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
and monastics, at whatever time
for a monastic who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
at that time the joy factor of complete awakening has been undertaken for that monastic...
For one who has a joyful mind the body is calm, and the mind is calm,
and monastics, at whatever time
a monastic has a joyful mind and a body that is calm, and a mind that is calm,
at that time the calmness factor of complete awakening has been undertaken for that monastic...
For one with a calm body and happiness his mind becomes concentrated,
and monastics, at whatever time
a monastic has a calm body and happiness and a mind that becomes concentrated,
at that time the concentration factor of complete awakening has been undertaken for that monastic...
He who has a well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
and monastics, at whatever time
a monastic’s well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
at that time the equanimity factor of complete awakening has been undertaken for that monastic,
at that time that monastic is cultivating the equanimity factor of complete awakening,
at that time that monastic’s equanimity factor of complete awakening
is cultivated and heading towards fulfilment.
Form, monastics, is impermanent,
that which is impermanent is suffering,
that which is suffering is without self.
That which is without self: This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it should be seen with right wisdom as it really is.
Seeing like this with right wisdom as it really is
the mind becomes dispassionate, and liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
Feelings are impermanent,
that which is impermanent is suffering,
that which is suffering is without self.
That which is without self: This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it should be seen with right wisdom as it really is.
Seeing like this with right wisdom as it really is
the mind becomes dispassionate, and liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
Perceptions are impermanent,
that which is impermanent is suffering,
that which is suffering is without self.
That which is without self: This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it should be seen with right wisdom as it really is.
Seeing like this with right wisdom as it really is
the mind becomes dispassionate, and liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
Volitions are impermanent,
that which is impermanent is suffering,
that which is suffering is without self.
That which is without self: This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it should be seen with right wisdom as it really is.
Seeing like this with right wisdom as it really is
the mind becomes dispassionate, and liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
Consciousness is impermanent,
that which is impermanent is suffering,
that which is suffering is without self.
that which is without self: This is not mine, I am not this, this is not my self,
like this it should be seen with right wisdom as it really is.
Seeing like this with right wisdom as it really is
the mind becomes dispassionate, and liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
If, monastics, a monastic’s mind is dispassionate towards the form-element,
it is liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
If, monastics, a monastic’s mind is dispassionate towards the feelings-element,
it is liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
If, monastics, a monastic’s mind is dispassionate towards the perceptions-element,
it is liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
If, monastics, a monastic’s mind is dispassionate towards the volitions-element,
it is liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
If, monastics, a monastic’s mind is dispassionate towards the consciousness-element,
it is liberated from the pollutants without attachment.
In liberation it is steady, in steadiness it is content,
in contentment it is not disturbed, being undisturbed he personally attains Nibbāna.
Destroyed is rebirth,
accomplished is the spiritual life,
done is what ought to be done,
there is no more of this mundane state - this he knows.
When walking ... he steps with the right foot first,
he doesn’t lift the foot too far, or lay it down too near,
he doesn’t walk too quickly, he doesn’t walk too slowly,
he walks without knee knocking on knee,
he walks without ankle knocking on ankle,
he walks without bending the thighs upwards, without bending the thighs downwards,
when walking ... only the lower body moves,
he walks without over-exerting the body,
when looking ahead ... he looks ahead with the whole body (facing), he does not look up, he does not look down,
he does not walk while looking around,
he looks ahead but a yoke’s length, because beyond that his knowledge and insight are unhindered,
when entering between the houses he does so without bending the body upwards, without bending the body downwards,
he doesn’t turn to the seat when too far or too near,
he sits without leaning with his hand on the seat,
he does not throw his body into the seat,
when sitting in the houses he does not exhibit bad conduct with the hands,
he sits without knee knocking on knee,
he sits without ankle knocking on ankle,
he sits without placing his hand on his jaw,
when sitting in the houses he is without fear,
he is without fear, without wavering, without quaking, without trembling, his hair does not stand on end,
when taking water in the bowl he does so without bending the bowl upwards, without bending the bowl downwards,
when taking water in the bowl he takes neither too little, nor too much,
he washes the bowl without knocking it around,
he washes the bowl without rolling it around,
he washes the hands without having placed the bowl on the ground,
the bowl is rinsed when his hands are rinsed, his hands are rinsed when the bowl is rinsed,
he discards the bowl water neither too far nor too near, without throwing it about,
when taking rice in the bowl he does so without bending the bowl upwards, without bending the bowl downwards,
when taking rice in the bowl he takes neither too little, nor too much,
he takes a measure of curry for ... his curry, he does not exceed the morsel (of rice) with (excessive) curry,
he swallows the morsel (of rice) in his mouth, after chewing it over ... two or three times,
no rice enters his body unmasticated,
furthermore he does not take in excess of a morsel,
he takes his food ... experiencing the taste, not experiencing passion for the taste,
endowed with eight factors ... he takes his food:
not for sport,
or for showing off,
not for ornament,
or for adornment,
but only to maintain this body, and to carry on,
to inhibit annoyance,
and to assist in the spiritual life,
thinking: so I will get rid of any old feeling,
and not produce any new feeling,
and I will carry on, being blameless, and living comfortably.
after eating, when taking water in the bowl, he does so without bending the bowl upwards, without bending the bowl downwards,
when taking water in the bowl he takes neither too little, nor too much,
he washes the bowl without knocking it around,
he washes the bowl without rolling it around,
he washes the hands without having placed the bowl on the ground,
the bowl is rinsed when his hands are rinsed, his hands are rinsed when the bowl is rinsed,
he discards the bowl water neither too far nor too near, without throwing it about,
after eating, he places the bowl down on the ground neither too far nor too near,
he is not careless with the bowl, nor is he over-protective of the bowl,
after eating, he sits quietly for a while, but he does not exceed the time for the rejoicing,
after eating, he rejoices, not blaming them for the food,
he surely instructs the assembly with a Dhamma talk,
after instructing the assembly with a Dhamma talk,
he doesn’t leave too quickly, he doesn’t leave too slowly, he doesn’t leave desiring to be free (of them),
he does not hold his ... robe too high on his body, nor too low,
the wind does not drive the robe off ... from his body,
fine dust and dirt do not adhere ... to his body,
he goes to the monastery and sits down on the appointed seat, and while sitting he washes his feet,
after washing his feet, he sits down,
he does not think about harming himself, he does not think about harming others,
he sits down thinking about ... the welfare of himself, the welfare of others, the welfare of both,
he goes to the monastery and teaches Dhamma to the assembly, he does not flatter the assembly,
he surely instructs the assembly with a Dhamma talk,
endowed with eight factors ... the sound goes forth from his mouth:
It is distinct,
intelligible,
sweet,
pleasant,
concise,
undefused,
deep,
melodious,
as far as the assembly extends ... his voice is intelligible,
when they have been instructed with a Dhamma talk by him,
roused, enthused, and cheered, they rise from their seats and go away,
looking only (at him), forsaking (anyone else).
And what, monastics, is conditional origination?
With ignorance as condition, monastics, there are volitions,
with volitions as condition: consciousness,
with consciousness as condition: mind and bodily-form,
with mind and bodily-form as condition: the six sense-spheres,
with the six sense-spheres as condition: contact,
with contact as condition: feeling,
with feeling as condition: craving,
with craving as condition: attachment,
with attachment as condition: continuation,
with continuation as condition: birth,
with birth as condition: old age, death,
grief, lamentation, pain, sorrow, and despair (all) arise,
and so there is an origination of this whole mass of suffering.
And what, monastics, is old-age and death?
For the various beings in the various classes of beings
there is aging, agedness, broken teeth, greying hair, and wrinkled skin;
the dwindling away of the life span, the decay of the sense faculties.
This is called old age.
For the various beings in the various classes of beings
there is a fall, a falling away, a breaking up, a disappearance, a dying, a death, a making of time;
the break up of the components (of mind and bodily-form), the throwing off of the body,
a cutting off of the life-faculty.
This is called death.
This is old-age, and this is death.
This, monastics, is called old-age and death.
And what, monastics, is birth?
For the various beings in the various classes of beings
there is birth, being born, appearing, arising, turning up,
the manifestation of the components (of mind and bodily-form), the acquisition of the sense-spheres.
This, monastics, is called birth.
And what, monastics, is continuation?
There are, monastics, three continuations:
Continuation in the sense worlds,
continuation in the form worlds,
continuation in the formless worlds.
This, monastics, is called continuation.
And what, monastics, is attachment?
There are, monastics, these four attachments:
Attachment to sense pleasures,
attachment to views,
attachment to virtue and practice,
attachment to self-theories.
This, monastics, is called attachment.
And what, monastics, is craving?
There are, monastics, these six cravings:
Craving for forms,
craving for sounds,
craving for smells,
craving for tastes,
craving for tangibles,
craving for thoughts.
This, monastics, is called craving.
And what, monastics, is feeling?
There are, monastics, these six feelings:
Feeling arising from eye-contact,
feeling arising from ear-contact,
feeling arising from nose-contact,
feeling arising from tongue-contact,
feeling arising from body-contact,
feeling arising from mind-contact.
This, monastics, is called feeling.
And what, monastics, is contact?
There is, monastics, a group of these six contacts:
Eye-contact,
ear-contact,
nose-contact,
tongue-contact,
body-contact,
mind-contact.
This, monastics, is called contact.
And what, monastics, are the six sense-spheres?
Eye sense-sphere,
ear sense-sphere,
nose sense-sphere,
tongue sense-sphere,
body sense-sphere,
mind sense-sphere.
This, monastics, is called the six sense-spheres.
And what, monastics, is mind and bodily-form?
Feeling,
perception,
intention,
application of mind.
This is called mind.
This is called bodily-form.
This is mind, and this is bodily-form.
This, monastics, is called mind and bodily-form.
And what, monastics, is consciousness?
There are these six consciousnesses, monastics:
Eye-consciousness,
ear-consciousness,
nose-consciousness,
tongue-consciousness,
body-consciousness,
mind-consciousness.
This, monastics, is called consciousness.
And what, monastics, are volitions?
There are these three volitions, monastics:
Volitions expressed by way of body,
volitions expressed by way of speech,
volitions expressed by way of mind.
These, monastics, are called volitions.
And what, monastics, is ignorance?
Whatever, monastics, is not knowing suffering,
not knowing the origination of suffering,
not knowing the cessation of suffering,
not knowing the path leading to the cessation of suffering.
This, monastics, is called ignorance.
Thus, monastics, with ignorance as condition there are volitions,
with volitions as condition: consciousness,
with consciousness as condition: mind and bodily-form,
with mind and bodily-form as condition: the six sense-spheres,
with the six sense-spheres as condition: contact,
with contact as condition: feeling,
with feeling as condition: craving,
with craving as condition: attachment,
with attachment as condition: continuation,
with continuation as condition: birth,
with birth as condition: old age, death,
grief, lamentation, pain, sorrow, and despair (all) arise,
and so there is an origination of this whole mass of suffering.
But from the complete fading away and cessation of ignorance, there is the cessation of volitions,
from the cessation of volitions, the cessation of consciousness,
from the cessation of consciousness, the cessation of mind and bodily-form,
from the cessation of mind and bodily-form, the cessation of the six sense-spheres,
from the cessation of the six sense-spheres, the cessation of contact,
from the cessation of contact, the cessation of feeling,
from the cessation of feeling, the cessation of craving,
from the cessation of craving, the cessation of attachment,
from the cessation of attachment, the cessation of continuation,
from the cessation of continuation, the cessation of birth,
from the cessation of birth: old age, death,
grief, lamentation, pain, sorrow, and despair (all) cease,
and so there is a cessation of this whole mass of suffering.
The reverend Gotama is endowed with the thirty-two marks of a great man:
He has well placed feet,
this is, for the great man, the venerable Gotama, a mark of a great man,
under the soles of his feet there are wheels,
with a thousand rims and naves, complete in every way...
the heels are long and deep...
the fingers are long...
the hands and feet are soft and tender…
the hands and feet are webbed...
the ankles are high...
the calves are like an antelope’s...
when he stands ... without bending he can rub and stroke both his knees with his hands...
what is covered by a cloth is ensheathed...
he is golden in colour, has skin like gold...
he has fine skin, and because of the fine skin, dust and dirt to not adhere to him...
the body-hairs arise singly, each body hair appearing in its own hair follicle...
the hair bristles, his bristling hair is black,
the colour of collyrium, turning in curls, turning to the right...
the limbs are straight like brahmā’s...
there are seven prominent marks...
the torso is like a lion’s…
between the shoulders it is firm...
the (body) is well-proportioned like a banyan tree,
the extent of the body equals the extent of the arm span,
the extent of the arm span equals the extent of the body...
the upper back is even all round,
the taste buds are supremely sensitive...
the jaw is like a lion’s...
there are forty teeth...
the teeth are even...
the teeth are without gaps...
the teeth are very white...
the tongue is very large...
the voice is like brahmā’s or like the sound of the cuckoo...
the eyes are very dark...
the eyelashes are like a cow’s...
the tuft of hair between the eyebrows on his forehead is very white like cotton...
there is a protuberance on the head,
this is, for the great man, the venerable Gotama, a mark of a great man.
There are, monastics, these five faculties.
Which five?
The faith faculty,
the energy faculty,
the mindfulness faculty,
the concentration faculty,
the wisdom faculty.
And what, monastics, is the faith faculty?
Here, monastics, a noble disciple is faithful,
he has faith in the Realised One’s Awakening (thus):
Such is he, the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha,
the one endowed with understanding and good conduct, the Happy One, the one who understands the worlds,
the unsurpassed guide for those people who need taming,
the Teacher of gods and men, the Buddha, the Fortunate One.
This, monastics, is called the faith faculty.
And what, monastics, is the energy faculty?
Here, monastics, a noble disciple lives with energy aroused
for the giving up of unwholesome thoughts,
for the establishment of wholesome thoughts,
being firm, making strong endeavour, and having persistence in regard to wholesome thoughts.
This, monastics, is called the energy faculty.
And what, monastics, is called the mindfulness faculty?
Here, monastics, a noble disciple is mindful,
endowed with superior mindfulness and carefulness,
remembering and recalling what was done a long time ago and what was said a long time ago.
This, monastics, is called the mindfulness faculty.
And what, monastics, is called the concentration faculty?
Here, monastics, a noble disciple having relinquished sense objects,
attains concentration, attains one-pointedness of mind.
This, monastics, is called the concentration faculty.
And what, monastics, is called the wisdom faculty?
Here, monastics, a noble disciple is wise,
endowed with wisdom concerning rise and fall,
having noble penetration into the right way leading to the destruction of suffering.
This, monastics, is called the wisdom faculty.
These, monastics, are the five faculties.
There are six designations:
The designation of the components,
the designation of the sense-spheres,
the designation of the elements,
the designation of the truths,
the designation of the faculties,
the designation of the persons.
In what way is there a designation of the components regarding components?
So far as there are these five components:
The bodily-form component,
the feelings component,
the perceptions component,
the volitions component,
the consciousness component,
thus far there is a designation of the components regarding components.
In what way is there designation of the sense-spheres regarding the sense-spheres?
So far as there are these twelve sense-spheres:
The eye sense-sphere,
the visible-form sense-sphere,
the ear sense-sphere,
the sound sense-sphere,
the nose sense-sphere,
the smell sense-sphere,
the tongue sense-sphere,
the taste sense-sphere,
the body sense-sphere,
the taste sense-sphere,
the mind sense-sphere,
the thoughts sense-sphere,
thus far there is a designation of the sense-spheres regarding the sense-spheres.
In what way is there designation of the elements regarding the elements?
So far as there are these eighteen elements:
The eye element,
the visible-form element,
the eye-consciousness element;
the ear element,
the sound element,
the ear-consciousness element;
the nose element,
the smell element,
the nose-consciousness element;
the tongue element,
the taste element,
the tongue-consciousness element;
the body element,
the tangible element,
the body-consciousness element;
the mind element,
the thought element,
the mind-consciousness element,
thus far there is a designation of the elements regarding the elements.
In what way is there designation of the truths regarding the truths?
So far as there are these four truths:
The truth of suffering,
the truth of arising,
the truth of cessation,
the truth of the path,
thus far there is a designation of the truths regarding the truths.
In what way is there designation of the faculties regarding the faculties?
So far as there are these twenty-two faculties:
The eye faculty,
the ear faculty,
the nose faculty,
the tongue faculty,
the body faculty,
the mind faculty;
the female faculty,
the male faculty,
the life faculty;
the pleasure faculty,
the pain faculty,
the well-being faculty,
the sorrow faculty,
the equanimity faculty;
the faith faculty,
the energy faculty,
the mindfulness faculty,
the concentration faculty,
the wisdom faculty;
the ‘I-will-know-the-unknown’ faculty,
the understanding faculty,
the complete understanding faculty,
thus far there is a designation of the faculties regarding the faculties.
In what way is there a designation of the person regarding persons?
One free occasionally,
one free always,
one unsteady,
one steady,
one liable to fall,
one not liable to fall,
one able in intention,
one able in guarding,
the worldling,
the lineage-holder,
one abstaining through fear,
one not abstaining through fear,
one able to arrive,
one unable to arrive,
one determined,
one undetermined,
one path-attained,
one established in fruition,
the equal-headed,
one who steadies the aeon,
the noble one,
the ignoble one,
the trainee,
the one beyond training,
the one neither in training nor beyond training,
the three knowledges,
the six deep knowledges,
the Perfect Sambuddha,
the Independent Sambuddha
the one liberated in both ways,
the one liberated through wisdom,
the body-witness,
the one attained to (right) view,
the one liberated through faith,
the one who follows Dhamma,
the one who follows faith,
the one (who returns) seven times at most,
the one who goes from one good family to another good family,
the single-seeded,
the once-returner,
the non-returner,
the one who attains Nibbāna before the middle (of the aeon),
the one who attains Nibbāna at the end (of the aeon),
the one who attains Nibbāna without (difficult) conditions,
the one who attains Nibbāna with (difficult) conditions,
one who goes upstream to the highest (divinities),
the stream-enterer,
the one on the path to experiencing the fruit of stream-entry,
the once-returner,
the one on the path to experiencing the fruit of once-returning,
the non-returner,
the one on the path to experiencing the fruit of non-returning,
the Worthy One,
the one on the path to Worthiness.
At the time of the Parinibbāna (which Buddha attained) at Kusinārā, best of towns, seven hundred thousand (spiritual) sons of the Jina assembled.
In this assembly Thera Kassapa was chief, be who resembled the Teacher, a great leader; on earth [there] is not his equal.
Kassapa, after having selected five hundred amongst the Arahats, taking always the most worthy ones, composed the collection of the Dhamma.
Out of compassion for created beings, in order to establish the Faith for a long time, he made, after the lapse of three months, when the fourth month and the second beginning of the Vassa  had arrived, the collection of the Dhamma.
At the entrance of the Sattapaṇṇa cave, in the Magadha town Giribbaja (Rājagaha), this first council was finished after seven months.
At this council many Bhikkhus (were present), the original depositaries (of the Faith), and who had all reached perfection in the doctrine of the protector of the world.
Kassapa was the chief propounder of the Dhutavāda precepts according to the doctrine of the Jina; Ānanda was the first of those learned (in the Suttas), (the Thera) called Upāli was chief in the Vinaya, –
Anuruddha in the supernatural visions, Vaṅgīsa in promptly comprehending, Puṇṇa among the preachers of the Dhamma, Kumārakassapa among the students of various tales, –
Kaccāna in establishing distinctions, Koṭṭhita in analytical knowledge. There were, besides, many other  great Theras who were original depositaries (of the Faith).
By these and other saintly Theras who had fulfilled their duties, to the number of five hundred, was the collection of the Dhamma and of the Vinaya made; because it was collected by the Theras, it is called the doctrine of the Theras (theravāda).
They composed the collection of the Dhamma and of the whole Vinaya by consulting Upāli about the Vinaya and learned Ānanda about the Dhamma.
Both these, Thera Upāli and Ānanda who had obtained perfection in the true Doctrine, had learned the Dhamma and Vinaya from the Jina; and, clever in the Suttas, they proclaimed what had been taught in long expositions and also without exposition, the natural meaning as well as the recondite meaning.
Having received the perfect word (of Buddha), the first (among doctrines), from the first (among teachers), these Theras and original depositaries (of the Faith) made the first collection. Hence this doctrine of the Theras is also called the first (or primitive) doctrine.
The most excellent Theravāda remained pure and faultless for a long time, for ten times ten years.
When the first hundred years had been completed and the second century had begun, a great schism happened, a most violent one, in the doctrine of the Theras.
Twelve thousand Vajjiputtas of Vesālī assembled and proclaimed at Vesālī, best of towns, the ten indulgences in the doctrine of Buddha, viz.: the indulgence of (keeping) salt in a horn, of the two inches, of the village and the monastery, of residences, of (obtaining) consent, of example, of milk-whey, of toddy, of silver, of seats without fringes.
They proclaimed (a doctrine) which was against the Faith, against the discipline, and repugnant to the doctrine of the Teacher; splitting the (true) meaning and the Faith, they proclaimed what was contrary to it.
In order to subdue them, many pupils of Buddha, twelve hundred thousand (spiritual) sons of the Jina, assembled.
In this congregation the eight chief Bhikkhus, resembling the Master, great leaders, difficult  to conquer, great teachers, were –
Sabbakāmī and Sāḷha, Revata, Khujjasobhita, Vāsabhagāmi and Sumana, Sambhūta who resided at Sāṇa, –
Yasa, the son of Kākaṇḍaka, a sage praised by the Jina. In order to subdue those wicked men (the Vajjiputtas), they came to Vesālī.
Vāsabhagāmi and Sumana were pupils of Anuruddha, the other Theras (pupils) of Ānanda; they had all formerly seen Tathāgata.
At that time Asoka, the son of Susunāga, was king; that prince ruled in the town of Pāṭaliputta.
The eight Theras of great (supernatural) power gained one party for themselves, and destroying (the doctrine of) the ten indulgences they annihilated those wicked ones.
After having annihilated the wicked Bhikkhus and after having crushed the sinful doctrine, those eight Theras of great (supernatural) power, those Bhikkhus selected seven hundred Arahats, choosing the best ones, in order to purify their own doctrine, and held a council.
This second council was finished in eight months at Vesālī, best of towns, in the hall called Kūṭāgāra.
The wicked Bhikkhus, the Vajjiputtakas who had been excommunicated by the Theras, gained another party; and many people, holding the wrong doctrine, ten thousand, assembled and (also) held a council. Therefore this Dhamma council is called the Great Council (mahāsaṅgīti).
The Bhikkhus of the Great Council settled a doctrine contrary (to the true Faith). Altering the original redaction they made another redaction.
They transposed Suttas which belonged to one place (of the collection), to another place; they destroyed the (true) meaning and the Faith, in the Vinaya and in the five Collections (of Suttas).
Those Bhikkhus, who understood neither what had been taught in long expositions nor without exposition, neither the natural meaning nor the recondite meaning, settled a false meaning in connection with spurious speeches of Buddha; these Bhikkhus destroyed a great deal of (true) meaning under the colour  of the letter.
Rejecting single passages of the Suttas and of the profound Vinaya, they composed other Suttas and another Vinaya which had (only) the appearance (of the genuine ones).
Rejecting the following texts, viz.: the Parivāra which is an abstract of the contents (of the Vinaya), the six sections of the Abhidhamma, the Paṭisambhidā, the Niddesa, and some portions of the Jātaka, they composed new ones.
Forsaking the original rules regarding nouns, genders, composition, and the embellishments of style, they changed all that.
Those who held the Great Council were the first schismatics; in imitation of them many heretics arose.
Afterwards a schism occurred in that (new school); the Gokulika and Ekabyohāra Bhikkhus formed two divisions.
Afterwards two schisms took place amongst the Gokulikas: the Bahussutaka and the Paññatti Bhikkhus formed two divisions.
And opposing these were the Cetiyas, (another) division of the Mahāsaṅgītikas. All these five sects, originating from the Mahāsaṅgītikas, split the (true) meaning and the Doctrine and some portions of the Collection; setting aside some portions of difficult passages, they altered them.
Forsaking the original rules regarding nouns, genders, composition, and the embellishments of style, they changed all that.
In the orthodox school of the Theras again a schism occurred: the Mahiṁsāsaka and Vajjiputtaka Bhikkhus formed two sections.
In the school of the Vajjiputtakas four sections arose, viz.: the Dhammuttarikas, Bhaddayānikas, Channagārikas, and Sammitis.
In later times two divisions arose among the Mahiṁsāsakas: the Sabbatthivāda and Dhammagutta Bhikkhus formed two divisions.
The Sabbatthivādas and Kassapikas, the Kassapikas and Saṅkantikas, and subsequently another section, the Suttavādas, separated themselves in their turn.
These eleven schools which separated themselves from the Theravāda, split the (true) meaning and the Doctrine and some portions of the Collection; setting aside some portions of difficult passages, they altered them.
Forsaking  the original rules regarding nouns, genders, composition, and the embellishments of style, they changed all that.
Seventeen are the heretical sects, and there is one orthodox sect; together with the orthodox sect they are eighteen at all.
The most excellent Theravāda which resembles a large banyan tree, is the complete doctrine of the Jina, free from omissions or additions. The other schools arose as thorns grow on the tree.
In the first century there were no schisms; in the second century arose the seventeen heretical schools in the religion of the Jina.
The Hemavatikas, Rājagirikas, Siddhatthas, Pubba- and Aparaselikas, and sixthly the Apara-Rājagirikas arose one after the other.
“In the future time, after a hundred and eighteen years, a certain Bhikkhu will arise, a Samaṇa able (to suppress the schisms of that time).
Descending from Brahma’s world he will be born in the human race, originating from a Brāhmaṇa tribe, an accomplished master of all Mantras (Vedas).
His name will be Tissa, his surname Moggaliputta; Siggava and Candavajjī  will confer on the youth the Pabbajjā ordination.
Then, having received the Pabbajjā ordination and attained the knowledge of the sacred texts, Tissa will destroy the Titthiya doctrines and establish the (true) faith.
A royal chief called Asoka will govern at that time in Pāṭaliputta, a righteous prince, an increaser of the empire.”
All the seven hundred Bhikkhus, the Theras, having taught the (true) doctrine and destroyed (the heresy of) the ten indulgences, had attained Parinibbāna.
Descending  from Brahma’s world he was born in the human race; at the age of sixteen he had mastered the whole Veda.
(Once young Tissa thus addressed the Thera Siggava, who had come to his father’s house:) “I ask the Samaṇa a question, answer these questions (concerning) the Rigveda, the Yajurveda, the Sāmaveda and also the Nighaṇṭu, and fifthly the Itihāsa”; –
and the Thera having given his permission, he asked an exceedingly difficult question. Siggava then spoke to the youth possessed of mature knowledge:
“I also will ask you, young man, a question set forth by the Buddha; if you are clever, answer my question truly.”
When the question had been pronounced, (Tissa said:) “That I have neither seen nor heard; I will learn this Mantra, I desire to receive the Pabbajjā ordination.”
Leaving the narrow way of the life of a layman, the youth went forth into the houseless state and to the condition of calm, according to the Jina’s faith.
The disciple, desirous of learning and full of reverence, was taught the nine-fold doctrine of the Teacher by learned Candavajjī.
Siggava who had vanquished the young man, conferred on him the Pabbajjā ordination; learned Candavajjī taught the well trained (disciple), versed in the Vedas, the nine-fold (doctrine); (having done so,) these Theras attained Parinibbāna.
 Two years of Candagutta, fifty-eight of king Pakuṇḍaka having elapsed, Siggava having just completed his sixty-fourth year, Moggaliputta received from Thera Siggava the Upasampadā ordination.
Tissa Moggaliputta, having learned the Vinaya from Candavajjī, reached emancipation by the destruction of the substrata (of existence).
Siggava and Candavajjī taught the glorious Moggaliputta all the Piṭakas which are filled with collections referring to both (Bhikkhus and Bhikkhunis) (or:  the Sutta collection, as it bad been settled at the two convocations?).
Siggava, possessed of (true) knowledge, made the glorious Moggaliputta chief of the Vinaya, and attained Nibbāna after having completed seventy-six years.
Candagutta ruled twenty-four years; when he had completed fourteen years, Siggava attained Parinibbāna.
(Siggava was) a dweller in the forest, keeping the Dhutaṅga precepts, of limited desires, attached to forest life, full of goodwill, of subdued passions, and perfect in the true Doctrine.
In a remote, delightful abode, in the depth of a great forest, this hero (lived) alone without a companion, like a valiant lion in his mountain cave.
Sixteen years had elapsed after the protector of the world had attained Nibbāna, learned Upāli had completed sixty years; –
it was the twenty-fourth year of Ajātasattu’s (reign) and the sixteenth of Vijaya’s, (when) Dāsaka received the Upasampadā ordination from Thera Upāli.
The learned (Thera) called Dāsaka had completed forty years; ten years of Nāgadasa’s (reign) and twenty of Pakuṇḍaka’s (Paṇḍuvāsa’s!) had elapsed, –
(when) Thera Sonaka received the Upasampadā from Dāsaka. The wise Thera called Sonaka had completed forty years; –
ten years of Kālāsoka’s (reign) had elapsed; it was in the eleventh year of the interregnum in Tambapaṇṇi, (when) Siggava received the Upasampadā ordination from Thera Sonaka.
Two years of Candagutta’s (reign) had elapsed; Siggava had completed sixty-four, and king Pakuṇḍaka fifty-eight years, (when) Moggaliputta received the Upasampadā ordination from Thera Siggava.
Six years of Asokadhamma’s (reign), sixty-six of Moggaliputta, forty-eight (years) of king Muṭasīva had elapsed, (when) Mahinda received the Upasampadā ordination from Moggaliputta.
Upāli received the Vinaya from Buddha, Dāsaka received the whole Vinaya from Thera Upāli and taught it just as his teacher in the Faith (had done).
Thera Dāsaka taught Sonaka also the Vinaya; (Sonaka) taught it,  after having learnt it from his teacher.
Wise Sonaka who well knew the Dhamma and the Vinaya, in his turn taught Siggava the whole Vinaya.
The pupils of Sonaka were Siggava and Candavajjī; the Thera taught both these pupils the Vinaya.
Tissa Moggaliputta, having learnt the Vinaya from Candavajjī, reached emancipation by the destruction of the substrata (of existence).
Teacher Moggaliputta taught his pupil Mahinda the whole Vinaya, the complete doctrine of the Theras.
After the Sambuddha had attained Parinibbāna, resplendent Thera Upāli taught the Vinaya full thirty years.
This great Sage, after having made his pupil, the learned Thera called Dāsaka, chief of the Vinaya, attained Nibbāna.
Dāsaka in his turn made his pupil Thera Sonaka chief of the Vinaya, and attained Nibbāna sixty-four years (after his Upasampadā).
Sonaka who possessed the six supernatural faculties, after having made Siggava, the descendant of an Arya family, chief of the Vinaya, attained Nibbāna sixty-six years (after his Upasampadā).
Wise Siggava made young Moggaliputta chief of the Vinaya and attained Nibbāna seventy-six years (after his Upasampadā).
Tissa Moggaliputta made his pupil Mahinda chief of the Vinaya and attained Nibbāna eighty-six years (after his Upasampadā).
Seventy-four years of Upāli, sixty-four of Dāsaka, sixty-six of Thera Sonaka, seventy-six of Siggava, eighty of Moggaliputta: this is the Upasampadā of them all (i.e. the number of years which elapsed between their Upasampadā and their death).
Learned Upāli was the whole time chief of the Vinaya, Thera Dāsaka fifty years, Sonaka fourty-four years, Siggava fifty-five years, the (Thera) called Moggaliputta sixty-eight years.
Prince Udaya reigned sixteen years; when six years of Udayabhadda’s reign had elapsed, Thera Upāli attained Nibbāna.
The ruler Susunāga reigned ten years; after eight years of Susunāga’s reign Dāsaka attained Parinibbāna.
After Susunāga’s (Kālāsoka’s!)  death the ten brothers succeeded; they reigned all jointly twenty-two years. In the sixth year of their reign Sonaka attained Parinibbāna.
Candagutta reigned twenty-four years; after fourteen years of his reign Siggava attained Parinibbāna.
The son of Bindusāra, illustrious prince Asokadhamma, reigned thirty-seven years.
When twenty-six years of Asoka’s reign had elapsed, the (Thera) called Moggaliputta, after having exalted the splendour of the Religion, attained the end of his life and reached Nibbāna.
Learned Thera Upāli, a great teacher, attained Nibbāna seventy-four years (after his Upasampadā), after having made his pupil, the learned Thera Dāsaka, chief of the Vinaya.
Dāsaka attained Nibbāna sixty-four years (after his Upasampadā), after having in his turn made his pupil, Thera Sonaka, chief of the Vinaya.
Sonaka who possessed the six (supernatural) faculties, attained Parinibbāna sixty-six years (after his Upasampadā), after having made Siggava, the descendant of an Arya family, chief of the Vinaya.
Wise Siggava attained Nibbāna seventy-six years (after his Upasampadā), after having made young Moggaliputta chief of the Vinaya.
Tissa Moggaliputta attained Nibbāna eighty years (after his Upasampadā), after having made his pupil Mahinda chief of the Vinaya.
King Vasabha constructed in the Cetiyapabbata monastery ten Thūpas, a most glorious deed by which high reward is to be gained.
In the Issariya Ārāma he constructed a delightful Vihāra (and) a pleasing and delightful Uposatha hall.
He also ordered a large kettle-drum to be made for the most excellent Mucela monastery. Every three years he gave six robes (to each monk).
Throughout the whole of Laṅkādīpa he repaired dilapidated Ārāmas. Everywhere he constructed residences and made most precious offerings to the pious (Bhikkhus).
In the most excellent Thūpārāma he constructed a relic-chamber; full forty-four times the king held (Vesākha) festivals.
In the Mahāvihāra, in the Thūpārāma, and in Cetiyapabbata monastery, at each of these places he ordered a thousand oil-lamps to be lit.
The eleven tanks (formed by this king were) the Mayanti, the Rājuppala tank, the Vaha, Kolamba, Mahānikkhavaṭṭi tank and also the Mahārametti,  the Kehāla and Kāli tanks, the Jambuṭi, Cāthamaṅgana, and Abhivaḍḍhamānaka tanks.
He also constructed twelve irrigation canals in order to augment the fertility (of the land). Various meritorious acts he did; he made a wall and a ditch around the town with towers at the gates, and a great palace. He ordered lotus-ponds to be dug at different places in the town, the capital.
The most eminent king conducted water by means of an underground aqueduct (to those ponds). This ruler governed forty-four years.
The son of Vasabha, known as Tissa, the royal lord, ordered the Ārāma called Maṅgala to be constructed. He reigned straightway (after his father’s death) three years over the Island.
Tissa’s son, Gajābāhukagāmani, caused a great Thūpa to be built in the delightful Abhayārāma.
This royal chief constructed the pond called Gāmani, according to the wishes of his mother; this lord (also) ordered the Ārāma called Rammaka to be built. He ruled twenty-two years over the Island.
The ruler of Tambapaṇṇi called king Mahallanāga caused the Sajīlakandakārāma,  the Goṭapabbata in the south, the Dakapāsāna Ārāma, the Sālipabbata Vihāra, the Tanaveli (Vihāra), and in Rohana the Nāgapabbata (Vihāra) and the Girisālika Ārāma to be constructed. Having reigned six years he reached the end of his life and died.
The son of Mahallanāga, known by the name of Bhātutissa, caused for the sake of (re-)establishing the Mahāmeghavana garden, a wall fence with towers at the gates to be constructed (around it); this king also founded the Vara-Ārāma  (Gavara-Ārāma?).
Having caused the pond called Gāmani to be dug, Bhātutissa, the lord (of the Island), gave it to the Bhikkhu fraternity.
He (also) ordered the pond called Randhakaṇḍaka to be dug. In the delightful Thūpārāma he constructed an Uposatha hall.
This king bestowed a great donation on the Bhikkhu fraternity. He reigned twenty-four years over the Island.
His younger brother, well known by the name of Tissa, erected an Uposatha hall in the delightful Abhayārāma.
He constructed twelve edifices within (the limits of) the most excellent Mahāvihāra. In the Dakkhiṇārāma he built a Vihāra and a Thūpa.
Many other meritorious acts he did in honour of the blessed religion of the Buddha. He reigned eighteen years.
The sons of Tissa’s own body, two brothers worthy of royal dignity, reigned as rulers three years over the Island.
Vaṅkanāsikatissa reigned three years in Anurādhapura, a king of proper and meritorious conduct.
After the death of Vaṅkanāsikatissa his son Gajābāhukagāmani reigned twenty-two years.
After Gajābāhu’s death the father-in-law of that king, Mahallakanāga, reigned six years.
After the death of Mahallanāga his son Bhātikatissa reigned twenty-four years over Laṅkā.
After Bhātikatissa’s death his younger brother Kaniṭṭhatissa reigned eighteen years over Laṅkādīpa.
After the death of Kaniṭṭhatissa his son, known by the name of Khujjanāga, reigned two years.
Kuñjanāga, the younger  brother of Khujjanāga, put his royal brother to death and reigned one year over Laṅkā.
Having gained the victory (over Khujjanāga), Sirināga reigned nineteen years in the most excellent Anurādhapura over Laṅkā.
The king called Sirināga by name made an offering of a garland of costly substances to the Mahāthūpa and erected a parasol over the Thūpa.
He constructed an Uposatha hall, the most excellent Lohapāsāda. This prince reigned nineteen years.
The son of Sirināga, the royal lord called Abhaya, gave two hundred thousand silver pieces to the Bhikkhu fraternity.
At the most excellent great Bo tree he constructed a stone ledge. This king governed twenty-two years.
His younger brother, known as king Tissaka, erected a most excellent parasol over the Abhayārāma and over the Mahāthūpa.
In the delightful Mahāmeghavana and in the beautiful Abhayārāma, at both most excellent Vihāras, he constructed a golden Thūpa.
Having heard the Gilāna discourse (of Buddha) which was preached by Thera Deva, he gave medicaments for the sick and (constructed) five most excellent residences (for the Saṅgha?).
Having seen a portent in the night, (he constructed) the Dassamālinī Ārāma; near the delightful Bo tree he erected figures formed by lamps.
In the reign of that king they proclaimed many wrong doctrines; proclaiming captious doctrines they ruined the religion of the Jina.
The king, when he perceived that wicked Bhikkhus ruined the religion of the Jina, together with the minister Kapila subdued those wicked ones.
Having destroyed these captious doctrines and caused the (true) religion to shine, he gave (to the Fraternity) the Hatthapaṇṇika  (Sattapaṇṇika?) palace and (caused) boiled rice (to be provided) in the Meghavana. This royal ruler governed twenty-two years.
Tissa’s own son, known by the name of Sirināga, reigned full two years over the Island.
This Sirināga constructed an enclosure around the great Bo tree and also a beautiful pavilion.
(The king) called Asaṅgatissa (Saṅghatissa) fixed golden parasols over the most excellent Mahāthūpa, on the top of the Thūpa.
(He also constructed) of jewels a Thūpa of the shape of a flame at the most excellent Mahāthūpa, and in connection (?) with that work he also brought offerings.
(Having heard) the Andhakavinda Suttanta,  which was preached by Thera Deva, this victorious king ordered rice-milk continually to be distributed at the four gates (of the town).
Vijayakumāra,  the son of Sirināga, reigned after his father’s death one year.
Saṅghatissa reigned four years; he fixed a parasol and goldsmith’s work on the Mahāthūpa.
King Saṅghabodhi by name was a virtuous prince; this king reigned two years.
This victorious king ordered rice-milk continually to be distributed in the delightful Meghavana garden, and in the most excellent Mahāvihāra he constructed a room where food was distributed by tickets.
The king called Abhaya, known by the surname Meghavaṇṇa, constructed a stone pavilion in the most excellent Mahāvihāra.
To the west of the Mahāvihāra he built a cloister for monks given to meditation. He (also) constructed an incomparable stone altar around the Bo tree and ordered a trench to be made, lined with stones, and a very costly triumphal arch. In the most excellent Bo tree sanctuary he erected a throne of stone.
Within the Dakkhiṇārāma he constructed an Uposatha hall. He distributed a great donation to the fraternity of Bhikkhus, the most excellent community.
The king, having constructed a royal palace, a great, delightful building, gave it to the Bhikkhu fraternity and then received  it back.
In the Meghavana garden the king also celebrated a Vesākha festival. He reigned thirteen years.
The son of Meghavaṇṇa was king Jeṭṭhatissa; this royal lord reigned over the island of Tambapaṇṇi.
In the most excellent Mahāthūpa he offered a very costly jewel. Having built a palace covered with iron and offered to it that most excellent jewel, the chief of men gave (to that palace) the name “Maṇipāsāda” (“palace of the gem”). Having constructed the Pācīnatissapabbata Ārāma, the ruler of men called Tissa gave it to fraternity of Bhikkhus. The ruler of the earth, the chief of men, having ordered the Ālambagāma pond to be dug, held festivals (there) during eight years. This king reigned ten years over Tambapaṇṇi.
After Jeṭṭhatissa’s death his younger brother, king Mahāsena, reigned twenty-seven years.
This king once thought thus: “There are two kinds of Bhikkhus in the Religion (of Buddha); which of them hold the right doctrine and which hold the wrong doctrine, which are modest and which are shameless?”
When thinking about this matter and searching after modest persons, he saw wicked Bhikkhus who were no (true) Samaṇas and (only) looked like (Samaṇas).
He saw people who were like stinking corpses, and in behaviour like blue flies, wicked persons, who were no (true) Samaṇas and (only) looked like (Samaṇas), –
Dummitta and Pāpasoṇa and other shameless men. He went to those wicked Bhikkhus and asked them about the sense (of the Religion) and the doctrine.
Dummitta and Pāpasoṇa and other shameless men secretly consulted in order to mislead the pious (king).
These wicked, infatuated men taught that (computing) the twenty years (required for) the Upasampadā ordination from the conception, which has been admitted (by Buddha) in (the story about) Kumārakassapa,  is not allowable.
The practice of (wearing) ivory (fans)   which has not been admitted in the story about the Chabbaggiyas, these shameless, idle (?) teachers taught to be allowable.
Regarding these and other matters many other shameless Bhikkhus, without a reason, for the sake of their own advantage, taught that (the true doctrine) was a false doctrine.
Having performed through his life, in consequence of his intercourse with those wicked persons, evil as well as good deeds, this king Mahāsena passed away (to another existence) according to his actions.
Therefore one should fly far from intercourse with wicked men, as from a serpent or a snake, and self-controlled ones should perform acts of benevolence as long as his existence lasts.
The excellent island of Laṅkā is thirty-two yojanas long, eighteen yojanas broad, its circuit is one hundred yojanas; it is surrounded by the sea, and one great mine of treasures. It possesses rivers and lakes, mountains and forests.
The island, the capital, the king, the affliction (which vexed the island), the relics, the Thūpa, the lake, the mountain, the garden, the Bodhi tree, the (chief) Bhikkhuni, –
the (chief) Bhikkhu, and the most excellent Buddha: these are the thirteen subjects (to be treated in the following exposition). Listen to my enumeration of the four names of each of these subjects (in the time of the four last Buddhas).
(The island) was called Ojadīpa, Varadīpa, Maṇḍadīpa, and the excellent Laṅkādīpa or Tambapaṇṇi.
Abhayapura, Vaḍḍhamāna, Visāla, Anurādhapura are the four names of the capital at (the time of) the teaching of the four Buddhas.
Abhaya, Samiddha, the ruler of men Jayanta, and Devānampiyatissa are the four kings.
The fever, the drought, the contest (of the two kings), and (the island’s) being inhabited by the Yakkhas, these are the four afflictions which the four Buddhas have removed.
The relic of holy Kakusandha was the drinking vessel, the relic of Buddha Konāgamana the girdle, –
the relic of Sambuddha Kassapa the rain-cloak; of glorious Gotama there is a Doṇa of corporeal relics.
In Abhayapura was the Paṭiyārāma, in Vaḍḍhamānapura the Uttarārāma, in Visāla the Pācīnārāma, in Anurādhapura the Thūpārāma which is situated in the southern direction: (there) the four Thūpas at (the time of) the teaching of the four Buddhas (were situated).
The town of Abhayapura was situated near the Kadambaka (lake), the town of Vaḍḍhamāna near the Tissa lake, the town of Visālapura near the Khema lake; Anurādhapura….; the indication of the four directions (?) is as above.
The four names of the mountain are Devakūṭa, Sumanakūṭa, and Subhakūṭa; now it is called Silākūṭa.
The famous  (?) garden (which was called in the four periods respectively) Mahātittha, Mahānāma, Sāgara, and Mahāmeghavana, a path worthy of Saints, was the first resting place of the four chiefs of the world.
The Bodhi tree of holy Kakusandha was the most excellent Sirīsa; Rucānandā who possessed the great (magical) faculties, took its southern branch and planted it in Ojadīpa, in the Mahātittha garden.
The Bodhi tree of holy Konāgamana was the most excellent Udumbara; Kanakadattā  who possessed the great (magical) faculties, took its southern branch –
and planted it in Varadīpa, in the Mahānāma garden. The Bodhi tree of holy Kassapa was the most excellent Nigrodha; –
(the Therī) called Sudhammā who possessed the great (magical) faculties, took its southern branch and planted the sacred tree in the garden called Sāgara.
The Bodhi tree of holy Gotama was the most excellent Assattha; Saṅghamittā who possessed the great (magical) faculties, took its southern branch –
and planted it in the island of Laṅkā, in the delightful Mahāmeghavana. Rucānandā, Kanakadattā, Sudhammā who possessed the great (magical) powers, –
and learned, wise Saṅghamittā who was endowed with the six (supernatural) faculties, these were the four Bhikkhunīs who brought each a Bo branch (to this island).
The Sirīsa Bo tree (was planted) in the Mahātittha garden, the Udumbara in the Mahānāma, the Nigrodha in the Mahāsāgara garden; so the Assattha was planted in the Mahāmeghavana.
On a mountain, in those four gardens, the four Bo trees have been planted; on a mountain was the delightful resting-place (of the four Buddhas), when the four Buddhas proclaimed their doctrine.
Mahādeva who possessed the six (supernatural) faculties, Sumana versed in the analytical knowledge, Sabbananda possessing the great (magical) powers, and learned Mahinda, these highly wise Theras were the converters of Tambapaṇṇi.
Kakusandha, the highest in the whole world, who was endowed with the five kinds of (supernatural) vision, looking on the whole world, saw the excellent Ojadīpa.
There raged then an epidemic fever called Puṇṇakanaraka; at that time there raged an epidemic fever among the people.
Many people, attacked by this sickness, became distressed and disconsolate like fish which lie lost on the bank (of a river).
Vexed by fear they were unable to regain happiness and tranquillity of mind. Kakusandha, the chief of the world, when he saw the afflicted beings who were being destroyed by the bonds of sickness, came hither from Jambudīpa together with forty thousand companions, for the sake of subduing the disease.
Forty thousand (Saints) who possessed the six (supernatural) faculties and the great (magical) powers, surrounded the Sambuddha, as the stars in the sky surround the moon.
Kakusandha, the illuminator of the world, established himself with his pupils on the Devakūṭa mountain, shining in splendour like a god.
When he stood resplendent in Ojadīpa on the Devakūṭa mountain, all people believed him to be a god. They did not understand that he was the Tathāgata.
(When they saw him) who arose with the rising dawn, on the day of the full moon, on the Uposatha day, and who illumined that mountain with its forests as if it were burning, –
when they saw the burning mountain which diffused light through the four quarters, all the people of Abhayapura with the king were joyful and delighted.
Buddha Kakusandha, the ruler of the world, formed the following resolution: “May all people, all men who live in Ojadīpa, see me.”
The Devakūṭa mountain was honoured among Rishis and liked by men; to that place went the hosts of people (who had been afflicted) by the distress of that fever, all the citizens together with the king, leaving the town, the capital, and there they paid homage to Kakusandha, the highest among men.
The royal retinue together with the people of the kingdom, a great crowd, arrived respectfully saluting the Sambuddha whom they believed to be a god.
All this multitude approached the most excellent Buddha, the highest among men. (The king thus addressed him:) “Consent, o Bhagavat,  to dine to-day together with the Bhikkhu fraternity (in my palace); let us go to the town, to the capital.” The Sambuddha agreed to the request of the king by remaining silent.
Having understood his consent, the royal retinue and the people of the kingdom, paying great honour and respect (to the Buddha), then returned to the town.
(The king thus reflected:) “This fraternity of Bhikkhus is numerous, the crowd of the people is great; there is no place prepared for its reception in this narrow town, in my capital.
I possess a great pleasure garden, the delightful garden of Mahātittha which is not too narrow nor too distant, which will be convenient for the ascetics –
and will be suitable for a retired existence and for the Tathāgata. There I will bestow presents on the Buddha and on the Bhikkhu fraternity.
May all people obtain the sight of the Buddha and of the Fraternity.” Omniscient Kakusandha, followed by forty thousand Bhikkhus, arrived at the Mahātittha garden. When the highest among men had entered the Mahātittha garden, –
the creepers and trees (were covered?) with flowers out of season. The king took a golden water-pot, –
and dedicated (the garden) for the sake (of the welfare) of Laṅkā, by pouring water over the hand (of the Buddha, saying): “I give, o Lord, this garden to the Saṅgha and to the Buddha, its chief.” It was a delightful resting-place, an appropriate residence for the Fraternity.
Kakusandha, the ruler of the world, accepted the garden. At that moment the earth quaked; this was the first resting-place (of the Saṅgha in Laṅkā).
The highest leader of the world stood there, causing the immovable earth to quake. (He then formed the following wish:) “Oh that Rucānandā might take the Bo branch and come hither.”
The Bhikkhunī who possessed the high (magical) powers, understanding the thought of holy Kakusandha, went to the great Sirīsa Bodhi, and standing at its foot (she thought:)
“The Buddha desires that the Bodhi tree shall grow in Ojadīpa.” Thither she went in order to fetch the Bodhi tree, (the majesty of) which  is beyond human reason (?).
(She then expressed, the following resolution:) “May, with the consent of the most excellent Buddha, out of compassion for mankind, the southern branch sever itself through my magical power.”
When Rucānandā had pronounced this demand with clasped hands, the right branch severed itself (from the tree) and fixed itself in the vase.
Rucānandā who possessed the high (magical) powers, took the Bo branch in the golden vase, and ordered five hundred Bhikkhunīs to surround it.
At that moment the earth quaked together with oceans and mountains; it was a grand sight, wonderful and astonishing.
Witnessing this, the royal retinue and the people of the kingdom delighted all raised their clasped bands and paid reverence to the excellent Bodhi branch.
All the gods were delighted; the Devas joyfully shouted when they perceived the most excellent Bodhi branch.
The four (divine) Mahārājas, the glorious guardians of the world, all these gods kept guard over the Sirīsa Bodhi branch.
The Tāvatiṁsa gods, the Vasavatti gods, Yama, Sakka, Suyāma, Santusita, Sunimmita, all surrounded the most excellent Bo branch.
The delighted crowds of gods, raising their clasped bands, together with Rucānandā, paid reverence to the most excellent Bo branch.
Rucānandā who possessed the high (magical) powers, carrying the Sirīsa Bo branch, went to the excellent Ojadīpa, accompanied by the sister-hood of Bhikkhunīs.
The gods danced, laughed, and snapped the fingers of both hands, when the most excellent Sirīsa Bo branch was carried to the excellent Ojadīpa.
Rucānandā who possessed the high (magical) powers, accompanied by a host of Devas, approached Kakusandha, carrying the Sirīsa Bo branch.
At that moment the great hero Kakusandha, the ruler of the world, repaired to the spot in the Mahātittha garden destined for the reception of the Bo tree.
Rucānandā herself did not plant the resplendent Bo branch; Kakusandha, perceiving that, himself stretched out his right hand.
Rucānandā who possessed the high (magical) powers, placed the  southern branch of the Bo tree in the Buddha’s right hand, and respectfully saluted him.
Kakusandha, the chief of the world, the highest among men, took it and gave it to king Abhaya (saying:) “Plant it on this spot”.
Abhaya, the increaser of the kingdom, planted it on the spot which Kakusandha, the leader of the world, had indicated.
When the Sirīsa Bo branch had been planted in that delightful place, the Buddha preached the Doctrine, the four Truths which soothe (the mind of men).
When he had finished, one hundred and forty thousand men and thirty koṭis of gods attained (sanctification).
The Bo tree of Kakusandha was a Sirīsa, that of Konāgamana an Udumbara, that of Kassapa a Nigrodha; (this is) the description of the three Bo trees.
The Bo tree of the incomparable Sakyaputta is the most excellent Assattha; taking it (hither) they planted it in the Meghavana garden.
The children of Muṭasīva were ten [other] brothers, Abhaya, Tissa, and Nāga, Utti and also Mattābhaya, Mitta, Sīva, and Asela, Tissa, and Khīra; these were the brothers. Princess Anulā and Sīvalī  were the daughters of Muṭasīva.
How great is the number of years which elapsed between the time when Vijaya came over to the most excellent Laṅkādīpa, and the royal coronation of the son of Muṭasīva?
Devānampiya was crowned two hundred years and thirty-six years more after the Sambuddha attained Parinibbāna.
When Devānampiya was crowned, the royal (magical) powers came over him; the lord of Tambapaṇṇi diffused rays of pure splendour.
At that time the most excellent Laṅkādīpa was a storehouse of treasures. Produced by the pure splendour of Tissa many treasures came to light.
When the glad and excited king saw these treasures, he sent them as a present to Asokadhamma.
Asoka was delighted when he saw these presents. He sent in return to Devānampiya various treasures destined to be used at his coronation.
The (monarch) called Asoka sent a chowrie, a turban, a royal parasol, a sword, slippers, a diadem, a … of Sāra wood, an (anointing) vase, a right band chank, a palanquin, a conch trumpet, earrings, a koṭi of clothes which are (cleansed by being passed through the fire) without being washed, a golden vessel and spoon, costly towels, a man’s load of water from the Anotatta lake, most precious yellow sandal wood, a measure of rouge, eye collyrium brought by the Nāgas, yellow and emblic myrobalan, costly Amata drugs, one hundred and sixty cart loads of fragrant hill paddy which had been brought by parrots; (all these things being) the rewards for his meritorious actions.
The requirements for his coronation as king of Laṅkā having been sent by Asokadhamma, Tissa, the lord of Tambapaṇṇi, celebrated his second coronation.
When thirty nights had elapsed after the second coronation of Tissa, Mahinda together with his companions arrived on this island from Jambudīpa.
(King Devānampiya) erected the most excellent monastery called Tissārāma. He also planted the great Bo tree in the Mahāmeghavana garden.
He built the great, delightful Thūpa. Devānampiya erected a monastery on the Cetiya mountain; –
he constructed the Thūpārāma, the Tissārāma (Issarasamaṇa?) Vihāra, the Vessagiri (Vihāra), and the Colakatissa (Vihāra?).
Ārāmas too (where the minor Bo branches were planted) at the distance of a yojana from each other, were made by king Tissa. He gave the great donation (which is called) the most excellent Mahāpela. This prince reigned forty years.
Then (followed his) other four brothers, the sons of Muṭasīva. Prince Uttiya reigned ten years.
Eight years after the coronation (of Uttiya), the enlightener of the island attained Nibbāna. (The king) caused the funeral ceremonies to be performed to the east of the Tissārāma.
When the twelfth year (after his Upasampadā) had been completed, Mahinda came hither; at the end of his sixtieth year he attained Nibbāna on the Cetiya mountain.
When the enlightener of the island has attained  Nibbāna, king Uttiya, having ordered full vases, triumphal arches, garlands, and burning lamps to be prepared, erected a most excellent hearse which was worth seeing. (Thus) he paid reverence to the enlightener of the Island.
Both gods and men, Nāgas, Gandhabbas, and Dānavas, all were grieved and paid reverence to the enlightener of the Island.
When they had performed the ceremonies during seven days on the most excellent Cetiya mountain, some people spoke thus: “Let us go to the town, to the capital.”
(Other people replied:) “There (in the town) is a great, fearful noise and uproar; let us here burn the enlightener of the island of Laṅkā.”
When the king heard what the crowd said, (he answered:) “I will erect a great Thūpa to the east of the Tissārāma”.
Carrying Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, together with the funeral hearse, (the people) together with the king, entered the eastern gate of the town.
Marching through the centre of the town, they left it by the southern gate, and performed great ceremonies during seven days in the Mahāvihāra.
Both gods and men erected a funeral pile of odoriferous drugs and placed it in the royal garden, (saying:) “Let us burn the virtuous one.”
They took Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, together with the funeral hearse, circumambulated the Vihāra, and caused (the people) to pay reverence to the most excellent Thūpa.
The great crowd, leaving the Ārāma by its eastern gate, performed the funeral ceremonies at a place close by it.
They all, weeping, raising their clasped hands, ascended the pile, and bowing they set the pile on fire.
The great teacher having thus been burnt entirely, they erected a most excellent Thūpa which contained his relics, and Ārāmas at the distance of one yojana from each other.
After the funeral ceremonies for Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, had been performed, that place first received the name of Isibhūmi.
There was a great assemblage from all parts of Jambudīpa, eighty koṭis of Bhikkhus, ninety-six thousand Bhikkhunis, the greater part of the Bhikkhus and Bhikkhunis possessing the six (supernatural) faculties.
The Bhikkhus, by the greatness of their magical power levelling the surface of the earth, producing (the miracle called) the world-show, made visible the (84000 consecration-) festivals, worthy of veneration.
The king standing on  the Asokārāma, looked over (the whole of) Jambudīpa; by the Bhikkhus’ magical power Asoka saw everything.
He saw all the Vihāras built all over the earth, the raised (?) flags, the flowers and arches and garlands, –
the plantains, the filled jars adorned with various flowers; he saw the whole extent of the great continent, the pomp all over the four quarters.
Delighted, glad, looking at the festivals which were being celebrated, at the assembled fraternities of Bhikkhus and the assembled Bhikkhunis and the beggars receiving rich alms which were prepared for them, seeing all the eighty-four thousand Vihāras, which were honoured (by festivals of consecration), –
Asoka joyfully made known to the fraternity of Bhikkhus: “I am, venerable Sirs, a relative of the religion of the teacher Buddha.
Great liberality has been shown by me out of reverence (?) for the Fraternity.
By expending ninety-six koṭis, a great treasure, eighty-four thousand monasteries have been erected by me in honour of the (84000) sections of the Truth taught by the most excellent Buddha. 1 have daily made offerings of four lacs: –
one Cetiya offering, one to the (Bhikkhu) called Nigrodha, one to the preachers of the Religion, one for the requirements of the sick; boiled rice is distributed constantly every day, just as the Mahāgaṅgā (gives her water).
I cannot find any other greater act of liberality. My faith is most firm; I am, therefore, a relation  of the Faith.”
After having heard the word spoken by king Asokadhamma, learned Moggaliputta who was well versed in the Scriptures, a clever decider of cases, answered the question of Asokadhamma, in order to secure a comfortable existence to the Fraternity, for the sake of the propagation of the Doctrine, and because he, the wise one, had learnt the future destiny (of the Faith): “The donor of the requisites (for the Bhikkhus) remains a stranger to the Faith, –
but that man who gives up his son or daughter, the issue of his body, and causes them to receive the Pabbajjā ordination, becomes really a relation of the Faith.”
King  Asokadhamma, the ruler of the earth, having heard this speech, addressed both prince Mahinda, his son, and his daughter Saṅghamittā: “I presently shall be a relation of the Faith.” Both children hearing what their father had said, agreed, (saying:) –
“Well, Sire, we agree, we will do what you have said; make us quickly receive the Pabbajjā ordination, become a relative of the Faith.”
Mahinda, Asoka’s son, had completed twenty years, and Saṅghamittā might be eighteen years of age.
When Asoka had completed six years, both his children received the Pabbajjā ordination, and Mahinda, the enlightener of the Island, received at once the Upasampadā ordination; –
at the same time Saṅghamittā began to exercise herself in the Sikkhā precepts. He (Mahinda) was like Moggaliputta a great teacher of the doctrine of the Theras.
Fifty-four years (after Moggaliputta’s Upasampadā) Asokadhamma was crowned; (six years?) after Asoka’s coronation, when Moggaliputta had completed sixty (?) years, Mahinda received the Pabbajjā ordination from Moggaliputta.
Mahādeva conferred the Pabbajjā ordination on him and Majjhanta the Upasampadā;  these were the chiefs who acted compassionately towards Mahinda in (those) three ways.
Moggaliputta, his Upajjhāya, taught Mahinda, the enlightener of the Island, all the Piṭakas, their whole meaning, and the Doctrine.
Ten years after Asoka’s coronation Mahinda had completed four years (after his Upasampadā), and had become a teacher of the whole scripture as handed down, and he had many pupils.
Mahinda studied and retained in his mind the well propounded, well divided Sutta (collection) as it had been settled at the two convocations, the doctrine of the Theras.
Moggaliputta instructed Mahinda, the son of Asoka, in the three sciences, (the doctrine regarding) the six (supernatural) faculties, the four analytical doctrines.
And Tissa Moggaliputta continuously taught Mahinda, his pupil, the whole Piṭaka of the Āgamas  (i.e. the Sutta-Piṭaka).
When (Asoka) had completed three years, (the story of) Nigrodha (happened), after the fourth year (he put his) brothers (to death), after his sixth year Mahinda, the son of Asoka, received the Pabbajjā ordination.
Both sons of Kontī, the Theras Tissa and Sumitta, who possessed the great (magical) faculties, attained Parinibbāna after Asoka’s eighth year.
Those royal children received the Pabbajjā ordination, and both Theras attained Nibbāna.
Many Khattiyas and Brahmans declared their intention of becoming lay disciples, and great gain and honour accrued to the faith of Buddha; –
the schismatics and heretics lost both gain and honour. Paṇḍaraṅgas and Jaṭilas, Nigaṇṭhas, Acelakas, and others –
resided (in the Buddhist Vihāras) during seven years; the Uposatha ceremonies were performed by incomplete congregations; saintly, clever, and modest men did not appear at the Uposatha ceremonies.
When a hundred years and (another) hundred and thirty-six had elapsed (after the Parinibbāna of the Buddha), sixty thousand Bhikkhus dwelt in the Asokārāma.
Ājīvakas and sectarians of different descriptions ruined the Doctrine; all of them wearing the yellow robe injured the doctrine of the Jina.
Surrounded by one thousand Bhikkhus, Moggaliputta, the chief of the school, who possessed the six (supernatural) powers and the great (magical) faculties, convened a Council.
Wise Moggaliputta, the destroyer of the schismatic doctrines, firmly established the Theravāda and held the third Council.
Having destroyed the different (heretical) doctrines and subdued many shameless people and restored splendour to the (true) faith, he proclaimed (the treatise called) Kathāvatthu.
From that Moggaliputta Mahinda, who was the pupil of that teacher, learnt the true religion.
(Moggaliputta) taught him the five Nikāyas and the seven sections (of the Abhidhamma); he the hero, the clever one learnt from his teacher the two Vibhaṅgas of the Vinaya, the Parivāra, and the Khandhaka.
When the second century and thirty-six years more had elapsed (since the Buddha’s death), again a most dreadful schism arose in the Theravāda.
In the city of Pāṭaliputta ruled prince Dhammāsoka, a great king, who was a believer in the faith of Buddha.
He bestowed great gifts on the Saṅgha, the best and most excellent of congregations; in one day he expended four lacs.
One he gave in honour of the Cetiyas, another for the preaching of the Dhamma, one for the requirements of the sick, one to the Saṅgha.
Infidels, sixty thousand in number, seeing this gain and these great honours, furtively attached themselves (to the Saṅgha).
The Pātimokkha ceremonies in the monastery of the Asokārāma were interrupted; a minister who ordered the Pātimokkha ceremonies to be performed, killed (some) of the Saints.
In order to destroy the infidels, many disciples of Buddha, sixty thousand sons of the Jina assembled.
At that convocation the son of Moggali was the president, a great chief, similar to the Teacher; he had not his like on earth.
The king asked the Thera about the case of the slaughter of the Saints; having performed a miracle, he satisfied the desire of the king.
Having received the Doctrine from the Thera, the king destroyed the Bhikkhu emblems of those who had furtively attached themselves (to the Saṅgha).
The reckless infidels, performing the Pabbajjā rite according to their own doctrine, injured the faith of the Buddha just as (men mix) pure gold (with baser metals).
They all were sectarian, opposed to the Theravāda; and in order to annihilate them and to make his own doctrine resplendent, –
the Thera set forth the treatise belonging to the Abhidhamma, which is called Kathāvatthu. A similar punishment, a similar destruction of an opposite doctrine never occurred.
After having promulgated the treatise called Kathāvatthu which belongs to the Abhidhamma, the presiding Thera, in order to purify his own doctrine and (to establish) the Faith for a long time, selected one thousand Arahats, choosing the best ones, and  held a Council.
In the monastery of the Asokārāma which had been built by king Dhammāsoka, this third convocation was finished in the space of nine months.
The congregation of Bhikkhus, seven hundred thousand (in number), assembled, holy men who having subdued their passions and having become pure, had all attained the summit of perfection.
They all, having made enquiry and determined which were the most worthy, elected by vote of the congregation five hundred Theras.
Kassapa was the chief propounder of the Dhutaṅga precepts according to the doctrine of the Jina; Ānanda was the first of those learned (in the Suttas), wise Upāli was chief in the Vinaya –
Anuruddha in the (supernatural) visions, Vaṅgīsa in promptly comprehending, Puṇṇa among the preachers of the Dhamma, Kumārakassapa among the students of various tales, –
Kaccāna in establishing distinctions, Koṭṭhita in analytical knowledge. There were, besides, many other great Theras who were original depositaries (of Buddha’s doctrine).
By these and other saintly Theras who had fulfilled their duties, to the number of five hundred, was the collection of the Dhamma and of the Vinaya made; because it was collected by the Theras, it is called the doctrine of the Theras (theravāda).
The Bhikkhus composed the collection of Dhamma and Vinaya by consulting Upāli about the Vinaya, and by asking the (Thera) called Ānanda regarding the Dhamma.
Thera Mahākassapa and the great teacher Anuruddha, Thera Upāli of powerful memory, and the learned Ānanda –
as well as many other distinguished disciples, who had been praised by the master, who possessed analytical knowledge, firmness, the six (supernatural) faculties and the great (magical) powers, who had attained the mystic trance proceeding from self-concentration, who had completely mastered the true faith, –
all these five hundred Theras bore in their minds the nine-fold doctrine of the Jina, having acquired it from the best of Buddhas.
They who had heard and received from Bhagavat himself the whole Dhamma and Vinaya taught by the Buddha, –
they who knew the Dhamma, who knew the Vinaya, who all were acquainted with the Āgamas, who were unconquerable, immovable, similar to their master, ever worshipful, –
they who had received the perfect doctrine, first (among religions), from the first (among teachers), who were Theras and original depositaries (of the Faith), made this first collection. Hence this whole doctrine of the Theras is also called the first (or primitive) doctrine.
Assembled in  the beautiful Sattapaṇṇa cave, the five hundred Theras, the teachers, arranged the nine-fold doctrine of the Teacher.
The nine-fold doctrine of the Teacher (comprises) Sutta, Geyya, Veyyākaraṇa, Gāthā, Udāna, Itivuttaka, Jātaka, Abbhuta, Vedalla.
The Theras who arranged this true imperishable doctrine, according to Vaggas, Paññāsakas, Saṁyuttas, and Nipātas , composed the collection of the Āgamas which is known by the name of the Suttas.
As long as the true doctrines remain, as long as the collection does not perish, so long – a long time – will the teaching of the Master last.
The immovable, firm, insubvertible earth quaked on the appearance of the Collection of the Vinaya and of the Dhamma, which is worthy of the Faith.
Nobody, may a Samaṇa come, or a Brāhmaṇa of great learning, skilled in disputation and hair-splitting, can subvert it; firm it stands like Sineru.
Neither a deity nor Māra nor Brahmā nor any earthly beings can find in it even the smallest ill spoken sentence.
Thus the collection of the Dhamma and of the Vinaya is complete in every part, well arranged and well protected by the omniscience of the Teacher.
And those five hundred Theras, chief among whom was Mahākassapa, as they knew the doubts of the people, composed the imperishable collection of the Vinaya and of the Dhamma, which is an incarnation of the Faith like the highest Buddha, the collection of the Dhamma.
The doctrine of the Theras, which is founded on true reasons, which is free from heresies, full of true meaning, and supports the true faith, will exist as long as the Faith.
As long as holy disciples of Buddha’s faith exist, all of them will recognize the first Council of the Dhamma.
The five hundred pre-eminent Theras, noble by birth (?), laid the first firm, original, fundamental base (of the Faith).
Sixteen years had elapsed after the protector of the world had entered Nibbāna; it was the twenty-fourth year of Ajātasattu’s (reign), and the sixteenth of Vijaya’s; –
learned Upāli had just completed sixty years, (then) Dāsaka received the Upasampadā ordination from Thera Upāli.
The entire sacred Dhamma texts which the most excellent Buddha had set forth, the whole of the nine-fold speeches of the Jina, Upāli recited.
Upāli received from Buddha and (afterwards) recited the entire, complete, and whole nine-fold doctrine contained in the Suttas.
Buddha spoke regarding the learned Upāli in the assembly (of the Bhikkhus): “Upāli is the first chief of the Vinaya in my church.”
The great teacher, being thus installed in the midst of the Assembly, recited the three Piṭakas to a thousand (pupils), chief among whom was Dāsaka.
Upāli taught five hundred Theras whose passions had been extinguished, who were pure, holy, and speakers of truth, the (texts of the) faith.
After the Sambuddha had attained Parinibbāna, the great teacher Thera Upāli taught then the Vinaya full thirty years.
Upāli taught the clever Dāsaka the whole nine-fold doctrine of the Teacher, eighty-four thousand (divisions).
Dāsaka, having learned all the Piṭakas from Thera Upāli, taught it just as his teacher in the Faith (had done).
The great teacher (Upāli) entered Nibbāna, after having appointed his pupil, the clever Thera Dāsaka, (to be chief) of the Vinaya.
Prince Udaya reigned sixteen years; when Udayabhadda had completed six (years), Thera Upāli attained Nibbāna.
Sonaka, a respectable merchant who came from Kāsi, received the first ordination according to the doctrine of the Teacher at Giribbaja (Rājagaha) in the Veḷuvana (monastery).
Dāsaka, the leader of the school, dwelt at Giribbaja in the Magadha country, and in his seven and thirtieth year gave Sonaka the first ordination.
(When) clever Dāsaka had completed forty-five years, and Nāgadāsa had reigned ten years, and king Paṇḍu-(vāsa) twenty, then Sonaka received the Upasampadā ordination  from Thera Dāsaka.
Thera Dāsaka taught Sonaka also the nine-fold (doctrine); he, having learned it from his teacher, (again) taught it (to others).
Dāsaka in his turn, having made his pupil Thera Sonaka chief of the Vinaya, attained Nibbāna in his sixty-fourth year.
The Thera called Sonaka had just completed forty years; Kālāsoka had then reigned ten years and half a month in addition; –
Pakuṇḍaka  was a robber during seventeen years; (of this period) eleven years and six months more had passed, –
when Thera Sonaka, the chief of the school, admitted Siggava and Candavajjī to the Upasampadā ordination.
At that time, when Bhagavat had been dead a hundred years, the Vajjiputtas of Vesālī proclaimed at Vesālī the ten indulgences: the practice of (keeping) salt in a horn is permissible; the two inch alternative is permissible; the practice of (taking food after the regular meal when going to) the village is permissible; the practice of (holding Uposatha in different) residences (within the same boundary) is permissible; the practice of (obtaining) the consent (of the Fraternity not before, but after an act) is permissible; the practice of (acting according to) example is permissible; the practice of (drinking) milk-whey is permissible; the practice of (drinking) toddy is permissible; sitting (on seats covered with clothes) without fringes is permissible; (the possession of) gold and silver is permissible.
When Sambuddha had entered Parinibbāna ten times ten years, the Vajjiputtas proclaimed at Vesālī these ten indulgences.
They proclaimed (the allowableness of) impermissible practices which all had been forbidden by the Tathāgata. Sabbakāmī, and Sāḷha, and Revata, (and) Khujjasobhita, –
and Yasa, Sambhūta of Sāṇa, these Theras who had formerly seen the Tathāgata, the pupils of Thera Ānanda; –
Sumana and Vāsabhagāmi, who had formerly seen the Tathāgata, these two most excellent pupils of Anuruddha; –
these (and other) Bhikkhus, seven hundred in number, came to Vesālī  and expressed their assent to the discipline as it had been established in the doctrine of the Buddha.
All these who had obtained a (supernatural) insight, who were expert in reaching meditation, who were quit of their load, and saved, assembled together.
(Mahinda said to the king:) “In the first month of the summer, on the full moon, on the Uposatha day, we have come hither from Jambudīpa; we have dwelt on this most excellent mountain.
During five months we have not left the Tissārāma nor the mountain; now we will go to Jambudīpa; permit it, o lord of charioteers.”
(The king replied:) “We serve you with food and drink, with clothes and dwelling-places; the whole people has taken refuge (in the Faith); what causes you dissatisfaction?”
(Mahinda said: “We have no object here  to which we may pay respect by) salutations and by rising from our seats, or by raising our clasped hands, and by respectful contemplation. For a long time, o great king, we have not seen the Sambuddha, the highest among men.”
(The king answered:) “Verily I have understood you, venerable sir; I will erect a most excellent Thūpa; find you out a suitable place (?); I will build a Thūpa in honour of the Teacher.”
(Mahinda gave the following order to Sumana:) “Go, chief Sumana; repair to Pāṭaliputta, and address thus the righteous king Asoka:
“Your ally, great king, has been converted to the faith of Buddha; grant to him (some of) the most excellent relics; he is going to erect a Thūpa in honour of the Teacher.”
Learned (Sumana) who was versed in the scriptures, a powerful, eloquent speaker, who had reached the perfect possession of (magical) power, who was firm and well grounded (in the Faith), –
took his alms-bowl and his robe, and instantly departed from the mountain. According to the truth he thus addressed king Dhammāsoka:
“Hear, great king, the message which my teacher sends you. Your ally, great king, has been converted to the faith of Buddha; grant to him (some of) the most excellent relics; he is going to erect a Thūpa in honour of the Teacher.”
Having heard this speech, the rejoicing and excited king filled the alms-bowl with relics, (saying:) “Quickly depart, pious man.”
The powerful, eloquent speaker then took the relics, rose into the air and repaired to Kosiya (Indra).
The eloquent man having approached Kosiya thus addressed him: “Hear, great king, the message which my teacher sends you.
King Devānampiya has been converted to the faith of Buddha; grant to him a most excellent relic; be is going to erect a splendid Thūpa.”
Having heard his speech, Kosiya rejoicing gave him the right collar-bone (of Buddha, saying:) “Quickly depart, pious man.”
The novice Sumana, leaving Kosiya and taking away the right collar-bone, descended on the most excellent mountain (Missaka).
The  wise man who was filled with modesty, fear of sin, and reverence, despatched by the king of Theras, placed himself on the most excellent mountain.
The king together with his brothers, at the head of a great army, and accompanied by the most excellent Bhikkhu fraternity, then went to meet the relics of the highest Buddha.
On the day of the full moon of the month Kattika, on the day of the Cātumāsa festival, the great hero arrived. (The dish with the relics) was placed on the frontal globe of the (state) elephant.
(The elephant) reared, like a struck gong; at that moment the earth quaked, when the Sage in the neighbourhood (of the mountain) approached.
The sound of the chanks and the roll of the drums mixed with the boom of the kettle-drums (was heard). The prince escorting (the relic) paid reverence to the highest of men.
The noble elephant turning westward proceeded together with the foot soldiers; he then entered the town by the eastern gate.
Men and women (there) offered various perfumes and garlands. The most excellent elephant leaving (the town) by the southern gate, –
proceeded to the very spot which teacher Kakusandha, Konāgamana and Kassapa, the old Sages, formerly had visited.
When the most excellent elephant had proceeded to that hill, the chief of men (there) deposited the relics of Sakyaputta.
At the moment when the relics were placed (there), the gods expressed their delight, and the earth began to quake in an astonishing, terrifying manner.
(The king) with his brothers, gladdening the ministers and the people of the kingdom (by his order), caused the bricks for the Thūpa to be manufactured.
The noblemen paid singly their reverence to the most excellent Thūpa; the highly precious relics which shone like a light, were covered with excellent gems.
(There were) white (?) canopies, separate canopies, covers (?), various (?) canopies, suitable ornaments, beautiful chowries.
Near the Thūpa a brilliancy spread in all directions over the four quarters from the lamps, like  the brilliancy of the rising sun.
Cloths brilliant with various colours were spread (?), and above (the Cetiya?) shone like (?) the cloudless sky.
A canopy covered with gold, which was encircled by (ornaments) made of gems and by most precious crystal, and adorned by gold sand….
“Here Sambuddha Kakusandha, chief of men, surrounded by forty thousand (Bhikkhus who were holy) like (himself), looked (over this island).
The Buddha, gifted by (supernatural) vision, moved by compassion, looked on created beings, and on the suffering men in Ojadīpa, Abhayapura.
In Ojadīpa (he looked) with the power of the rays of his Bodhi on many created beings, on a great multitude that was to attain (supreme) knowledge, as the sun (awakens) the lotuses.
Accompanied by forty thousand Bhikkhus be repaired to Ojadīpa, resembling the rising sun.
(The Buddha’s name was) Kakusandha, (that of the chief Thera) Mahādeva, the mountain (was called) Devakūṭa; (there reigned in the island of) Ojadīpa, (in the town of) Abhayapura, a prince named Abhaya.
The well constructed town which was worth seeing, delightful, and pleasant, was situated near the Kadambaka river.
(At that time there raged in the island) a fearful epidemic fever called Puṇṇakanaraka; the people were in a state of affliction like fishes in a net.
In consequence of the power of the Buddha the fever ceased. When (the Buddha) had preached the Truth which delivers from death, and had established the Faith of the Jina, –
eighty-four thousand men attained sanctification. At that time the monastery was the Paṭiyārāma, and (the Cetiya was) the Dhammakarakacetiya (Cetiya where the drinking vessel of the Buddha is preserved).
Mahādeva accompanied by one thousand Bhikkhus, remained (there), and the Jina, the highest being, himself departed from that place.
Here Sambuddha Konāgamana, the great Sage, accompanied by thirty thousand Bhikkhus, looked (over the island).
The Sambuddha gifted with (supernatural) vision, diffused his compassion through ten thousand worlds; the great hero looked on the suffering people of Varadīpa.
In Varadīpa (he looked) with the power of the rays of his Bodhi on many created beings, on a great multitude that was to attain (supreme) knowledge, as the sun (awakens) the lotuses.
Accompanied by thirty thousand Bhikkhus the Sambuddha repaired to Varadīpa, resembling the rising sun.
(The Buddha’s name was) Konāgamana, (that of the chief Thera) Mahāsumana, the mountain (was called) Sumanakūṭa; (there reigned in the island of) Varadīpa, (in the town of) Vaḍḍhamāna, a prince named Samiddha.
At that time the island suffered from a drought; there was a famine ... When the created beings were afflicted by the famine like fishes in shallow water, abundant rain fell, when the Omniscient had arrived; the country became prosperous; he brought consolation to many people.
To the north of the town which was situated near the Tissatalāka, there was the Uttarārāma monastery; (the Cetiya at that time was) the Kāyabandhanacetiya (Cetiya where the girdle of the Buddha is preserved).
Eighty-four thousand men attained sanctification. When the Truth which delivers from death, had been preached, –
Mahāsumana, similar to the rising sun, accompanied by one thousand Bhikkhus, remained (there), and the great hero himself, the highest being, departed.
Here Sambuddha Kassapa, the ruler of the world, accompanied by twenty thousand Bhikkhus, looked (over the island).
Omniscient Kassapa looked down on the world of men and gods, and discerned by the pure vision of the Buddhas the beings who were to attain (supreme) knowledge.
Omniscient Kassapa, the receiver of offerings, diffusing (the rays of) his high compassion, perceived the furious contest (between king Jayanta and his brother Samiddha), –
and by the power of the rays  of his Bodhi, as the sun (awakens) the lotuses, he saw many beings in the island of Maṇḍadīpa who were to attain (supreme) knowledge.
“I shall go to Maṇḍadīpa and cause the Religion to shine there; I shall produce there high splendour like that of the moon in the darkness (of the night)”.
Surrounded by multitudes of Bhikkhus the Jina proceeded through the air; resembling the rising sun he repaired to Maṇḍadīpa.
(The Buddha’s name was) Kassapa, (that of the chief Thera) Sabbananda, the mountain (was called) Subhakūṭa, the name of the town was Visāla, that of the prince was Jayanta.
To the east of the town which was situated near the Khema tank, there was the Pācīnārāma monastery; (the Cetiya at that time was) the Dakasāṭika Cetiya (Cetiya where the rain-cloak of the Buddha is preserved).
The Sambuddha, after having comforted and reconciled the (two) brothers, preached the Truth which delivers from death, and established the Faith.
When the Truth which delivers from death, had been preached, and the doctrine of the Jina had been established, eighty-four thousand men attained sanctification.
Glorious Sabbananda, surrounded by one thousand Bhikkhus, remained in Maṇḍadīpa; the ruler of the world departed.
Here (also stood) the Sambuddha who has appeared in the world (in the present age), the ruler of the world. “Out of compassion for the living I will save created beings.”
The Sambuddha, the chief of the world, the highest among men, looked on the great armies of Nāgas which had assembled, ready for a battle.
The Serpents emitted smoke and flames, they raged, they spread great horror, they were destroying the great island.
(The Buddha) went alone (to the island:) “I shall go to the most excellent island; I shall pacify the two Serpents, the uncle and the nephew.”
This Sambuddha was called Gotama; (it was) on the mountain called Cetiya (pabbata); there reigned in the delightful town called Anurādhapura a prince named Tissa.
In Kusinārā, in the Upavattana of the Mallas, the holy Sambuddha  reached complete Nibbāna by the destruction of the substrata (of existence).
(He at that time foretold:) “Two hundred and thirty-six years will elapse; then (a Thera) called Mahinda by name will cause the splendour of the Religion to shine (in Laṅkā).
In the south of the town, at a delightful place (will be) a beautiful Ārāma called the Thūpārāma.
At that time the island (will be known) by the name of Tambapaṇṇi; they will deposit a relic of my body in that most excellent island.”
The queen called Anulā was a believer in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Fraternity; she confessed the true doctrine, and put away the desire of existence. (She expressed to the king her desire of being admitted into the Order.)
Having heard what the queen said, the king addressed the Thera thus: (“Queen Anulā) believes in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Fraternity; she confesses the true doctrine, –
and puts away the desire of existence. Confer the Pabbajjā ordination on Anulā.” (Mahinda replied:) “It is not permitted to Bhikkhus, o great king, to confer the Pabbajjā ordination on women; –
my sister Saṅghamittā, o king, shall come hither. She will confer the Pabbajjā ordination on Anulā and will release her from all fetters.
Wise Saṅghamittā and clever Uttarā, Hemā and Māsagalla, Aggimittā, chary of speech, Tappā and Pabbatacchinnā, Mallā and Dhammadāsiyā, –
these Bhikkhunis who are free from desire and firm, whose thoughts and wishes are pure, who are firmly established in the true Dhamma and Vinaya, –
who have subdued their passions, who have their senses under control and have attained (perfection), who possess the three-fold Science and know well the (magical) powers, who are well grounded in the highest bliss, will also come hither.
(Devānampiya) sat down, surrounded by his ministers, and deliberated (about inviting princess Saṅghamittā). Having sat down in order to hold a council (about  this matter), he thus addressed the ministers ...
Prince Ariṭṭha, having heard what the king said, –
and having heard the speech of the Thera and received his commission, respectfully saluted his uncle (?) and departed in the northern direction.
Having established their residence in a certain quarter of the town, the noble ladies, five hundred virgins, queen Anulā at their head, all high-born and illustrious, having undertaken to observe the ten moral precepts, all this multitude late and early surrounded Anulā.
(Ariṭṭha) having proceeded to a sea-port went on board a great ship; when he had crossed the sea and reached the shore he stood (on dry ground).
The powerful minister (then) crossed the Viñjha range; having arrived at Pāṭaliputta, he presented himself to the king.
(Ariṭṭha thus addressed Asoka:) “Your son, Sire, your offspring, o great king Piyadassana, Thera Mahinda has sent me in your presence.
King Devānampiya, your ally, Piyadassana, who is converted to Buddha, has sent me in your presence.”
(Then) the great Sage (went to Saṅghamittā and) communicated to her the message of her brother: “The royal virgins, o Saṅghamittā, and princess Anulā, –
all look to you for the Pabbajjā ordination.” Wise Saṅghamittā, when she had heard the message of her brother, –
quickly went to the king and thus addressed him: “Give your consent, great king; I shall go to the island of Laṅkā; –
the great Sage has communicated to me the message of my brother.” (Asoka replied:) “Your sister’s son Sumana and my son, your elder brother, –
being gone, prevent, dear, that you, my daughter, should go also.” (Saṅghamittā replied:) “Weighty, o great king, is my brother’s command.
The royal virgins, o great king, and princess Anulā, they all look to me for their Pabbajjā ordination.”
Far-seeing Moggaliputta who perceived by his supernatural vision the propagation of the Faith in the future in the neighbouring countries, –
sent Majjhantika and other Theras, each with four companions, for the sake of establishing the Faith in foreign countries (and) for the enlightenment of men.
“Preach ye together with your brethren (?) powerfully the most excellent religion to the foreign countries, out of compassion for created beings.”
The great sage Majjhantika went to the country of the Gandhāras; there he appeased an enraged Nāga and released many people from the fetters (of sin).
Mahādeva who possessed the great (magical) powers, went to the realm of Mahisa; urging (the people) by (the description of) the suffering in hell, he released many people from their fetters.
Then another (Thera), Rakkhita, skilled in magical transformations, rising into the air, preached the Anamataggiya discourse.
The wise Thera called Yonakadhammarakkhita converted the Aparantaka country by preaching the Aggikkhandhopama Sutta.
The Thera Mahādhammarakkhita who possessed the great (magical) powers, converted Mahāraṭṭha by preaching the Nāradakassapajātaka.
The Thera Mahārakkhita who possessed the great magical powers, converted the Yavana region by preaching the Kālakārāma Suttanta.
The Thera who originated from the Kassapa tribe, Majjhima, Durabhisara, Sahadeva, Mūlakadeva, converted the multitude of Yakkhas in the Himavat.
They preached there the Suttanta called Dhammacakkappavattana.
Sona and  Uttara who possessed the great magical powers, went to Suvaṇṇabhūmi; there they conquered the multitudes of Pisācas and released many people from their fetters.
Mahinda, going with four companions to the most excellent island of Laṅkā, firmly established (there) the Faith and released many people from their fetters.
Two hundred and eighteen years after the Parinibbāna of the Sambuddha Piyadassana was anointed king.
When Piyadassana was installed, the miraculous faculties of royal majesty entered into him; he diffused the splendour which he had obtained in consequence of his merits, one yojana above and one beneath (the earth); the wheel of his power rolled through the great empire of Jambudīpa.
The Devas constantly brought to him (?) every day sixteen jars of water (?), filled with medical herbs of every description, from the Anotatta lake at the  top of the Himavat mountains.
The Devas then constantly brought every day fragrant teeth-cleansers made of the betel vine, which were grown in the mountains, soft, smooth, sweet, endowed with flavour, and delightful.
The Devas then constantly brought every day fragrant myrobalans, which were grown in the mountains, soft and smooth, endowed with flavour, desirable to great kings (?).
The Devas then constantly brought every day divine drinks and ripe mangos endowed with flavour and fragrance.
The Devas then constantly brought every day from the Chaddanta lake upper and under garments dyed with the five colours.
The Nāga kings then constantly brought every day fragrant powder for washing the head, and also unguents, and fine seamless clothes to put on of the colour of jessamine, and precious collyrium; all these things (they brought) from the Nāga world.
The Devas then constantly brought every day sugar cane, quantities of Areca-nuts, yellow towels.
The parrots brought nine thousand loads of hill paddy which was picked out by rats; the bees made honey; the bears forged with sledge-hammers.
Heaven-born birds, sweet-voiced cuckoos constantly sang to men, (attracted) by the splendour of Asoka’s merit.
The great Nāga whose age endures through a Kappa, the attendant of four Buddhas, wearing a golden chain, came, (attracted) by the splendour of (Asoka’s) merit.
The glorious Piyadassi honoured him with garlands of jewels. Splendid rewards were received for alms (given to religious mendicants).
This grandson of Candagutta, the son of Bindusāra (king Asoka), whilst a mere prince, was sub-king of Ujjenī charged with collecting the revenue (of that province). During his progress he came to the town of Vedissa.
There the daughter of a Seṭṭhi, known by the name of Devī, having cohabited with him, gave birth to a most noble son.
Mahinda and Saṅghamittā chose to receive the Pabbajjā ordination; having obtained Pabbajjā, they both destroyed the fetter of (individual) existence.
Asoka ruled in Pāṭaliputta, best of towns; three  years after his coronation he was converted to Buddha’s faith.
How great is the number of years between the time when the Sambuddha attained Parinibbāna in the Upavattana (at Kusinārā), and when Mahinda, the issue of the Moriya family, was born?
Two hundred years and four years more had elapsed: just at that time Mahinda, the son of Asoka, was born.
When Mahinda was ten years old, his father put his brothers to death; then he passed four years reigning over Jambudīpa.
Having killed his hundred brothers, alone continuing his race, Asoka was anointed king in Mahinda’s fourteenth year.
Asokadhamma, after his coronation, obtained the (above-mentioned) miraculous faculties; exceedingly splendid and rich in meritorious works (he was), universal monarch of (Jambu)dīpa.
They crowned Piyadassi after full twenty years (?); he passed three years doing honour to Pāsaṇḍa infidels.
(There were) adherents of the sixty-two false doctrines, ninety-six kinds of Pāsaṇḍas who proceeded from the Sassata and Uccheda doctrines, all of them established on these two principles; –
Nigaṇṭhas and Acelakas and other ascetics and other Brahmans and sectarians.
Searching where truth and where falsehood was, he invited the infatuated, infidel Nigaṇṭhas (?) and sectarians of the Sassata and Uccheda doctrines, and Pāsaṇḍa and Titthiya infidels of different creeds outside the Faith, sectarian people.
After having invited the numbers of Titthiyas and having introduced them into his palace and having bestowed on them great gifts, he asked them an exceedingly difficult question.
Being asked this question, they could not answer it by their own power; the ignorant people answered like a man who being asked about the mango tree, replies concerning the Lakucha tree.
They all were content with low seats (?) (in the royal hall).   After having annihilated all the Pāsaṇḍas and defeated the sectarians, –
the king thought: “Which other men may we find who are Arahats in this world or see the path towards Arahatship?
(Surely) they are to be found in the world; this world cannot be void of them (?). How may I obtain the sight of such worthy men? If I hear his (i. e. such a man’s) well spoken words, I will give up to him my paternal realm and my conquests.”
The king, thinking thus, found nobody worthy of his presents; unceasingly the king searched after virtuous, clever men.
Walking about in his palace and looking at many people, he saw the Samaṇa Nigrodha who went along the road for alms.
When he saw Nigrodha whose walking, turning back and looking was graceful, who turned his eyes to the ground, who was adorned (by decent deportment), an Arahat, whose mind was peaceful, who had reached perfect self-control, who had subdued himself and protected and well defended himself (against human passions), who did not mix with noble people, who was stainless like the moon amidst clouds, fearless like a lion, brilliant like a fire-brand, venerable, unconquerable, firm, of a peaceful disposition, steadfast, who had destroyed his passions, had cleansed himself of all sins, who was the most excellent of men, who led a wandering life, the most excellent Samaṇa, who was endowed with all virtues, the thought occurred to him, that he had been his companion during a former life (?).  (Seeing) that ascetic who led a life worthy of a Muni, who was happy in consequence of his meritorious deeds in former existences, who had reached the fruition which is obtained by the path of Arahats, walking along the road in search of alms, that wise man thought, full of longing:
“Indeed this Thera is one of the venerable ones; like Buddha, the holy One in this world, and like his disciples, he has reached the fruition which is obtained by the transcendent path, and has reached liberation and salvation.”
(Asoka) obtained the enjoyment of the five-fold delight, high bliss; delighted, he who was comparable to Sakka rejoiced like a poor man who has found a treasure, like one who has gained the desire of his heart (?).
He spoke to one of his ministers: “Well, quickly conduct hither that Bhikkhu, that handsome young man of tranquil appearance, who walks along the road like an elephant, fearless and endowed with the ornament of tranquillity.”
The king felt great content; highly delighted he thought in his mind: “Without doubt this excellent person whom I have never seen before, has reached the highest perfection.”
Thinking thus, he again spoke thus: “Well prepared seats are spread; sit down on the seat which is worthy of an ascetic; I grant thee whichsoever thou desirest.”
After hearing the speech of the king, he took (the king’s) right hand (?) and mounted the throne. Fearlessly he sat down on the most excellent seat, just as Sakka, king of the gods, seats himself on the Paṇḍukambala.
The king thought: “This most excellent boy is certainly immovable and fearless; him …
The king, recognizing that excellent tender boy who observed the customs of the Saints, (to be) well instructed and expert in Dhamma and Vinaya, again spoke thus, full of delight:
“Teach me the Faith which thou hast learnt; thou alone shalt be my teacher; I will obey the words which thou teachest me, o great Sage. Instruct me, I listen to thy preaching.”
Having heard this exceedingly acute speech of the king, be who was well versed in the analytical distinctions of the nine-fold doctrine, thought over the precious Tipiṭaka and found the excellent sermon on Earnestness:
 “Earnestness is the way to immortality, indifference is the way to death; the earnest do not die, the indifferent are like the dead.”
When wise Nigrodha had pronounced this gladdening sentence, the king understood that highest motive  (viz. earnestness): “This is the foundation of all doctrines whatsoever that have been preached by the omniscient Buddha.
To-day I choose as my refuge thee and Buddha with the Dhamma and the Saṅgha; together with my children and wives, with the number of my relatives I announce to thee my having become a lay-disciple.
Abiding together with children and wives in the refuge (of the Faith), in consequence of the arrival of Nigrodha, my spiritual guide, I offer four lacs of silver and eight (daily) portions of rice to the Thera.”
(The king having asked, whether there are many ascetics like Nigrodha, he replied:) “There are many disciples of Buddha, versed in the three-fold science, possessed of (magical) power, well acquainted with the exposition of the qualities of mind, who have subdued their passions and reached Arahatship.”
The king again spoke to the Thera: “I desire to meet with that precious Assembly; I will pay my respect to all (Bhikkhus) who come to the Assembly; I will listen to the Dhamma.”
Sixty thousand ascetics assembled, and the messengers announced to the king: “A large congregation which is full of great joy, has assembled; go thou to see the congregation, as thou desiredst (to do).”
Asokadhamma, the ruler of the earth, having heard what the messenger said, thus addressed the circle of his relations, his friends and counsellors and his kinsmen:
“We will offer presents on the occasion of the assembling of the great Saṅgha; we will show them attention as much as we can, as much as we are able.
Let them quickly make ready for me a hall, seats, water, attendants, gifts, and food, such as are worthy of being offered, and suitable.
Let the makers of curry and rice quickly make ready for me well cooked rice-milk, sweet, pure dishes.
I will bestow a great donation on the congregation of the Bhikkhus, the most excellent community. Let them beat the drums in the city, let them sweep the roads, let them scatter white sand and flowers of the five colours; –
let them place here and there garlands and triumphal  arches, plantain trees, auspicious brimming jars, and let them place here and there ..., –
and let them make flags of cloth and fasten them here and there; let the people, adorned with flower garlands, make this city resplendent.
Khattiyas, Brahmans, and Vessas, Suddas, and people of different extraction, adorned with various ornaments, shall take clothes, ornaments, flowers, burning torches, and shall proceed to meet the Congregation.
All kinds of bands of music, well trained musicians of various schools who are pleasant to hear and sweet-voiced, shall play (various melodies) … and proceed to meet the Congregation, (a) most meritorious (act).
… dancers and acrobats in auspicious attitudes (?), all shall go to meet the Congregation and shall amuse them, when they have assembled.
And let them worship (the Assembly) with large heaps of flowers of different kinds, (aromatic) powder of various descriptions, and unguents.
Let them prepare in the city every kind of pomp (?) and desirable gifts.
The inhabitants of the kingdom, devoted (?) to the Fraternity, shall undertake to do homage (to the Saṅgha), and shall do so during the whole day and during all the three watches (?) of the night.”
That night having elapsed, the illustrious prince, causing food of excellent flavour to be prepared in his own residence, gave the following orders to his counsellors and his attendants: “Let all people procure heaps of perfumed garlands and flowers, many flowers, parasols, flags, lamps burning in the day-time; let them procure as much as I have ordered.
Let all (people dwelling) in this city, the merchants from the four quarters of the horizon, and all the royal officers, with their oxen, troops, and vehicles, follow me to meet the congregation of Bhikkhus.”
The king in whose mind wisdom had arisen, proceeding in great haste towards the Bhikkhu congregation, saluted them, raising  his joined hands, and received greetings in return.
He spoke to the Bhikkhu congregation: “May (the Saṅgha) have compassion on me.”
Taking the alms-bowl of the Thera, the Saṅgha’s (spiritual) father, and paying reverence to him by (offering) various flowers, he entered the city.
Inviting them to enter his residence and to be seated, he offered to them with outstretched hands rice-milk and various highly precious food, hard and soft, as much as they wanted and desired.
When the congregation of Bhikkhus had finished their meal and removed their hands from the bowls, he offered to each Bhikkhu a suit of robes.
He distributed slippers (?), collyrium, oil, parasols, and also shoes, all the requisites of an ascetic, molasses and honey.
Introducing all the Bhikkhus, as many [as] had assembled, into his interior apartments, Asokadhamma, the ruler of the earth, sat down. Sitting down the king invited the congregation of Bhikkhus (to accept) their gifts, (saying):
“I give as much as the Bhikkhus desire, whatever they choose.”
After having gratified them with (a present of priestly) requisites and offered to them what was required (for their use), he asked them about the very profound, well propounded divisions of the Dhamma:
“Are there, venerable Sirs, sections taught by the kinsman of the Sun, by the indication of a certain number of divisions of the Dhamma, (according to) nouns, gender, and inflections, and also according to sections and to the composition?” –
“It has been taught, o king, and has been numbered by the kinsman of the Sun; it is well divided, well promulgated, well explained, well taught, –
accompanied by reasons and replete with sense, well spoken without a fault: fixed attention, right exertion, the (magical) powers, the (five) organs (of spiritual life), –
the (ten) powers, the requisites for attaining supreme knowledge, and those leading to the supreme path, all of these are well divided and well taught: these are the seven divisions of the most excellent elements of supreme knowledge.
The doctrine preached by the Teacher, the highest among men,  the supreme, transcendent Truth which has been expanded and well divided, consists of nine Aṅgas.
Full eighty-four thousand sections of the Doctrine have been taught by the kinsman of the Sun out of compassion for created beings.
He has preached the highest Truth, the most excellent ambrosia, which frees from transmigration, which is the path leading to the extinction of all suffering and an ambrosia-like medicine.”
After hearing the speech pronounced by the Congregation of the Bhikkhus, the king, the chief of men, filled with joy and mirth, wisdom having arisen in his mind, pronounced these words to his royal court:
“Full and complete eighty-four thousand most precious sections of the Truth have been taught by the most excellent Buddha; –
I will build eighty-four thousand monasteries, honouring each single section of the Truth by one monastery.”
The prince expending ninety-six koṭis of treasure, he the king, gave immediately on that same day the order (for the erection of the buildings).
At that time there were in Jambudīpa eighty-four (thousand) towns; near each town he built one monastery.
And having completed the monasteries in three years’ time, (the construction of) the Ārāmas being finished, the prince held during seven days a festival of offerings.
Again, the holy, glorious Sambuddha (once) dwelt near the most excellent capital of Kosala, in the garden of Sudatta (Anāthapiṇḍika).
In this Jetavana garden Buddha, the light-giving king of the Truth, looking all over the world, saw beautiful Tambapaṇṇi.
When five years had elapsed (after he had attained Buddhahood), he went to the country of Tambapaṇṇi. By dispelling the Avaruddhaka (demons) he (once) himself had made the island empty.
(But) now the mountain serpents and the sea serpents fought a battle in the island, having arranged their arrays on both sides, an awful struggle.
All those Nāgas possessed great (magical) powers, all were frightfully venomous, all were wicked and violent, furious and filled with desire.
The Serpents were quick and excessively powerful, corrupt, cruel, and harsh, hasty, given to anger, longing for destruction (?).
Powerful Mahodara and resplendent Cūḷodara, both were valiant, both had an exceedingly brilliant appearance.
No one saw a way how peaceably to compose that struggle (?). Mahodara whose fierceness was furiously excited by pride, was destroying the island with its mountains and its forests: “I will kill all hostile serpents.”
Cūḷodara, filled with pride, roared: “May thousand koṭis of Nāgas approach; I will slay all them who dare to enter the battle; I will change the island, all its hundred yojanas, into one desert.”
The Serpents whose venomous fury could not be restrained, who possessed high (magical) powers, raged and sent forth flames (sent forth smoke and flames?); the Serpent kings, infatuated with anger, incited them to destroy the foes (who opposed them) in the battle.
Buddha, the blessed wanderer through the world, when he perceived the anger of the Serpent kings, (and saw) that the island was being destroyed, thought, in order to prevent this, many kind thoughts, for the sake of the highest bliss of (men) and gods.
(He thus reflected:) “If I do not go (to Laṅkā), the Serpents will not  become happy; the island will be destroyed, and there will be no welfare in future time.
Out of compassion for the Nāgas, for the sake of happiness (of men) I shall go there; may the happiness of the island prosper (?).
I perceive the excellent qualities of Laṅkādīpa; the Serpents shall not destroy the island from which I formerly have driven out the Yakkhas, and to which I have done good.”
Speaking thus the Sambuddha rose from his seat; he who possessed the gift of (supernatural) vision, left the Gandhakuṭī, and stood in the door (of the Jetavana garden).
All the gods who resided in the trees of the Jetavana garden, offered their services to him: “Let us go (with thee, o Sage who art) possessed of (supernatural) vision.”
(Buddha replied:) “Nay, remain ye all, Samiddhi alone may go (with me).” (Samiddhi) went, taking up the tree (where his residence was,) and holding it from behind (over Buddha’s head).
Samiddhi, when he heard what Buddha had said, was delighted; he took up the tree, roots and all, and followed the Tathāgata.
The highly powerful king of gods gave shade to the Sambuddha, the highest among men, and held (the tree) from behind over the most excellent Buddha.
The highest of men went to the place where the Nāgas fought their battle; the merciful Teacher (there) stood in the middle of both noble Nāgas.
Going through the air over the heads of both Nāgas, the Sambuddha, the chief of the world, produced a deep, terrifying darkness.
There arose a thick darkness, caused by the great (magical) power of the lion (among men); he was covered and veiled (?) by the darkness, and the tree too (?).
The frightened, terrified Nāgas did not see each other, nor did they see the Jina (?), (or) to what side they should direct their attacks.
They all forsook the battle, threw down their weapons, and stood all with clasped hands, paying reverence to the Sambuddha.
When (Buddha) perceived that they were struck with horror, when he saw that the Nāgas were terrified, he sent forth his thoughts of kindness towards  them, and emitted a warm ray of light.
A great sight it was, astonishing and terrifying; they all saw the Sambuddha like the bright moon in the sky.
Standing there, resplendent with all the six colours, shining in the air, illuminating the ten regions (of the world), he thus addressed the Nāgas:
“From what cause, o great king, did this contention among the Nāgas arise? Out of compassion towards yourself I have come speedily hither.”
(They replied:) “This Nāga Cūḷodara and that Nāga Mahodara, the maternal uncle and the nephew, are quarrelling with each other, desirous of treasure.”
The Sambuddha addressed a speech full of compassion to the savage Nāgas: “Anger which arises in the mind of the fool, begins small, and grows great.
For what reason do you undergo, all these many Nāgas, great suffering? Destroy that small throne, but do not destroy each other. Destroying one the other you are going to cause an unheard of destruction of life.”
Then he who possessed the gift of (supernatural) vision, agitated the Nāgas by (the description of) the sufferings in hell; he unfolded to them the (laws of) birth in the worlds of men and devas, and the nature of Nibbāna.
As the Sambuddha, the highest of men, thus preached the true doctrine, all the Nāgas, casting themselves down, propitiated the Tathāgata.
All the Nāgas (then) came together, the Serpents reconciled themselves to each other, and all took their refuge (in Buddha), eighty koṭis of living beings.
The two Nāga (kings), for the sake of restoring peace, took that most excellent throne (and thus spoke to Buddha:) “Accept this throne out of compassion, (o Sage who art) gifted with (supernatural) vision.”
The Sambuddha who possessed the gift of (supernatural) vision, accepted it by remaining silent. When they understood that he had accepted it, the two great Serpents were delighted.
(They thus addressed Buddha:) “May the blessed One sit down on this splendid, noble Veḷuriya throne which the Nāgas were longing for.”
The  Nāgas placed that throne in the midst of the two islands. There, on that throne, the light-giving king of the Truth sat down.
When those eighty koṭis of Nāgas had propitiated the Sambuddha, the Nāgas there served to him a meal, food and drink.
When he had removed his hands from the bowl, the eighty koṭis of Nāgas, surrounding him, sat down near the supreme Buddha.
At the mouth of the Kalyāṇī river there lived a Naga together with his children and with a great retinue of Nāgas; his name was Maṇiakkhika.
(He was) full of faith, and had taken his refuge (in Buddha), a true and righteous believer. When he came to that assembly of Nāgas, his faith still increased.
When this Nāga perceived the Buddha’s power, his compassion, and the fear of the Serpents (?), he bowed to him, sat down, and thus entreated the Tathāgata:
“Out of compassion to this island thou hast first dispelled the Yakkhas; this kindness towards the Nāgas is thy second act of compassion towards the Island.
May the holy, great Sage show his compassion still another time; I shall attend and do service to thee.”
Having heard what the Nāga said, Buddha, full of compassion for created beings, the blessed One, accepted (his invitation,) for showing kindness to Laṅkādīpa.
Having sat on the throne, the light-giver arose; the Sage then rested during the midday time in the interior of the island.
In the interior of the island the supreme light spent the day; he who possessed the gift of (supernatural) vision, entered upon the Brahmavihāra meditation.
At evening time the Jina thus spoke to the Nāgas: “Let the throne remain here; may the Khīrapāla tree  station itself here. Worship, o Nāgas, all of you this tree and the throne.”
Having spoken thus, and preached to the Serpents, and given them that sacred object used by (himself), the Sambuddha returned to the Jetavana.
Again, in the eighth year (after Buddha had reached Sambodhi), the Nāga king Maṇiakkhika invited the great hero together with five hundred Bhikkhus.
(These Bhikkhus) whose senses were subdued, who possessed the high (magical) powers, surrounded the Sambuddha; the Sage rose up into the air in the Jetavana, and proceeding through the air, he came to Laṅkā, to the mouth of the Kalyāṇī river.
All the Serpents constructed a pavilion of precious stones on the ground, and covered it with garments of different colours, with divine clothes.
(There were) ornaments of various precious stones, various blossoms of many descriptions, many flags of various colours; the pavilion was adorned in many ways.
They spread (cloth over the) entire (floor) and prepared seats; (then) they introduced the Fraternity with Buddha at its head, and invited them to sit down.
Sitting down together with five hundred Bhikkhus, the Sambuddha entered upon ecstatic meditations; he diffused (the rays of) his kindness to all quarters (of the horizon).
Seven times Buddha together with his pupils attained mystical trance; at that place (subsequently) the Mahāthūpa was built, the most excellent Cetiya.
The Nāga king Maṇiakkhika distributed a great donation (to the Bhikkhus). Having accepted the donation of that Nāga, having taken food, and gladdened (the Nāgas by preaching to them,) the Sambuddha together with his pupils rose up into the air.
At the place of the Dīghavāpi Cetiya, Buddha, he who was full of compassion to the world, descended from the air and again entered upon mystical meditation.
Having arisen from the trance at that place, the light-giving king of the Truth together with his pupils, wandering through the air, then proceeded to the place where the Bo tree was to be stationed in the Mahāmeghavana garden.
The Bo trees of three former Buddhas (there also) had been established on the ground; to that place he went, and there he entered upon meditation.
(He thus prophesied:) “Three Bo trees (have stood) at this place at (the time of) the teaching of  three Buddhas; my Bo tree also will stand on this very spot in future time.”
The highest being, the chief of men, having arisen from that meditation together with his pupils, went to the delightful Meghavana garden.
There also he plunged himself in meditation together with his pupils. Having arisen from that meditation, the light-giver proclaimed:
“This place first Kakusandha, the chief of the world, has accepted, sitting down on this spot where a throne has been erected.
This place secondly Konāgamana, the chief of men, has ....
This place thirdly Kassapa, the chief of the world, has …
Myself, Sambuddha Gotama, the descendant of the Sakya tribe, the chief of men, have attained (trance), seated on this spot, where a throne is to be erected.”
The prince (Asoka) fitted out a great army consisting of four parts, and then went forth, taking with  him a branch of the Bo tree of the Tathāgata.
Having passed through three kingdoms and the Viñjha range, having passed through the great forest, the prince came to the ocean.
The great four-fold army with the Bhikkhuni congregation at its head (?), proceeded to the great sea, carrying the excellent Bo tree.
When (the Bo branch) was carried to the sea, on high the musical instruments of the gods (were heard,) and below those of men, the instruments of men from all four quarters.
Prince Piyadassana bowing paid his reverence to the Bo tree, and spoke thus:
“Learned, possessed of (magical) power, virtuous, most firm …”
The prince then (when the Bo branch had been despatched) wept, shed tears, and looked (on the parting vessel). Then he returned and came to his residence.
The Nimmita Nāgas in the water, the Nimmita Devas in the heavens, the Nimmita Devas in the tree (itself), and (the Nāgas) of the Nāga world, –
they all surrounded the most excellent branch of the Bo tree which was carried away. The wild Pisācas, the Bhūtas, Kumbhaṇḍas, and Rakkhasas, these non-human beings surrounded the branch of the Bo tree as it approached.
The Tāvatiṁsas and Yāmas and also the Tusita gods, the Nimmānarati gods and the Vasavatti gods –
(were) glad, joyful and delighted, when the Bo branch approached. And all the Tettiṁsa Devaputtas with Inda as their leader, –
snapped their fingers and laughed when the Bo branch approached. The four (divine) Mahārājas of the four quarters (of the horizon), Kuvera and Dhataraṭṭha, Virūpakkha and Virūḷhaka, surrounded the Sambodhi tree which was carried to the island of Laṅkā.
Mahāmukhas and kettle-drums, Divillas (?), leather-covered drums, and tabors (resounded); the gods joyfully shouted “Sādhu” when the Bo branch approached.
Pāricchattaka flowers, celestial Mandārava flowers, and celestial sandal powder rained through the air, and the gods did homage to the Bo branch when it approached.
The gods offered on the ocean to the Bo tree of the Teacher  Campaka flowers, Salla, Nimba, Nāga, Punnāga, Ketaka flowers.
The Nāga kings, the Nāga princesses, the young Nāgas, great crowds, left their residence and showed honour to the excellent Bo branch.
The Nāgas, dressed in garments of various colours and wearing ornaments of various colours, joyfully sported around the great Bodhi on the ocean (shouting:) “Hail to us.”
The Nāgas offered to the Bo branch on the glittering ocean red, white and blue lotuses of various kinds, Atimutta of honey-sweet scent, Takkārika and Kovilāra flowers, trumpet flowers, and quantities of Bimbajāla flowers, Asoka and Sāla flowers mixed with Piyaṅgu.
The delighted Nāga virgins, the joyful Nāga kings, (all the) Nāgas joyfully sported around the Bo branch which was carried along, (shouting:) “Hail to us.”
There the ground consisted of gems, and was covered with pearls and crystals; there were gardens and tanks adorned with various flowers.
Having remained there seven days, (the Nāgas) together with gods and men paid honour to the excellent Bo branch on its departure from their residence.
The Nāga virgins and the gods, surrounding the Sambodhi branch, (offered) strings of garlands and flower wreaths, and waved their garments.
The gods sported around the Bodhi which was carried along, (shouting:) “Hail.” Pāricchattaka flowers, celestial Mandārava flowers, and celestial sandal powder rained through the air.
The Nāgas, Yakkhas, and Bhūtas, together with gods and men, surrounded the Sambodhi branch which was carried along on the ocean.
There, surrounding the Bo branch, they danced, sung, played (instruments), laughed, and snapped the fingers of both hands.
The Nāgas, Yakkhas, and Bhūtas, together with gods and men, when the most excellent Bodhi was carried along, exclaimed: “Oh auspicious event, hail.”
Beautiful Nāgas of brilliantly blue colour, holding flags, praised the most excellent Bodhi which was being established in the island of Laṅkā.
Great crowds, the prince with the queens, left the delightful (town of) Anurādhapura, and went to meet  the Sambodhi tree.
The prince together with his sons surrounded the Sambodhi tree; they offered scented garlands and most excellent perfumes (?).
The streets were well swept and offerings were prepared. When the Bodhi was established, the earth quaked.
The king appointed eight (persons of each class?) and the chiefs of each of eight warrior clans (?) to be Bodhi guards (?), for the custody of the most excellent Bodhi.
He fitted them out with great state, and bestowed on them beautiful ornaments of every description; out of reverence for the Bo branch he ordered sixteen great lines to be traced on the ground (?).
Then he caused also pure white sand (?) to be scattered on that spot where the great lines had been drawn. He appointed one thousand families …
He bestowed on them golden drums for the performance of the rites of royal coronations and other festivals. He gave (to them) one province and erected (for them) the Candagutta (palace?) –
(and) the Devagutta palace, (and) duly (bestowed on them) land donations (?); to other families he gave the revenue of villages.
The five hundred high-born, illustrious virgins of the royal court who were free from passion and steadfast, all received the Pabbajjā ordination.
The five hundred virgins who surrounded Anulā, who were free from passion and steadfast, all received the Pabbajjā ordination.
Prince Ariṭṭha, released from the chain of fear, received the Pabbajjā ordination according to the doctrine of the Jina, together with five hundred companions. All these persons attained Arahatship and full perfection in the doctrine of the Jina.
In the first month of the winter season, when the tree was full of blossoms, the great Bo branch was brought (hither) and established in Tambapaṇṇi.
Abhaya’s twentieth year having elapsed, Pakuṇḍa had completed his twentieth year. Pakuṇḍaka was crowned when the thirty-seventh year from his birth had elapsed.
After Abhaya’s twentieth year Pakuṇḍaka lived as a robber; seventeen years later he put to death seven of his maternal uncles, and received the royal coronation in the town of Anurādhapura.
When ten years (of his reign) had elapsed and sixty years (of it) were still to follow, be fixed the boundaries of the villages and completely tranquillized (the country).
Enjoying sovereignty both over men and Yakkhas, Pakuṇḍa reigned during full seventy years.
The son of Pakuṇḍa was the prince called Muṭasīva; this king reigned sixty years over Tambapaṇṇi.
There were then ten brothers, the sons of Muṭasīva: Abhaya, Tissa, and Nāga, Utti together with Mattābhaya, Mitta, Siva, and Asela, Tissa, and Kira completing the number of ten, and princess Anulā and Sīvalā, the daughters of Muṭasīva.
When eight years of Ajātasattu had elapsed, Vijaya came hither; after the fourteenth year of Udaya, Vijaya expired. After the sixteenth year of Udaya, they crowned Paṇḍuvāsa.
In the interval between the two kings Vijaya and Paṇḍuvāsa, Tambapaṇṇi was without a king during one year.
In the twenty-first year of Nāgadāsa, Paṇḍuvāsa died, and they crowned Abhaya in the twenty-first year of Nāgadāsa.
...seventeen years;  twenty-four …
In the fourteenth year of Candagutta the king called Pakuṇḍaka died; in the fourteenth year of Candagutta  they crowned Muṭasīva.
Seventeen years had elapsed after the coronation of Asoka, then Muṭasīva died.
When seventeen years of that king (that is, Asoka) and six months of the next year had elapsed, in the second month of the winter season, under the most auspicious Nakkhatta of Asāḷhā, Devānampiya was installed in the kingdom of Tambapaṇṇi.
At the foot of the Chāta mountain three bamboo poles were to be found. (The first was) white like silver; its creeper shone like gold.
There was also (the second), the flower pole, (whereon most beautiful,) delightful (figures) like the shapes of flowers (presented themselves), dark blue, yellow, red, pure white, and black; and so also (the third), the bird-pole on which birds (appeared), each with its natural colours, and also quadrupeds.
The eight descriptions of pearls (also presented themselves), viz. the horse pearl, the elephant pearl, the chariot pearl, the myrobalan pearl, the bracelet pearl, the signet pearl, the Kakubha pearl, the Sadisa (Pākatika?) pearl.
When Devānampiya had succeeded to the throne, (the people,) moved by the splendour of his coronation, brought the three kinds of gems from the Malaya country, the three bamboo poles from the foot of the Chāta hill, and the eight kinds of pearls from the sea-shore.
Great crowds brought in the space of seven days, in consequence of Devānampiya’s merit, the gems which were produced in Malaya and which were worthy of a king.
When the king saw these costly, precious treasures, the unequalled, incomparable, wonderful, rare treasures, –
he spoke with a heart full of joy: “I am high-born, noble, the chief of men; such is the reward of my righteous deeds; look at the treasures I have gained, which are worth many lacs and are produced in consequence of my merit. Who is worthy to receive the donation of these treasures, –
my mother or my father, a brother, relations, friends, or companions?” Thus meditating the king remembered prince Asoka.
Devānampiyatissa and Dhammāsoka, the master of men, were both intimate friends, united by faithful  affection, though they never had seen each other.
“I have a dear ally, the ruler of Jambudīpa, the righteous Asokadhamma, a friend dear as my life.
He is worthy to receive from me the gift of these treasures, and I also am worthy to present unto him the treasure of these most precious ornaments (?).
Arise, my dear (?)  quickly take these treasures, go to Jambudīpa, to the city called Puppha(pura), and present these most precious treasures to Asoka, my ally.”
Mahāariṭṭha, Sāla, the Brāhmaṇa Parantapabbata, the astrologer Puttatissa, these four men were the messengers despatched by Devānampiya.
Devānampiya sent the three resplendent gems, the eight excellent pearls, and the three (bamboo poles which had the size of) chariot poles, besides a collection of the most precious chanks, together with many valuable objects.
The king sent his minister Sāla and his commander-in-chief Ariṭṭha, Parantapabbata, and his astrologer Puttatissa, who were delighted (?) (with this service).
(Asoka in return sent) a royal parasol, a ... of Sāra wood (?), a diadem, ear ornaments, water from the Ganges, and an (anointing) vase, a chank trumpet, and a palanquin, –
a right hand chank, a virgin, all that being worthy (?) of a royal coronation; a suit (a koṭi?) of clothes which are (cleansed by being passed through the fire) without being washed,  costly towels, –
most precious yellow sandal wood, and measures of rouge, yellow, and emblic myrobalan; and therewith he sent this message:
“The Buddha is the best among those who are worthy of presents, the Faith is the best of all things which refer to the extinction of the passions, and the Saṅgha is the best field of merit: these are the three best objects in the world of men and Devas.
To this (triad) I, the prince, pay my reverence for the sake of the highest bliss.”
Those four messengers having sojourned five months (in Pāṭaliputta, departed,) taking away the presents sent by Asokadhamma, –
and arrived in this island from Jambudīpa on the twelfth day of the increasing moon in the month of Vesākha. The requisites for the coronation having been sent by Asokadhamma, –
they celebrated a second coronation of king Devānampiya. This second coronation took place on the full moon day of the month of Vesākha; –
one month after that day, on the full moon day of the month of Jeṭṭha, Mahinda arrived in this island from Jambudīpa together with his six companions.
I will set forth the history of Buddha’s coming to the Island, of the arrival of the relic and of the Bo (branch), of the doctrine of the teachers who made the recensions (of Dhamma and Vinaya), of the propagation of the Faith in the Island, of the arrival of the chief of men (Vijaya); listen.
Listen attentively to (the history proclaimed by) me, which inspires joy and delight, which causes serenity and gladdens the mind, which comprises many various forms.
With elated minds, satisfied, delighted and joyful, attentively receive the faultless, auspicious discourse.
Listen all, giving your minds (to the subject); I will proclaim a history, handed down from generation to generation, highly praised, adorned in many ways, joined together in this (work), just as flowers of various kinds (form a garland).
Attend to this incomparable praise of the Island (Ceylon), which dwells upon the most excellent successions (of teachers and kings), which is new and unrivalled and well narrated, which has been handed down by Saints, which is praised by all good men and revered by the holy ones.
On the immovable, firm, unshaken throne, a place worthy of the eminent one, the highest of men sat down, establishing himself in the four branches (of fortitude).
Seated on this most excellent throne, at the foot of  the king of trees, the chief of men, the highest among human beings, like a fearless lion, did not tremble, when he saw Māra with the hosts of his army.
Having overcome the dispute of Māra and put him to flight together with his army, the Conqueror, full of joy, wise, tranquil, and steadfast, –
mastered the state of meditation which consists in spiritual insight, and the thorough perfection of attention, (and also the knowledge of) many various qualities, distinguished by manifold attributes.
Mastering the knowledge of former existences and the gift of supernatural vision, the enlightened great Sage spent three watches of the night.
Thereafter, in the last watch, he revolved (in his mind) the causes of existence; the glorious One fixed the mind on them in direct and reverse order.
Having thoroughly understood the Dhamma, the highly wise One, who had reached emancipation by the destruction of human passions, taught (created beings) the abandonment (of temporal obstacles) and the attainment of the path (to sanctification).
The great Sage obtained (“abhisambuddha”) the most excellent knowledge of omniscience. Thus first arose the title “Buddha, Buddha”.
Having penetrated all qualities and uttered his proclamation (of triumph) , the light-giver then spent seven days on that most excellent throne.
He in whom all fear had ceased, who had performed his duties and was free from sin, delighted, glad, and joyful, thought many kind thoughts.
In one moment, in one instant a Buddha surveys the whole world; he unveiled his fivefold power of vision and looked down over many people.
The highest of men sent forth the irresistible power of his knowledge; the stainless teacher then saw the most excellent Laṅkādīpa, –
an exquisite country, endowed with a beautiful climate, fertile, a mine of treasures, which had been visited by former Buddhas and had been inhabited by multitudes of Saints.
Perceiving the most excellent island of Laṅkā, a fertile region, a dwelling-place  fit for Saints, the compassionate One who well understood the right and wrong time, thus thought:
“In the present time Yakkhas, Bhūtas and Rakkhasas (inhabit) Laṅkādīpa, who are all too low for (adopting the doctrine of) the Buddhas; their power I can outroot.
Having driven out the hosts of Yakkhas, the Pisācas and Avaruddhakas, I will establish peace in the island and cause it to be inhabited by men.
Let those wicked beings fully live out their span of life; (afterwards) there, in the most excellent Laṅkādīpa, an opportunity will arise for (the propagation of) the Faith.
Having removed (those) beings, having comforted many people and taught them the way, the road, the path of Saints, –
I shall reach complete Parinibbāna like the setting sun. Four months after my Parinibbāna the first convocation will be held …;
a hundred and eighteen years later  the third convocation will take place, for the sake of the propagation of the Faith.
Then there will be a ruler over this Jambudīpa, a highly virtuous, glorious monarch known as Dhammāsoka.
This king Asoka will have a son, a clever man, Mahinda, the learned converter of Laṅkādīpa.”
Having foreseen these circumstances which were full of importance, (and understanding) the right and wrong time, the blessed Buddha placed a (divine) guard over this island.
The Jina, having performed his various duties during the seven-times seven days (at the following places, that is) the throne, the Animisa (Cetiya), the cloister, the jewel-house, the Ajapāla and Mucalinda trees, and seventhly near the Khirapāla grove, the hero went to Bārāṇasī in order to establish the kingdom of the Truth.
When he established the kingdom of the Truth and preached the most excellent Truth, the conversion of eighteen koṭis of beings took place.
Kondañña, Bhaddiya, Vappa, Mahānāma, and Assaji, these five great Theras attained emancipation when  he had preached the Anattalakkhaṇa discourse.
Residing in Bārāṇasī, in Isipatana, the Jina released the four friends of Yasa and, besides, the fifty youths.
Having spent the rainy season in Bārāṇasī, the Tathāgata released in the Kappāsika grove the [thirty] Bhaddavaggiyas.
Wandering thence from place to place, he came to Uruvelā; there the stainless Teacher saw Uruvelakassapa, an ascetic of the Jaṭila sect.
In the room where Kassapa kept his sacred fire, the highest of men conquered a serpent. Witnessing this miracle they all invited the Tathāgata:
“Reside here, o Gotama, during the four winter months; we will daily provide you with rice.”
The Tathāgata, the chief of men, residing during the winter in Uruvelā, devoted himself to the conversion of the Jaṭilas together with their followers.
(Once, during that period,) both Aṅgas and Magadhas prepared a great sacrifice. (Kassapa), seeing that great gains (could be obtained) at this sacrifice, conceived the following ignoble thought:
“The great Samaṇa possesses high (magical) powers and great faculties; if he shall perform miracles or preach in the great assembly, the fee will escape me and go to Gotama. Well, the great Samaṇa should not appear in the assembly.”
The Tathāgata understands action and resolution, intention and desire, the sixteen constituent parts of thought.
Having understood the thought of the Jaṭila, the Sage, who looks through the minds of other men, went by his high (magical) power to (Uttara-) Kurudīpa collecting alms.
Near the Anotatta lake Buddha took his meal; there he gave himself up to meditation (jhāna) and compassionate thoughts.
With his Buddha-eye, the highest in the world looked over the universe; the stainless Teacher (then) saw the most excellent Laṅkādīpa.
At that time the ground of Laṅkā was covered with great forests and full of horrors; frightful, cruel, blood-thirsty Yakkhas of various kinds, –
and savage, furious, pernicious Pisācas of various shapes and full of various (wicked) thoughts, all had assembled together.
“I shall go there, in their midst;  I shall dispel the Rakkhasas and put away the Pisācas; men shall be masters (of the island).”
Having considered this matter, full of compassion, the great hero rose into the air and came hither from Jambudīpa.
In the midst of the assembly of Yakkhas, above their heads, he was seen, standing in the air, holding his seat (in his hands).
The assembled hosts of Yakkhas saw the Sambuddha standing there, but they did not think that he was the Buddha; they supposed him to be another Yakkha.
On the bank of the river, near Mahiya Pokkhala, on the site of the Subhaṅgana Thūpa, there the highest of men stood, and entered upon the highest ecstatic meditation.
The Sage, the awakener of quick attention, speedily entered upon that meditation (by revolving) in a moment by one thought (the whole system of qualities). Suddenly he thence rose; he who had reached (all) perfections by his virtuous resolutions, … finished his meditation.
There the hero stood, performing miracles by his (magical) power, like a Yakkha of high (magical) power and great (supernatural) faculties; gathering (?) thick clouds, containing thousands of rain drops, he sent rain, cold winds, and darkness.
(He then spoke to the Yakkhas:) “I will send you heat; give unto me a place where I may sit down. I possess such power over the fire as will dispel these dangers.”
(The Yakkhas replied: “If thou art able to dispel them, sit down wherever thou likest; we all consent; show thy power over the fire.”
(Buddha replied:) “You all ask me for warmth; I shall quickly produce the great heat which you are desiring, a fierce, burning fire.”
As the sun shines in summer at noon, so fearful heat penetrated the assembly of Yakkhas.
Like the heat spread by the four suns at the end of a Kappa, such and greater still was the glow sent forth by the seat of the Teacher.
As the rising sun cannot be restrained in the sky, thus (Buddha’s) carpet  of skin cannot be restrained in the air.
The carpet diffused great heat, like the fire at the end of the Kappa, as the sun (scorches) the earth,  or like a great flame of fire.
Diffusing heat like a heap of burning coals, the carpet appeared similar to a cloud, or to a glowing iron mountain.
It spread insupportable heat over the islands. The Yakkhas quickly fled in all ten directions, to the east, the west, the south, the north, above, and beneath.
“Whither shall we go for safety and refuge? How shall we be released from this fearful being?
If this powerful Yakkha assumes the form of the fiery element, and burns us, all of us Yakkhas will perish like a handful of chaff, like dust blown away by the wind.”
And Buddha, the chief among Sages, the bringer of happiness, the compassionate, merciful great Sage, when he saw the afflicted, frightened Yakkhas, thought how to administer joy to the minds of these non-human beings.
(He) then (thought of) another island, similar to this, with low ground and high ground, with many various aspects, beautifully adorned by rivers, mountains, and lakes, the island of Giri, most similar to the country of Laṅkā.
(It was) free from danger, well protected, surrounded by the ocean, full of excellent food and rich grain, with a well tempered climate, a green, grassy land, the beautiful island of Giri, superior to this (island).
It was charming and delightful, green and cool, adorned by gardens and forests, exquisite; there were trees, full of blossoms and fruits; it was empty and solitary, subject to no master.
(It was situated) in the great sea, in the midst of the ocean and of the deep waters, where the waves incessantly break; around it there was a chain of mountains, towering, difficult to pass; to enter it against the wish (of the inhabitants) was difficult.
Full of desire and anger towards other beings, backbiting, pitiless, given to injuring other beings, cruel and furious, violent, merciless, ...
(Buddha thus spoke:) “Ye Rakkhasas and ye wicked hosts of Yakkhas, I give unto you this island which is not far from Laṅkā, the whole old island of Giri; may they all inhabit it and multiply undisturbed.
This country of Laṅkā is a residence inhabited by men since remote Kappas;  may many men dwell in the country of Laṅkā, as they did in former times in the Oja, Vara, and Maṇḍa island.
Adorned with these and other good qualities, a residence fit for men, auspicious in many ways, it will shine among the islands, when the Doctrine will have been brought there, like the full moon in the sky at the time of Uposatha.”
Weighing the prosperity and the high happiness of the two, the Sage who knew all worlds, interchanged the two islands and the two (kinds of beings), men and Rakkhasas, (as a peasant) easily (interchanges) his pairs of bullocks.
Gotama by his (magical) power drew the island towards himself, like the headstalls of bullocks which are drawn (towards the driver) with a strong rope. The Sage drew together one island towards the other, like two ships which are surrounded by stout ropes.
Having joined the beautiful island to the other, the Tathāgata transported (?) the Rakkhasas, (saying:) “May all Rakkhasas dwell in Giridīpa . . ”
The eager Yakkhas ran to Giridīpa, like thirsty people in summer to a river; they all entered it never to return; the Sage (then) restored the island to its former place.
The highly satisfied Yakkhas and the highly pleased Rakkhasas, having received this excellent island which they desired, all began to laugh with great joy, and all went to celebrate the festival called Nakkhattamaha.
When Buddha saw that joy had been restored to these non-human beings, he the Jina, having exerted his benevolence towards them, pronounced the spell of protection. Having walked three times round the island, for the sake of its ever-lasting protection and the expulsion of the Yakkha hosts, –
having comforted the Pisācas and (other) non-human beings, having established a guard and restored a lasting peace, having put down all distress in the island, the Tathāgata returned to Uruvelā.
 The king (Duṭṭhagāmani) built an exceedingly costly, quadrangular palace (the Lohapāsāda) of nine stories in height, at an expense of thirty koṭis.
(He also erected the Mahāthūpa, at the foundation of which the following materials were used:) chunnam work, great stones, clay, bricks, pure earth, a plate of iron, then marumba,  –
small gravel, eight layers (?) of stones, twelve (layers?) of crystal and silver.
After the prince had caused these foundations to be laid, the Fraternity of Bhikkhus was called together, and the circle (of the base) of the Cetiya was described.
Indagutta, Dhammasena, the great preacher Piyadassī, Buddha, Dhamma, and Saṅgha, wise Mittanna, –
Anattana, Mahādeva, learned Dhammarakkhita, Uttara, and Cittagutta, and clever Indagutta, –
the great chief Suriyagutta of prompt wisdom, all these fourteen (Theras) came from Jambudīpa to this country (when the foundation of the Mahāthūpa was laid).
(Besides these there were present) Siddhattha, Maṅgala, Sumana, Paduma, and also Sīvalī, Candagutta, and Suriyagutta, Indagutta, and Sāgara, Mittasena, Jayasena, and Acala, the twelfth of them.
(The person that held the circle by which the base of the Thūpa was described, and his parents, had the following auspicious names, viz.:) Suppatiṭṭhitabrahmā, the son, Nandisena, the father, Sumanadevī, the mother, these three lay persons.
(The king constructed) the Mahāthūpa, the most excellent Mahāvihāra, expending twenty (twenty-four?) invaluable treasures.
(King Lajjitissa,) having heard the precepts for the conduct of itinerant Bhikkhus, which were propounded by the Fraternity, gave medicaments for the itinerant Bhikkhus, for the sake of their comfort, ...
Having heard the well-spoken speech of the Bhikkhunīs, which had been delivered at the ... time (at Harikāla?), the royal lord gave to the Bhikkhunīs whatever they desired.
He constructed the Silāthūpa, a Vihāra on the Cetiya mountain, and the most excellent assembly hall which is called Jalaka.
(By the next king, Vaṭṭagāmaṇi, a monastery) was constructed at the place where the Nigaṇṭha Giri had dwelt. (From this circumstance,) the appellation and the name of Abhayagiri derived its origin.
The five kings Ālavatta (Pulahattha!), and Sābhiya (Bāhiya!), Panaya, Palaya, and Dāṭhika reigned fourteen years and seven months.
Prince Abhaya (Vaṭṭagāmaṇi), the son of Saddhātissa, put the Damila Dāṭhika to death and became king.
He erected the Abhayagiri (monastery) between the Silāthūpa and the Cetiya. This prince reigned twelve years and five months.
The seven champions of Abhaya constructed five Ārāmas. Uttiya and Sāliya, Mūla, Tissa, and Pabbata, Deva, and Uttara, these were the seven  champions (of that king).
The (warrior) called Uttiya constructed the (monastery) called the Dakkhiṇavihāra, Sāliya the Sāliyārāma, Mūla the Mūlāsaya, –
Pabbata the Pabbatārāma, Tissa constructed the Tissārāma, Deva and Uttara constructed the Devāgāra.
The son of Kākavaṇṇa, Mahātissa, the ruler of the earth, made an agreement to work for wages in the paddy fields, and gave (the money) to the tranquil, thoughtful Thera Summa.
Having made an agreement for full three years’ labour at a (sugar-) mill, he bestowed a great donation of a thousand koṭis on the Bhikkhus.
Wise, enlightened Abhaya Duṭṭhagāmani, after having performed meritorious deeds, entered after the dissolution of his (human) body, the body of a Tusita god.
The daughter of the Sakka prince Paṇḍu, the princess called Kaccānā, came over hither from Jambudīpa in order to preserve the dynasty.
She was crowned as the queen-consort of Paṇḍuvāsa; from this marriage eleven children were born:
Abhaya, Tissa, and Utti, Tissa, and Asela the fifth, Vibhāta, Rāma, and Siva, Matta together with Mattakala.
The youngest of them was a daughter known by the name of Cittā; because she fascinated the hearts of the men who saw her, she was called Ummādacittā (fascinating Cittā).
(Paṇḍuvāsa) arrived in Upatissagāma in the same year in which he was crowned. This king reigned full thirty years.
There were seven Sākiya princes, the grand-children of Amitodana, born in the family of the Lord of the world: Rāma, Tissa, and Anurādha, Mahāli, Dīghāvu, Rohana, Gāmanī the seventh of them.
The son of Paṇḍuvāsa, prince Abhaya by name, reigned immediately (after his father) twenty years.
The wise son of Dīghāvu, the clever Gāmanī, who attended Paṇḍuvāsa, cohabited with the princess Cittā.
In consequence  of that intercourse the prince called Paṇḍuka was born. Saving his life (from the persecutions of his uncles), (Paṇḍuka) resided in Dovārikamaṇḍala.
a palanquin, a conch trumpet, water from the Ganges, a koṭi of clothes which are (cleansed by being passed through the fire) without being washed, a golden vessel and spoon, costly towels, –
a man’s load of water from the Anotatta lake, most precious yellow sandal wood, a measure of rouge, eye collyrium brought by the Nāgas, –
yellow and emblic myrobalan, costly Amata drugs, one hundred and sixty cart loads of fragrant hill paddy which had been brought by parrots; (all these things being) the rewards for his meritorious actions.
(Besides he sent the following message:) “I have taken my refuge in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha; I have avowed myself a lay pupil of the Doctrine of the Sakyaputta.
Imbue your mind also with the faith in this triad, in the highest religion of the Jina, take your refuge in the Teacher.”
Doing honour (to Devānampiyatissa by) this (commission), Asoka the illustrious despatched the messengers to Devānampiya.  As the messengers had departed, –
many Theras who possessed the great (magical) powers addressed Mahinda, in the most excellent Asokārāma, out of compassion for the country of Laṅkā, (as follows:)
“The time has come to establish the Faith in the island of Laṅkā; go, most virtuous one, convert the island of Laṅkā.”
The wise and learned Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, having heard the speech of the Fraternity, consented together with his companions.
Adjusting his robe so as to cover one shoulder, raising his clasped hands, and saluting them with an inclination of the head, (be said:) “I go to the island of Laṅkā.”
The (prince) called Mahinda became then the chief of that number; Iṭṭhiya and the Thera Uttiya, Bhaddasāla and Sambala, –
and the novice Sumana who was possessed of the six (supernatural) faculties and of the great (magical) powers, those five great Theras being possessed of the (same) six (supernatural) faculties and great (magical) powers, departing from the Asokārāma went forth together with their retinue.
Wandering from place to place they reached Vedissagiri. They sojourned as long as they liked in the monastery of Vedissagiri.
Thera (Mahinda), having instructed his mother (in the doctrine of) the refuges, the moral precepts, and the Uposatha ceremonies, made the inhabitants of the island firm in the true faith and in the religion.
(Once) in the evening, Thera Mahinda, the great teacher, retiring into solitude, reflected whether the time would be favourable or unfavourable (for the conversion of Laṅkā).
Perceiving the thought of the Thera, Sakka the chief of gods appeared to the Thera, and thus addressed him face to face:
“The time has come to thee, great hero, to convert Laṅkādīpa; go quickly to the best of islands out of compassion for created beings.
Go to the most excellent Laṅkādīpa, preach the Dhamma to created beings; proclaim the four Truths, release men from the fetters (of sin); –
make illustrious the doctrine of the supreme Buddha in Laṅkādīpa. Thy (advent)  has been foretold by the Chief (of the Faith); the fraternity of Bhikkhus has elected thee –
and I shall do service to thee at thy arrival in Laṅkādīpa and perform all that is necessary; it is time for thee to depart.”
Having heard the speech of Sakka, Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, reflected (thus): “Bhagavat has rightly prophesied about me, the fraternity of Bhikkhus has elected me, –
and Sakka has exhorted me; I shall establish the Faith; I will go to Tambapaṇṇi; subtle is the people of Tambapaṇṇi, –
(yet) they have not heard of the well proclaimed path which leads to the destruction of all suffering. I shall proclaim it to them; I shall go to the island of Laṅkā.”
Mahinda, the son of Asoka, who well knew the time and the season, having resolved to go to Laṅkā, told his companions (to come). Mahinda was the chief of that number; there were (then) his four fellow pupils, –
the novice Sumana, and the lay-disciple Bhaṇḍuka. To these six men who were endowed with the six (supernatural) faculties, (Mahinda) who possessed the great (magical) powers, thus made known (his intention):
“Let us go now to the extensive, most excellent island of Laṅkā, let us convert many people and establish the Faith.”
Expressing their assent (by exclaiming:) “Be it so”, they all were joyful. (They added:) “It is time, venerable sir, let us go to the mountain called Missaka; the king (Devānampiyatissa) is just leaving the town in order to hunt.”
Sakka, the chief of the gods, was delighted and addressed Thera Mahinda who had retired into solitude, with the following speech:
“Venerable sir, Bhagavat has given this prediction about thee: In future times the Bhikkhu Mahinda will convert the island, he will propagate the religion of the Jina, he will set on foot there the kingdom of Righteousness, he will deliver created beings from great pain, and will establish them on firm ground, he will act for the welfare of many people, for the joy of many people, out of compassion for the world, for the good, for the welfare, and for the joy of gods and men.”
Thus Bhagavat has indicated thee, and now, at the present time, the Thera and the Bhikkhus have charged thee with the conversion of the island. It is time, great hero, to convert the island; the hour has come, great hero, to convert the island; upon thee this task has devolved; bear this burden, convert Tambapaṇṇi, propagate the religion of the Jina. I am thy obedient pupil who gets up before thee and walks behind thee.”
(Mahinda replied:) “I accept what Bhagavat, our Teacher, has said; I will save Tambapaṇṇi, I will show the light (to the island) and cause the splendour of the Jina to increase. (Tambapaṇṇi) is covered and enclosed by the overclouding darkness of ignorance and of (worldly) existence; it is ruined by envy and selfishness; it cannot rise from the delusions which are produced by the fault of idleness; it has entered on a wrong way and goes far astray from the true path; it is exhausted; high born people have become (as it were) people covered with sores, and have become (feeble like) Muñja or Babbaja grass. Tambapaṇṇi has entirely been subdued by obstacles and passions in consequence of the obscurity of error and of the darkness of ignorance and of (worldly) existence; it is covered, pervaded, veiled, overshadowed, and girt round with that great darkness, the obscurity of error.
I shall destroy the darkness of error and throw light on all Tambapaṇṇi, I shall cause to shine the religion of the Jina.” Being thus exhorted by Vāsavinda, the chief of gods, by such a speech, he rose up from his solitude, and having attained to the fullness of resolve, he thus asked for the assent of the fraternity of Bhikkhus:
“Let us go to Tambapaṇṇi; the people of Tambapaṇṇi are subtle; (yet) they have not heard of the well proclaimed path which leads to the destruction of all suffering. I shall proclaim it to them, I shall go to the island of Laṅkā.”
Having resided thirty days on the delightful hill of Vedissa, (they reflected thus:) “It is now time to start; let us go to the best of islands.”
They flew through the air from Jambudīpa, as the king of swans flies in the  air. Having thus risen, the Theras alighted on the best of mountains (Missaka).
To the east of the most excellent town (Anurādhapura), on the cloud-like mountain they stationed themselves, on the top of Missaka, as swans (alight) on the summit of a hill.
The (Thera) called Mahinda was then the chief of that fraternity; Iṭṭhiya, Thera Uttiya, Bhaddasāla, and Sambala, –
the novice Sumana, and the lay-pupil Bhaṇḍuka, all these possessing the great (magical) powers, were the converters of Tambapaṇṇi.
The Thera, rising into the air as the king of swans rises to the sky, stationed himself to the east of the most excellent town on the cloud-like mountain, –
on the top of Missaka, as swans (alight) on the summit of a hill. At that time Devānampiyatissa, the son of Muṭasīva, was king and ruler of Tambapaṇṇi. The eighteenth year had elapsed since the coronation of Asoka, –
and full seven months since the coronation of Tissa, when Mahinda, twelve years (after his Upasampadā ordination), arrived in this island from Jambudīpa.
In the last month of summer, on the full moon day of the month Jeṭṭha, under the asterisms Anurādha and Jeṭṭha, Mahinda at the head of his companions arrived on mount Missaka.
The king, going a-hunting, (also) came to mount Missaka. A god who had assumed the form of an elk appeared to the king.
The king, seeing the elk, quickly rushed on him and running behind him he came to a place enclosed by hills.
There the Yakkha disappeared near the Thera; seeing the Thera sitting there, the king was frightened.
(The Thera reflected:) “As the king is alone, he shall see also me alone lest he should be frightened; when his troops have come up, then he may see the Bhikkhus (also).”
Thera (Mahinda) saw the prince, the protector of the earth, who appeared like a wicked person, going to hunt; he called him by the name of that prince: “Come hither, Tissa”, thus he then addressed him.
(The king thought thus:) “Who is that solitary, bald-headed man without companion, wearing a yellow garment and wrapped in a mantle, who addresses  me in the language of non-human beings?”
(Mahinda replied:) “I whom you ask, o prince, o protector of the earth, am a Samaṇa belonging to the world of men. We are Samaṇas, great king, pupils of the king of Truth; out of compassion towards thee we have repaired hither from Jambudīpa.”
The king laid aside his weapons and seated himself by the side (of Mahinda); having seated himself, the king exchanged greetings with words full of deep meaning.
Having heard the speech of the Thera, he laid aside his weapons; then he approached the Thera, exchanged greetings with him, and sat down.
Gradually the ministers and the troops also arrived; fourty thousand men in number they surrounded (the king and the Theras).
When the troops had come up, the king perceived the (other) seated Theras (and asked:) “Are there many other Bhikkhus, pupils of the universal Buddha?”
“There are many disciples of Buddha, versed in the threefold science, possessed of the (magical) powers, well acquainted with the exposition of the qualities of mind, who have subdued their passions and reached Arahatship.”
After having ascertained by means of the Amba parable that this victorious king was a clever person, (Mahinda) preached to him the most excellent Hatthipada Sutta.
When they had heard that most excellent (portion of the) Doctrine, these forty thousand men took their refuge (with Buddha), like a wise man in whose mind faith has arisen.
Then the king, glad, highly delighted and joyful, addressed the fraternity of Bhikkhus: “Let us proceed to the town, my capital.”
Quickly (Mahinda) converted the pious, learned and wise king called Devānam(piya) together with his army.
Hearing what the king said, Mahinda replied: “Go you, great king; we shall stay here.”
When he had sent away the king, Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, addressed the fraternity of Bhikkhus: “Let us confer the Pabbajjā ordination on Bhaṇḍuka.”
Having heard what the Thera said, they all quickly turning their thoughts (towards  that object) examined the village boundary and conferred the Pabbajjā ordination on Bhaṇḍuka. At the same time he received the Upasampadā ordination and attained Arahatship.
The Thera standing on the top of the mountain said to the charioteer:  “Nay, a chariot is not suitable (to us); the Tathāgata has rejected (its use).”
Having sent away the charioteer, the Theras who had subdued their senses and possessed the great (magical) powers, started through the air, as the king of swans (rises) to the sky. Descending from the sky, they alighted on the ground.
When the charioteer saw them who put on their under garments and dressed themselves in their robes, he joyfully went to tell the king.
When the king had (first) despatched the charioteer, he had thus addressed his ministers: “Erect a pavilion in the town within the precincts of the palace.
The princes and princesses, the queens, and the women of the harem who desire to meet them, may see the Theras who have arrived.”
The high-born ministers, after having heard the speech of the king, constructed in the middle of the precincts of the palace a pavilion canopied with cloth.
A canopy was spread, a clean, white and spotless cloth; it was decorated with flags and shells, and adorned with white strips of cotton.
White sand was scattered, well mixed with white flowers; (such was) the white, decorated hall, similar to the snowy regions (of the skies).
Having decorated the hall with entirely white cloth and having made the floor level, they spoke to the king:
“The well constructed, beautiful hall, great king, is completed; choose now, Sire, seats which are suitable for ascetics.”
At that moment the charioteer arrived announcing to the king: “A chariot, Sire, is not suitable for the Bhikkhu fraternity to sit down (therein).
O wonderful. Sire! all the Theras who possess the great (magical) powers, first remained behind me after having sent me away, (but now)  they have arrived before me.
A high seat and a great seat are not suitable for the Bhikkhus; order a carpet (for them); the Theras approach.”
The king, delighted at hearing the speech of the charioteer, went forth to meet the Theras, and having saluted, he exchanged greetings (with them).
Taking the alms-bowls of the Theras and honouring them with perfumed garlands, the prince together with the Theras arrived at the gate of the royal palace.
The Thera, having entered the hall in the interior apartments of the king, saw the floor strewn (as above described) and the seat covered with cloth.
They sat down on the seats prepared for them which were covered with cloth. When they had seated themselves, the king gave them water, rice-gruel and food, –
and served to them with his own hands a most excellent meal. When the Thera had finished his meal and removed his hand from the bowl, –
(the king) addressed queen Anulā together with the women of the interior apartments: “You know the opportunity, queen; it is time to pay your respects to them (the Theras).”
Queen Anulā, surrounded by five hundred girls, bowed to the Theras and honoured them to her heart’s content.
Having approached the Theras and saluted them, she sat down. (Mahinda) preached to them the Dhamma; the great teacher exposed the fearful Peta stories, –
the Vimāna stories, the Saccasaṁyutta.  When they had heard that most excellent (portion of the) Doctrine, princess Anulā and her five hundred attendants, like a wise man (?) in whose mind faith has arisen, attained the reward of Sotāpatti; this was the first case of the attainment (of a stage of sanctification which occurred in Laṅkā).
Setting aside the kings who reigned in the past kappa, to whatever forms of existence they may have passed, I shall completely enumerate the kings of the present kappa.
Their descent, their name and tribe, their age and (the length of) their reign, all that I will proclaim, listen to it according to the truth.
The first inaugurated king, a ruler of the earth, full of brilliancy, prince Mahāsammata by name, reigned over his kingdom.
His son was called Roja by name; (then followed) the prince called Vararoja, Kalyāṇa and Varakalyāṇa, Uposatha, the lord of the earth; –
the seventh of them was Mandhātā who reigned over the four Dīpas. (Then followed) Cara, king Upacara, and Cetiya, the lord of the earth; –
Mucala, Mahāmucala, Mucalinda and also Sāgara, Sāgaradeva, and Bharata, the prince called Bhagīrasa,  –
Ruci, and he who was called Mahāruci, Patāpa, and also Mahāpatāpa, Panāda, and Mahāpanāda, the king called Sudassana, –
he who was called Mahāsudassana, two Nerus, and Accimā. These were twenty-eight kings by number; their age extended to an Asaṅkheyya (of years).
In Kusāvatī, in Rājagaha, in Mithilā,  best of towns, these kings reigned; their age extended to an Asaṅkheyya (of years).
Ten times ten is one hundred; ten times a hundred is one thousand; ten times a thousand is ten thousand; ten times ten thousand is a hundred thousand; –
ten times a hundred thousand is one koṭi; (the following numerals are) pakoṭi, koṭippakoṭi, nahuta, and ninnahuta, abbuda, and nirabbuda, –
ababa, and also aṭaṭa, ahaha, and kumuda, sogandhika, uppala, puṇḍarīka, paduma.
All these numbers are numerable and calculable by the means of calculation; the stage (of numbers) beyond these is called asaṅkheyya (not calculable).
One hundred kings, sons of Accimā, governed their great kingdom in the town called Pakula (?).
The last of these kings was the prince called Arindama; his sons and grandsons, fifty-six princes, governed their great kingdom in the town of Ayujjhanagara.
The last of these kings was Duppasaha, the lord of the earth; his sons and grandsons, sixty rulers of the earth, reigned over their great kingdom in Bārāṇasī, best of towns.
The last of these kings was the prince called Ajitajana;  his sons and grandsons, eighty-four thousand by number, reigned over their great kingdom in the town of Kapilanagara.
The last of these kings was Brahmadatta, the lord of the earth; his sons and grandsons, thirty-six princes, reigned over their great kingdom in Hatthipura, best of towns.
The last of these kings was Kambalavasabha; his sons and grandsons, thirty-two princes, reigned there in the town of Ekacakkhu.
The last of these kings was Purindada, honoured by the surname Deva; his sons and grandsons, twenty-eight princes, reigned over their great kingdom in Vajirā, best of towns.
The last of these kings was the prince called Sādhina. His sons and grandsons, twenty-two royal princes, reigned over their great kingdom in Madhurā, best of towns.
The last of these kings was valiant Dhammagutta; his sons and grandsons, eighteen princes, reigned there in the town of Ariṭṭhapura.
The last of these kings was the chief  of men called Siṭṭhi; his sons and grandsons, seventeen princes, reigned there in the town of Indapatta.
The last of these kings was Brahmadeva, the lord of the earth; his sons and grandsons, fifteen princes, reigned there in the town of Ekacakkhu.
The last of these kings was Baladatta, the lord of the earth; his sons and grandsons, fourteen royal princes, governed their great kingdom in the town of Kosambī.
The last of them was the king known as Bhaddadeva; his sons and grandsons, nine royal princes, reigned there in the town of Kaṇṇagoccha.
The last of them was the king renowned by the name of Naradeva; his sons and grandsons, seven royal princes, governed their great kingdom in the town of Rojānanagara.
The last of these kings was the prince called Mahinda; his sons and grandsons, twelve royal princes, governed their great kingdom in the town of Campānagara.
The last of these kings was Nāgadeva, the lord of the earth; his sons and grandsons, twenty-five princes, governed their great kingdom in the town of Mithilānagara.
The last of these kings was valiant Buddhadatta; his sons and grandsons, twenty-five princes, governed their great kingdom in Rājagaha, best of towns.
The last of these kings was the prince called Dīpaṅkara; his sons and grandsons, twelve royal princes, governed their great kingdom in Takkasilā, best of towns.
The last of these kings was the prince called Tālissara; his sons and grandsons, twelve royal princes, reigned over their great kingdom in Kusinārā, best of towns.
The last of these kings was the prince called Purinda; his sons and grandsons, nine royal princes, reigned over their great kingdom in the town of Malitthiya  (Tāmalitti?).
The last of these kings was Sāgaradeva, the lord of the earth; his son Makhādeva was a great, liberal giver.
His sons and grandsons, eighty-four thousand by number, reigned over their great kingdom in the town of Mithilānagara.
The last of these kings was Nemiya, honoured by the surname Deva, a universal monarch, a lord of the whole earth which the ocean surrounds.
Nemiya’s son was Kalārajanaka; his son was Samaṅkura;  (then followed) king Asoka, an inaugurated prince.
His sons and grandsons, eighty-four thousand by number, reigned over their great kingdom in Bārāṇasī, best of towns.
The last of these kings was the lord of the earth called Vijaya; his son was high-born, brilliant Vijitasena; –
(then followed) Dhammasena, Nāgasena, the (king) called Samatha, Disampati, Reṇu, Kusa, Mahākusa, Navaratha, and also Dasaratha, –
Rāma, the (king) called Biḷāratha, Cittadassī, Atthadassī, Sujāta, and Okkāka, Okkāmukha, and Nipura, –
Candimā, and Candamukha, king Sivi, Sañjaya, Vessantara, the ruler of men, Jālī, and Sīhavāhana, prince Sīhassara, the wise preserver of royal succession.
His sons and grandsons, eighty-two thousand kings, reigned in the town called Kapila(vatthu).
The last of these kings was Jayasena, the lord of the earth; his son was high-born, brilliant Sīhahanu.
The sons of that (?) Sīhahanu were five brothers, Suddhodana, and Dhota (Dhotodana), prince Sakkodana, –
king Sukkodana, and king Amitodana; all these five kings had names containing the word odana.
He the son of Suddhodana, Siddhattha, the chief of the world, begot Rāhulabhadda, and then left his home in order to strive for Buddhaship.
The total number of these highly powerful … kings is four Nahutas, one hundred thousand, and three hundred more.
So many lords of the earth are mentioned who originated from the family of the Bodhisatta in this first (?) kappa, preservers of royal succession, rulers of men . –
Perishable, alas! is whatever exists, subject to origin and decay; it appears and perishes; its extinction is bliss.
The king called Suddhodana reigned in the town called Kapila(vatthu), he the royal son of Sīhahanu.
Amid the five mountains, in Rājagaha, best of towns, reigned the prince who was called king Bodhisa (Bhātiya! ).
Suddhodana and Bhātiya were friends of each other. When (Bimbisāra) was eight years old, five wishes arose (in his mind):
“May my royal father instruct me in the duties of royalty; may he, the Buddha, the highest of men, arise in my kingdom; –
may the Tathāgata show himself first to me (before going to other kings); may he preach to me the eternal Truth; may I penetrate that most excellent Truth.”
These were the five wishes which arose in Bimbisāra’s mind. When he was fifteen years old, he received the royal coronation after his father’s death; –
he (Buddha) the chief of the world arose in his beautiful kingdom; the Tathāgata showed himself to him first; when he preached his eternal Truth, the lord of the earth apprehended it.
The great hero then was full thirty-five years old; Bimbisāra, the lord of the earth, was thirty years old. Gotama was five years older than Bimbisāra.
Fifty-two years this prince reigned; thirty-seven years he reigned after having formed that connection with the Buddha.
Prince Ajātasattu reigned thirty-two years. Eight years after his coronation the Sambuddha reached Parinibbāna.
After the Parinibbāna of the Sambuddha, the highest One in the world, the chief of men, that prince reigned (still) twenty-four years.
Having heard the speech of the Thera, the king was still more delighted. Not accepting the Campaka flowers (offered to him by the gardener), he presented them to the Thera.
The Thera threw down the Campaka flowers on the ground; then the earth quaked again; this was the eighth earthquake.
Witnessing this miracle, the royal retinue and the people of the kingdom shouted and waved their garments.
(The king asked:) “What is the reason, o great hero, of the eighth earthquake? Explain it, o great sage, we listen to your speech.”
“The relics of Tathāgata’s body consist of eight Doṇa-measures, men possessed of magical power will convey hither one Doṇa, o great king, and deposit it at this very spot, and erect (here) a resplendent Thūpa which will be the means whereby hearts will be touched and many people will be converted.”
The whole crowd that had assembled, the royal retinue and the people of the kingdom shouted at the quaking of the great earth.
(The Thera) resided (during the next night) in the Tissārāma, and when the night had passed, he put on  his under garment and wrapped himself in his robe; –
then he took his alms-bowl and entered the town, the capital. Going about in quest of alms he came to the gate of the palace.
He entered the royal palace and sat down on a seat; there he took his meal and cleansed the bowl with his hand.
Having finished his meal and gladdened (the king by preaching the Dhamma), he left the palace and the town by the southern gate. He then preached in the Nandana garden the most excellent Aggikkhandha Suttanta.  There one thousand men attained sanctification.
Having preached the true Faith and having delivered many created beings (from their sinful condition), the Thera rose from his seat and resided again (during the next night) in the Tissārāma.
Having resided there during the night, when the night had passed, he put on his under garment and wrapped himself in his robe; –
then be took his alms-bowl and entered the town, the capital. Going about in quest of alms he came to the gate of the palace.
He entered the royal palace and sat down on a seat; there be took his meal and cleansed his bowl with his hand.
Having finished his meal and gladdened (the king by preaching the Dhamma), he left the town, the capital. When he had rested at noon in the most excellent Nandana garden, he preached there the beautiful Suttanta of the Āsivisa parable.  At the end (of this sermon) one thousand men attained sanctification; (this was) the fifth case of the attainment of sanctification (which occurred in Laṅkā).
Having preached the true Faith and awakened created beings, be rose from his seat and went to the Tissārāma.
The king was greatly delighted at the eight-fold (?) earthquake; glad, rejoicing and satisfied the king thus addressed the Theras:
“The monastery has been firmly established, an excellent resting-place for the Fraternity. (Your) Abhiññāpādaka meditation,  venerable Sir, (has caused) this great earthquake.”
(The Thera replied:) “By this alone, o king, the rest-house for the Fraternity has not yet been firmly established; the Tathāgata  has instituted (the ceremony) called the determination of boundaries.
Having defined on all sides by the eight classes of landmarks the boundaries within which all Bhikkhus are considered as one section, and (having decreed about) not parting with the three robes,  all the sections (of the Fraternity) assemble and vote on their affairs. A place enclosed by boundaries which have been fixed in that way, is called one community. (Then) the monastery is well established, and the rest-house duly founded.”
(The king answered:) “My sons and wives together with my ministers and my retinue, all have become your lay pupils and have taken for all their life their refuge (in the Faith).
I ask you, great hero, do what I say; let the whole multitude (of the town’s people) reside on the ground included by the boundaries.
Here always they will find a defence through the protecting power (?) of charity and compassion.” (Mahinda said:) “Determine you the limits, o king, as you like; –
the limit being given, the Fraternity will settle the boundaries.” Mahāpaduma and Kuñjara, the two state-elephants, –
were first harnessed to a golden plough in Koṭṭhamālaka. The great army consisting of four hosts (proceeded), and together with the Theras the king, –
the destroyer of his enemies, made a furrow with the golden plough. (During this progress there were seen) adorned full vases, beautiful flags of different colours, –
triumphal arches decorated with various flowers and flags, garlands (?), and many burning lights (?). (Thus the king) ploughed with the golden plough.
For the sake of the conversion of many people, the prince together with the Theras, turning his right hand towards the city, walked around it and came to the bank of the river.
Drawing (?) the furrow which indicated the line of the great boundary, on the ground with the golden plough, he then (?) arrived (again) at Koṭṭhamālaka.
The two ends of the furrow having been united in the presence of  a great crowd, the earth quaked; this was the first earthquake.
Witnessing that miracle, the whole royal retinue together with the people of the kingdom joyfully said to each other: “There will be a monastery within the boundary.”
The ruler Devānampiya indicated to the Theras how far they had fixed the marks of the boundary line, of the enclosure, (and spoke thus:)
“As the preparatory ceremonies for fixing the boundary and the enclosure have been performed, may the Thera now out of compassion for me settle the limits, in order to establish firmly the Vihāra which will be suitable for the Fraternity of Bhikkhus.” Having heard what the king said, Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, –
thus addressed the fraternity of Bhikkhus: “O Bhikkhus, let us fix the boundary.” Under the constellation of Uttarāsāḷha the whole Fraternity assembled.
Having determined the extent of the sacred enclosure, (Mahinda) who was gifted with (supernatural) vision, fixed the boundary within which the Bhikkhus were to be considered as one section. Having firmly established the most excellent Tissārāma monastery, –
he resided (during the next night) in the Tissārāma, and when the night had passed, he put on his under garment and wrapped himself in his robe; –
then he took his alms-bowl and entered the town, the capital. Going about in quest of alms, he came to the gate of the palace.
He entered the royal palace and sat down on a seat; there he took his meal and cleansed the bowl with his hand.
Having finished his meal and gladdened the king (by preaching the Dhamma), he left the town, the capital. When he had rested at noon in the Nandana pleasure garden, –
he then preached the Āsivisūpama Suttanta, the Anamataggiya Sutta, and the incomparable Cariyā Piṭaka;  –
he also repeatedly propounded the Gomayapiṇḍaovāda and the Dhammacakkappavattana  in that same place, in the Mahānandana garden.
These Suttantas he preached during (those) seven days, and (in this time) Thera Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, delivered eight thousand and five  hundred people from the fetters (of sin). Having resided in the Tissārāma together with his companions something less then a month, –
he thus addressed all the towns-men on the full-moon day of Āsāḷhā, when the time of Vassa had approached: “The time of Vassa is near.”
Having arranged his sleeping-place, Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, took his alms-bowl and his robe, and left the Tissārāma.
He put on his under garment and wrapped himself in his robe; then he took his alms-bowl and entered the town, the capital.
Going about in quest of alms, he came to the gate of the palace. He entered the royal palace, and (there the Theras) sat down on the becoming seats.
There (Mahinda) took his meal and cleansed the bowl with his hand; (then) he preached the Mahāsamaya Suttanta  in order to exhort (the king).
Having exhorted the king, Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, rose from his seat and departed without taking leave.
The great teacher left the town by the eastern gate, and sending back all people he proceeded to the (Missaka) mountain.
The ministers were filled with anxiousness, and announced to the king: “All the great Theras, Sire, have gone to the Missaka mountain.”
The king, frightened at this news, ordered the horses quickly to be put to the chariot. The prince taking the queens with him, quickly ascended the chariot.
Thera Mahinda together with his companions had proceeded to the foot of the mountain. There was a lake called Nāgacatukka,  situated amidst the rocks; after bathing at that place and drinking (the water of that lake), he ascended the summit of the mountain.
The prince who profusely perspired in consequence of his great haste, saw from afar the Thera, standing on the summit of the mountain.
Leaving the queens in the chariot, the prince descended from the chariot, approached the Theras, saluted, and addressed them thus:
“Why, great hero, have you left the delightful kingdom, myself, and the  people, and retired to this mountain?”
(Mahinda replied:) “Here we shall spend three full months, the Vassa which Tathāgata has allowed to begin earlier or later”.
(The king replied:) “I do everything that is required for the comfort of the Bhikkhu fraternity; have compassion on me, and instruct me.”
“The Bhikkhus have been permitted by Buddha to begin the Vassa in a village as well as in the forest, (provided they) dwell in a room with shut doors.”
“I have understood what you have said, the whole sense with its reasons; this very day I shall erect a residence suitable for the Vassa.”
The illustrious monarch who had reached the full perfection attainable by a layman, looked out (for a place), and dedicated (it) to the Theras, (saying:) “Reside here out of compassion; –
well, venerable Thera, take possession of these rock-cut cells (and of this) Ārāma. In order to establish firmly the Vihāra, fix the boundary, great Sage.”
The son of the king’s sister, renowned by the name of Mahāriṭṭha, and also fifty-five illustrious noblemen approached the king, saluted him, and said: “We all desire to receive the Pabbajjā ordination from that man endowed with highest wisdom; –
we will embrace a life of holiness; give us your consent, Sire.” Hearing what they all had said, the delighted king, the ruler of the earth, approached the Theras, and thus addressed (Mahinda); “(There are) fifty-five chiefs with Mahāriṭṭha at their head; confer on them personally the Pabbajjā ordination, great hero; I give my consent.”
Hearing the king’s speech, Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, thus addressed the Bhikkhu fraternity: “Let us fix the boundary, o Bhikkhus.”
(The Theras), in order to establish firmly the Vihāra, consecrated the boundary within which all bhikkhus were to be considered as one section, and the enclosure (?), and proclaimed the decree about not parting with the three robes.
Having fixed the  inner and the outer boundary at the Tumba enclosure, Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, proclaimed the (extent of) the great boundary.
The (Thera) who was gifted with (supernatural) vision, consecrated the whole enclosure and the boundary, and firmly established the second monastery which was situated on the Tissapabbata.
After having consecrated the boundary on the mountain precisely on the full-moon day of the mouth Āsāḷhā, on the Uposatha day, under the constellation of Uttarāsāḷhā, –
he conferred the Pabbajjā ordination on Mahāriṭṭha who was the first person (who received it) in this second enclosure; at the same time he conferred the Upasampadā ordination on this prince who belonged to the royal family of Tambapaṇṇi.
At the same time (those) fifty-five (other noblemen received) the Pabbajjā and Upasampadā ordinations. In the first Ārāma thirty-two consecrated enclosures were established; –
thirty-two in the second Ārāma, in the monastery of the Tissa mountain. The other small Ārāmas contained one enclosure each.
The Ārāma and the monastery being founded on that most excellent mountain, sixty-two persons, who were all Arahats, entered on the Vassa residence; this was the first time (that this event occurred in Laṅkā). Here ends the acceptance of the Cetiya mountain.
The island of Laṅkā was called Sīhala after the Lion (sīha); listen ye to the narration of the origin of the island which I (am going to) tell.
The daughter of the Vaṅga king cohabited in the forest with a lion dwelling in the wilderness, and in consequence gave birth to two children.
Sīhabāhu and Sīvalī were beautiful youths; the name of their mother was Susimā, and their father was called the Lion.
When their sixteenth year had elapsed, (Sīhabāhu) departed from his cave, and then built a most excellent town called Sīhapura.
The son of the Lion, a powerful king, ruled over a great kingdom, in Lāḷaraṭṭha, in the most excellent town of Sīhapura.
Thirty-two brothers were the sons of Sīhabāhu; Vijaya and Sumitta were the eldest among them, beautiful princes.
Prince Vijaya was daring and uneducated; he committed most wicked and fearful deeds, plundering the people.
The people from the country and the merchants assembled; they went to the king and complained against the bad conduct of Vijaya.
The king, having heard their speech, full of anger, gave this order to the ministers: “Remove ye that boy.
Let them remove from the country all those attendants, his wives, children, relations, maid-servants, man-servants, and hired workmen.”
He was then removed, and his relations were separated from him; so they went on board ship, and (the ship) sailed away on the sea.
“May they drift wherever they like; they shall not show their faces again nor shall they ever come back to dwell in our kingdom and country.”
The ship in which the children had  embarked was helplessly driven to an island, the name of which was then called Naggadīpa.
The ship in which the wives had embarked was helplessly driven to an island, the name of which was then called Mahilāraṭṭha.
The ship in which the men had embarked went, sailing on the sea, losing her way and her bearings, to the port of Suppāra.
The people of Suppāra then invited those seven hundred men to disembark, and offered them lavish hospitality and honours.
During this hospitable reception Vijaya and all his followers unnoticed (?) committed barbarous deeds.
They made themselves guilty of drinking, theft, adultery, falsehood, and slander, of an immoral, most dreadful, bad conduct.
(The people) indignant at such cruel, savage, terrible and most dreadful deeds being committed against themselves, consulted together: “Let us quickly kill those rascals.”
There is an island (formerly) called Ojadīpa, Varadīpa, or Maṇḍadīpa, the (recent) name of which is Laṅkādīpa, and which is (besides) known by the name of Tambapaṇṇi.
At the time, when Sambuddha, highest of men, attained Parinibbāna, that son of Sīhabāhu, the prince called Vijaya, having left the land called Jambudīpa, landed on Laṅkādīpa. It had been foretold by the most excellent Buddha, that that prince one day would be (its) king.
The Teacher at that time had addressed Sakka, the chief of gods: “Do not neglect, Kosiya, the care of Laṅkādīpa.”
Sujampati, the king of gods, having heard the Sambuddha’s command, committed to Uppalavaṇṇa the business of guarding the island.
Having heard the command of Sakka that powerful Devaputta with his attendant demons kept guard over the island.
Vijaya, having stopped three months at Bhārukaccha and exasperated the inhabitants, went again on board his ship.
That crowd of men having gone on board their ship, sailing over the sea, were driven away by the violence of the wind, and lost their bearings.
They came to Laṅkādīpa, where they disembarked and went on shore. Standing on dry ground, being exhausted  by great hunger, thirst and fatigue, they were unable (?) to walk on foot.
They crawled about on the ground with both hands and knees; afterwards, when they rose and stood upright, they saw that their hands were resplendent (copper-coloured).
The red-coloured dust of the ground covered their arms and hands; hence the name of that place was called Tambapaṇṇi (copper-palmed).
Tambapaṇṇi was the first town in the most excellent Laṅkādīpa; there Vijaya resided and governed his kingdom.
Vijaya and Vijita together with Anurādhanakkhatta,  Accutagāmi, and Upatissa are those who came first to this country.
Many people, crowds of men and women, came together; (hence each) prince founded a town in the different parts.
The town of Tambapaṇṇi surrounded by suburbs was built by Vijaya in the south on the most lovely bank of the river.
Vijita founded Vijita(pura), the same founded Uruvelā. The minister who was called after the asterism (Anurādha) founded Anurādhapura.
He who was called Accutagāmi then founded Ujjenī, Upatissa founded Upatissanagara which had well arranged markets, which was prosperous, opulent, large, charming, and lovely.
The king called Vijaya by name was the first ruler who reigned in Tambapaṇṇi over the delightful island of Laṅkā.
When seven years (of his reign) had passed, the land was crowded with people. That prince reigned thirty-eight years.
In the ninth month after (Gotama) had become Buddha, the host of Yakkhas was destroyed; in the fifth year after his attaining Buddhaship the Jina conquered the Nāgas; in the eighth year after his attaining Buddhaship he completed the Samāpatti meditations (in Laṅkā).
On these three occasions the Tathāgata came hither. In the last year of the Buddha Vijaya came hither.
The Sambuddha, the most excellent of men, made (the island fit for) the residence of men; the Sambuddha (afterwards) reached complete Nibbāna by the entire annihilation of the substrata of existence.
Prince (Vijaya) reigned thirty-eight years after the Parinibbāna of the Sambuddha, the light-giving king of Truth.
He despatched a messenger to Sīhapura to the (prince) called Sumitta, (with this message): “Come one (of you) quickly to us, to the most excellent island of Laṅkā; –
there is nobody to govern this kingdom after my death. I hand over to you this island which I have acquired by my exertions.”
Prince Abhaya, the son of Kuṭikaṇṇa, went to visit the Fraternity (?) in the beautiful Mahāthūpa.
The (Bhikkhus) who had subdued their passions and obtained self-control, who were spotless and pure of heart, recited (the Dhamma) in the relic room in honour (of the relics).
The king, when he heard them reading in the delightful relic room, walked round the Thūpa; but he could not see them at any of the four gates.
The royal ruler  of men, having paid in every way reverence to the most venerable recitation, thus thought: “Where do they read?
They do not recite at the four gates nor outside; surely the wise men read in the relic room.
I also desire to see the most excellent relic room, I will hear the recital and see the Bhikkhu fraternity.”
Sakka, the king of gods, when he perceived the desire of the king, appeared in the relic room and thus addressed the Theras:
“The king, venerable sirs, desires to see the relic room.” For the sake of the preservation of his faith they conducted him into the relic-room.
As the king beheld the relic-room, wisdom arose in his mind; he raised his clasped hands and worshipped the relics and made great offerings during seven days.
He seven times made most excellent offerings, prepared with honey. He seven times made priceless offerings of ghee (?), –
and (also) duly seven times other (?) offerings. Seven times he made offerings of lamps, repeating them, –
and seven times beautiful offerings of flowers. During seven days he made offerings of water full (of flowers), and during seven days offerings of (common) water.
He ordered a priceless net-work of corals to be made, covering the surface of the Mahāthūpa as if it were dressed in a garment.
He made strong pillars for placing lamps around the foot of the Thūpa, and got a tube filled with ghee; then he ordered the lights seven times to be lit.
He caused a tube (to be laid) around the foot of the Thūpa and to be filled with oil, and ordered the oil-lamps fourteen times to be lit.
Having caused (a tube?) to be filled with scented water, he fixed mats at the top (of the Thūpa); (on these) he caused handfuls of blue lotuses to be scattered; this offering was made seven times.
Having dug a channel (from the Thūpa) to the Khema pond (which was situated) to the west of the Thūpa, he made there a water offering.
An entire Yojana around (the Thūpa) he caused flowers to be planted, and made a flower thicket at the most excellent Mahāthūpa.
The prince, having collected flowers covered with opening bud,  made a flower thicket fourteen times.
Having gathered various flowers, he constructed seven times a flower-pillar with a terrace and an enclosure.
He saw ... of various shapes, ornamented ...; the prince made them similar in shape.
He ordered chunnam work to be executed at the most excellent Mahāthūpa. Having celebrated the coronation (of the Bo tree?), he held a festival connected with the execution of chunnam work (at the buildings around the Bo tree?).
Sakyaputta, the great hero, penetrated the whole Truth near the Assattha tree (and became?) the supreme (Buddha?).
Of this Bo tree which stood in the delightful Meghavana garden, illuminating the island, the prince held a coronation and a bathing festival.
The Bhikkhu fraternities who bring happiness (to the people), after having spent the rainy season (in the prescribed manner), celebrated the Pavāraṇā ceremony; (the king) bestowed on them a Pavāraṇā donation in order to show his liking for the Pavāraṇā ceremony.
He bestowed a donation of sandal wood on the Bhikkhu fraternity, the most excellent assembly. To the most excellent Mahāthūpa he made the donation of a great kettle-drum.
... dancers and acrobats in auspicious attitudes (?), all … He constructed … and made a donation of it to the Mahāthūpa.
At the full moon day of the month Vesākha the Sambuddha was born; he celebrated a festival twenty-eight times in honour of this month.
Between the two monasteries of the delightful Mahāmeghavana and of the most excellent Thūpārāma he constructed an Uposatha hall.
He did many other meritorious acts and distributed rich donations. This prince reigned twenty-eight years.
Prince Nāga, the son of Kuṭikaṇṇa, made bricks and other things (?) of costly substances in the most excellent (Ambatthala Thūpa?), –
and erected seats for the Dhamma preachers everywhere in the beautiful Ambatthala Thūpa. He made a great offering called Giribhaṇḍagahaṇa.
As many wise Bhikkhus were in Laṅkādīpa, he gave a robe to each one of the Bhikkhu congregation,  of the most excellent assembly. This prince reigned twelve years.
Āmaṇḍagāmani, the son of Mahādāṭhika, known by the surname Abhaya, caused a well and also the Gāmeṇḍitalāka to be dug.
He constructed the Rajatalena (Vihāra). Over the Thūpa, in the most excellent Thūpārāma, he constructed a double canopy made of silver.
In the two most excellent palaces of the Mahāvihāra and of the Thūpārāma, he completely constructed treasuries and treasure-caves.
He also interdicted the destruction of animal life in the territory of Tambapaṇṇi. This prince reigned nine years and eight months.
His younger brother, known as king Kaṇirajānu, reigned full three years.
The royal son of Āmaṇḍagāmani, known as Cūlābhaya, constructed the most excellent Gaggarārāma.
King Cūlābhaya reigned one year. A woman called Sīvalī, known by the surname Revatī –
the daughter of king Āmaṇḍa, reigned four mouths. The son of Āmaṇḍa’s sister, Ilanāga by name, removed this Sīvalī and reigned in the town. King Ilanāga, the destroyer of his enemies, having heard the Kapi-Jātaka, ordered the Tissa and Dūra ponds to be dug. This king reigned six years in the island of Laṅkā.
The king called Sīva, known by the surname Candamukha, constructed the Manikārāma (Manikāragāma tank?) near the monastery called Issara.
The queen-consort of that king, known by the name of Damilādevī, bestowed her own revenues from that very village on that Ārāma. This king reigned eight years and seven months.
King Tissa, known by the surname of Yasalāla, governed eight years and seven months.
King Subha, the son of a doorkeeper, constructed the Subhārāma and the delightful Villavihāra.
Likewise he constructed hermit’s cells which were called after his own name. This king governed six years over his kingdom.
The whole crowd, the multitude of people who had not seen the Theras before, assembled at the gate of the royal palace and set up a great shout.
The king hearing the great noise … (asked:) “For what reason have  all these numerous people, has this great crowd, assembled?”
(The ministers said:) “This great crowd, Sire, has assembled for seeing the Fraternity; as they did not obtain a sight (of them), they set up that great shout.”
(The king replied:) “The palace is much too small for this multitude to place themselves therein; the elephant stables are not too small; (there) these crowds may see the Thera.”
When (Mahinda) had finished his meal and gladdened (the king by preaching the Dhamma), he rose from his seat, left the royal palace, and went to the elephant stables.
In the elephant stables they prepared a magnificent couch; on that excellent couch Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, sat down.
Seated on that most excellent couch Mahinda, the chief of (that) company (of Bhikkhus), then preached the most excellent Devadūta Sutta.
Having heard that Devadūta discourse (which treats of) the most fearful (consequences of) former deeds, they were frightened and seized by great emotion, being terrified by the fear of hell.
When he saw that the people were oppressed by fear, he proclaimed the four Truths; at the end (of his discourse) one thousand men attained (sanctification); this was the second case of the attainment (of sanctification which occurred in Laṅkā).
Leaving the elephant stables (he went forth), followed by a great crowd, delighting many people, as Buddha had done in Rājagaha.
The crowd left the town by the southern gate; there was a pleasure garden called Mahānandana,  to the south of the town.
In (this) royal pleasure garden they prepared a magnificent couch; there the Thera sat down and preached the most excellent Dhamma.
There he preached the most excellent Bālapaṇḍita Suttanta.  At that time one thousand created beings attained sanctification through the Dhamma.
A great crowd then gathered in the Nandana pleasure garden; noble women and maidens, the daughters-in-law and the daughters of noble families crowded together in order to see the Thera. While he exchanged greetings with them, night had fallen.
(The king therefore  addressed Mahinda:) “The Theras may pass the night here in the Mahānandana garden; it is too late for going hence to the distant dwelling in the mountains.”
(Mahinda replied:) “The town, which is filled with so many people, is too close by; in the night there will be a great noise; nay, let us go to that mountain which is like the palace of Sakka and well fitting for a retired existence.”
(Tissa answered:) “There is a solitary garden of mine, the Mahāmeghavana, suitable for going and coming, not too far and not too near, –
easily accessible for people who want (to see you), by day not exposed to much noise, at night there is no noise at all.
It is well fitted for a retired existence, and suits ascetic people; it is endowed with prospects and shadow, it is beautiful, and produces flowers and fruits, –
it is well enclosed by a wall and well protected by towers at the gates. There is a well arranged royal gate in my delightful garden, –
a well constructed lotus-pond covered with white and blue lotuses, cold water in suitable reservoirs, which is sweetly scented by flowers.
So delightful is my garden, appropriate for (you) and the fraternity of Bhikkhus. There, o Thera, reside; have compassion on me.”
Hearing what the king said, Thera Mahinda with his companions, surrounded by the host of ministers, proceeded then to the Meghavana garden.
Being invited by the chief of men, Thera Mahinda, the great teacher, entered the suitable Mahāmeghavana garden. In that garden, in the royal pavilion, the Thera, the great teacher, passed the night.
On the second day the king again visited the Theras. Having bowed to them, he spoke thus to the Theras;
“Have you had a good night’s rest? do you find this residence comfortable?” (The Theras replied:) “The dwelling is solitary, well fitting the season, agreeable to lie in for men, –
convenient for a retired existence and desirable.” The king, delighted by that speech, rejoicing and excited, –
he the ruler of the earth, took a golden vessel and dedicated the garden (to the Fraternity ). Raising his clasped hands, he pronounced the following words:
“Here, venerable Sir, I give up the beautiful Mahāmeghavana garden to the Fraternity of the four quarters of the world; accept it.”
Mahinda, the enlightener of the island, hearing what the chief of men said, accepted the garden for the sake of the construction of a monastery for the Fraternity.
At the moment when the Mahāmeghavana garden was given and accepted, the earth began to quake, and again and again thunder (was heard).
The chief of men called Tissa bestowed it on the Fraternity; they turned the Mahāmeghavana garden into (a monastery called) the Tissārāma.
The Mahāmeghavana was the first Ārāma, worthy of the Religion, which Devānampiya bestowed on the Fraternity.
Then the earth quaked, a horror-exciting portent. All people and the king, being terrified, asked the Theras (about the reason of that earthquake).
“This is the first monastery in the most excellent island of Laṅkā; the reason of this first earthquake is that the Faith has been established here.”
Witnessing that astonishing, terrifying miracle, they all waved their garments, as nothing of the kind had been experienced in the town.
Thence the rejoicing king in whose mind wisdom had arisen, raising his clasped hands, presented many flowers to Mahinda, the enlightener of the island.
The Thera accepted the flowers and threw them down in one place; then the earth again quaked; this was the second earthquake.
Witnessing this miracle also, the royal retinue together with the people of the kingdom shouted; this was the second earthquake.
The delighted king who rejoiced still more, (then asked:) “Satisfy my desire (to learn the reason of) this second earthquake.”
“The Fraternity will (here) perform its business which is irreproachable and worthy of the Faith. At this very spot, o great king, will be the consecrated enclosure.”
The king, still more delighted, presented flowers to the Thera; the Thera accepted the flowers and threw them down on another spot; then the earth quaked again; this was the third  earthquake.
(The king asked:) “What is the reason, great hero, of this third earthquake? Satisfy all my wishes, tell me, you are well experienced.”
Devānampiya, filled with high joy and delight, presented full-blown jasmine flowers to the Thera.
The Thera accepted the flowers and threw them down on another spot. Then the earth quaked again. This was the fourth earthquake.
Witnessing that miracle, the great crowds who had assembled, noising their clasped hands, paid reverence to (the Thera) who possessed the great (magical) powers.
The king, glad and delighted, quickly asked: “What is the reason, o great hero, of this fourth earthquake?”
“The descendant of the Sakyas, the great hero, was enlightened regarding the whole Truth near the Assattha tree; (there) he became the highest Buddha. That tree will be established on this very spot in this most excellent island.”
Hearing that, the king, glad, joyful, and excited, presented most excellent jasmine flowers to the Thera.
The Thera accepted the flowers and threw them down on the ground; at that moment also the earth quaked; this was the fifth earthquake.
Witnessing that miracle also, the royal retinue together with the people of the kingdom shouted and waved their garments.
(The king asked:) “What is the reason, o great sage, of the fifth earthquake? Tell me this matter, if that is consistent (?) with your pleasure and will.”
“Each fortnight they will here recite the Pātimokkha; on this very spot the Uposatha hall will stand.”
(The king) presented beautiful flowers to the Thera also in another place; the Thera accepted the flowers and threw them down on that spot. Then the earth quaked again; this was the sixth earthquake.
Witnessing this miracle also, the crowds who had assembled, joyfully thus addressed each other: “Here a Vihāra will stand.”
The king who was still more delighted, said to the Theras: “What is the reason, o great Sage, of the sixth earthquake?”
“As long as in future  times the alms due to the Fraternity (will be distributed), the assembled Fraternities of Bhikkhus will receive them, o great king, on this very spot.”
Hearing the Thera’s speech, the delighted king presented most beautiful flowers to the Thera.
The Thera accepted the flowers and scattered them on another spot; then the earth quaked again; this was the seventh earthquake.
Witnessing this miracle, the whole royal retinue and the people of the kingdom waved their garments, when the ground of the earth quaked.
(The king asked:) “What is the reason, o great sage, of the seventh earthquake? Explain it, o great sage, satisfy the desire of the multitude.”
(Mahinda replied:) “As long as learned people will reside in this monastery, the refectory and the dinner hall will be on this spot.”
 At the present time there are other aged, middle-aged, and young (Bhikkhus), holders of the Vibhajja doctrine, preservers of the tradition of the Vinaya and of the Faith.
Learned and virtuous they illuminate this earth; by a conduct which conforms to the Dhutaṅga rules they shine in the island of Laṅkā.
Many followers of Sakyaputta are here who well understand the true Religion and (its) history. Truly, for the sake of many people “the possessor of (supernatural) vision has appeared in the world; the Jina has dispelled the darkness and shown the light.
They whose faith is well and firmly grounded on the Tathāgata, leave all wretched states of existence and are born again in heaven.
And those who penetrate the constituent members of Bodhi, the organs (of spiritual life), the (ten) powers, attention, right exertion, and the complete system of (magical) powers, –
the holy eight-fold path which leads to the destruction of suffering, conquer the army of Death and are victorious in the world.
The younger twin-sister of queen Māyā, born from the same mother, kind like a mother, suckled Bhagavat.
(She was) called Mahāpajāpatī, known by the name of Gotamī, renowned, an original depositary (of the Faith), possessing the six (supernatural) faculties and the high (magical) powers.
The two chief female pupils were Khemā and Uppalavaṇṇā; (besides, there was) Paṭācārā, Dhammadinnā, Sobhitā, Isidāsikā –
Visākhā, Soṇā, and Sabalā, wise Saṅghadāsī, and Nandā, a guardian of the Dhamma and well versed in the Vinaya. These (Bhikkhunīs) who well knew the Vinaya and the paths (of sanctification), (lived) in Jambudīpa.
The Therī Saṅghamittā, and wise Uttarā, Hemā, and Pasādapālā, and Aggimittā, Dāsikā, –
Pheggu, Pabbatā, and Mattā, Mallā, and Dhammadāsiyā, these young Bhikkhunīs (these eleven Bhikkhunīs?) came hither from Jambudīpa.
They taught the Vinaya Piṭaka in Anurādhapura. They (also) taught the five Collections (of the Sutta Piṭaka) and the seven Treatises (of the Abhidhamma).
Saddhammanandī, and Somā, and also Giriddhī, Dāsiyā, and Dhammā, a guardian of the Dhamma and well versed in the Vinaya, –
and Mahilā who kept the Dhutaṅga precepts, and Sobhaṇā, Dhammatāpasā, highly wise Naramittā who was well versed in the Vinaya, –
Sātā, versed in the exhortations of Therīs, Kālī and Uttarā, these Bhikkhunīs received the Upasampadā ordination in the island of Laṅkā.
... and renowned Sumanā who well understood the true religion and (its) history, these Bhikkhunīs who were passionless and tranquil, the resolutions of whose minds were pure, who were firmly grounded in the true Faith and in the Vinaya, came together with twenty thousand Bhikkhunīs … honoured by illustrious, noble Abhaya.
They taught the Vinayapiṭaka in Anurādhapura; they (also) taught the five Collections (of the Sutta Piṭaka) and the seven Treatises (of the Abhidhamma).
Renowned Mahilā who well understood the true religion and (its) history, and Samantā, the daughters of king Kākavaṇṇa, –
and learned Girikālī, the daughter of his Purohita, Dāsī and Kālī, the daughters of a rogue, well versed in the whole of the sacred Scriptures (?), –
these Bhikkhunīs, well versed in the whole of the sacred Scriptures, unconquerable, the resolutions of whose minds were pure, who were firmly grounded in the true Faith and in the Vinaya, –
came from (?) Rohana together with twenty thousand Bhikkhunīs, honoured by illustrious king Abhaya. They taught the Vinayapiṭaka in Anurādhapura.
Mahādevī and Padumā, illustrious Hemāsā, Unnalā,  Añjalī, Sumā, –
these Bhikkhunīs who possessed the six (supernatural) faculties and the great (magical) powers, came … together with sixteen thousand Bhikkhunīs.
Honoured by illustrious king Tissa Devānampiya (?), they taught the Vinayapiṭaka in Anurādhapura.
Mahāsoṇā and Dattā, wise Sīvalā, zealous Rūpasobhinī, venerated Devamānusā, –
Nāgā and Nāgamittā, Dhammaguttā, and Dāsiyā, and Samuddā gifted with (supernatural) vision, who well understood the true Religion and (its) history, –
Sapattā, Channā, and Upālī, excellent Revatā, these were the highest among the Vinaya-studying Bhikkhunīs, the daughters of Somadeva,  –
Mālā and Khemā and Tissā, the highest among the preachers of the Dhamma, these taught the Vinaya first after the death of Abhaya (or: when the danger had disappeared?).
Sīvalā and Mahāruhā who well understood the true Religion and (its) history, and had converted to the Faith many people in Jambudīpa, came hither from Jambudīpa together with twenty thousand Bhikkhunīs, invited by illustrious king Abhaya.
They taught the Vinayapiṭaka in Anurādhapura; they (also) taught the five Collections (of the Suttapiṭaka) and the seven Treatises (of the Abhidhamma).
Sīvalā together with queen Samuddanavā, daughters of a king, wise Nāgapālī, and clever Nāgamittā, –
Mahilā, a guardian of the Bhikkhunīs and well versed in the Vinaya, Nāgā, and Nāgamittā who well knew the true Religion and (its) history, these Bhikkhunīs then received the Upasampadā ordination in the island of Laṅkā.
All these were high-born and renowned in the Doctrine, the most excellent ones among sixteen thousand Bhikkhunīs, acknowledged to be the leaders.
Honoured by Kuṭikaṇṇa (and by his son,) illustrious Abhaya, they taught the Vinayapiṭaka in Anurādhapura.
Cūlanāgā and Dhannā, venerated Soṇā, and renowned Saṇhā who well knew the true Religion and (its) history, –
highly learned and wise Mahātissā, the  daughter of Gamika, Cūlasumanā, Mahāsumanā, and clever Mahākālī, –
illustrious Lakkhadhammā, honoured and high-born, wise Dīpanayā who was venerated in Rohana, –
renowned Samuddā who well knew the true Religion and (its) history, holders of the Vibhajja doctrine and of the Vinaya, who both were ornaments of the Sisterhood, –
these and other Bhikkhunīs received the Upasampadā ordination in the island of Laṅkā. (These Bhikkhunīs,) the resolutions of whose minds were pure, who were firmly grounded in the true Faith and in the Vinaya, –
learned, versed in the Tradition, free from evil passions, and illustrious, went out (attained Nibbāna) after having spread radiance, like fire-brands.
At the present time there are other aged, middle-aged, and young (Bhikkhunīs), holders of the Vibhajja doctrine and of the Vinaya, preservers of the tradition of the Faith. Learned and virtuous they illuminate this earth.
Prince Sīva reigned ten years; he established the Ārāma and the Vihāra of Nāgaraṅgaṇa.
Prince Sūratissa reigned ten years; he constructed five hundred monasteries, a liberal, great, and meritorious deed.
Having conquered Sūratissa, the two Damila princes Sena and Gutta righteously reigned during twelve (twenty-two?) years.
Prince Asela, a son of Muṭasīva, put Sena and Gutta to death, and reigned ten years.
A prince, Elāra by name, having killed Asela, reigned righteously forty-four years.
Avoiding the four evil paths of lust, hatred, fear, and ignorance, this incomparable monarch reigned righteously.
(Once) no rain fell during a whole winter, summer, and the rainy season. (Then) continually the cloud rained, rain fell during seven times seven days.
There were three cases which the king decided;  (after that) rain fell only during the night and not in day-time.
A prince, Abhaya by name, the son of Kākavaṇṇa, whom the ten warriors surrounded, whose elephant  was Kaṇḍula, –
put thirty-two kings to death and alone continued the royal succession. This prince reigned twenty-four years.
The illustrious son of Kākavaṇṇa, known by the name of Tissa, built the Mahāthūpa (and) a Vihāra.
He ordered the most excellent Kallakālena monastery to be constructed; and many other Vihāras have been erected by Saddhātissa.
The number of the highly precious divisions of the Dhamma is eighty-four thousand; he paid reverence to each single division of the Dhamma separately.
Illustrious Saddhātissa constructed a beautiful palace with seven stories, and ordered it to be roofed with iron plates; –
(hence) it first received the name Lohapāsāda (iron palace). He made a lump of glass (?). Around the most excellent Mahāthūpa he constructed a wall, decorated with figures of elephants, a beautiful enclosure; he (also) constructed a quadrangular tank (and gave it) for a certain time (to the Fraternity).
This prince reigned eighteen years. Having done many other meritorious deeds and distributed rich donations, this wise monarch after the dissolution of his (human) body entered the body of a Tusita god.
The son of Saddhātissa, known by the name of Thūlathana, constructed a great Ārāma, the Alakandara monastery. This prince reigned one month and ten days.
The son of Saddhātissa, known by the name of Lajjitissa,  governed nine years and six months.
He constructed a …  at the most excellent Mahāthūpa and established the most delightful Kumbhila Ārāma.
He built the Dīghathūpa to the east of the Thūpārāma; in the most excellent Thūpārāma he constructed receptacles cased in stone.
After the death of Lajjitissa his younger brother named Khallāṭanāga reigned six years.
His commander-in-chief, Mahārattaka by name, put this Khallāṭaka to death and reigned one day, a wicked, ungrateful person.
The younger brother of the king, called Vaṭṭagāmani, killed that wicked general and reigned five months.
(After that time) the Damila Pulahattha reigned three years, and the general Bāhiya two years.
Having killed this (king), Panayamāra reigned seven years. Having killed this (king), Palayamāra reigned seven months.
Having killed this (king), a person Dāṭhiya by name reigned two years. These five sovereigns belonging to the Damila tribe governed fourteen years and seven months in the interval (between the two parts of Vaṭṭagāmani’s reign).
Then the glorious, great king Vaṭṭagāmani came back and having put to death the Damila Dāṭhika, gained the sovereignty himself.
This king Abhaya Vaṭṭagāmani reigned twelve years’ and in the beginning (before the above-mentioned interruption) five months.
Before this time, the wise Bhikkhus had orally handed down the text of the three Piṭakas and also the Aṭṭhakathā.
At this time, the Bhikkhus who perceived the decay of created beings, assembled and in order that the Religion might endure for a long time, they recorded (the above-mentioned texts) in written books.
After his (Vaṭṭagāmani’s) death Mahācūli Mahātissa reigned fourteen years justly and righteously.
This king, full of faith, having done many meritorious deeds,  went to heaven after fourteen years.
The son of Vaṭṭagāmani, known by the name of Coranāga, reigned twelve years living like a robber.
The son of Mahācūli, the prince known by the name of Tissa, reigned three years over the Island.
King Sīva cohabited with queen Anulā; he ruled one year and two months.
A king from a foreign country, Vaṭuka by name, a Damila, governed one year and two months.
Then followed king Tissa, known by the surname “the wood-cutter”; he then ruled one year and one month.
(A person) called Niliya by name, known as the Damila king, ruled the kingdom and governed three months.
A woman, Anulā, killed these excellent persons and governed four months over Tambapaṇṇi.
The son of Mahācūli, called Kuṭikaṇṇatissa, constructed an Uposatha hall near the Cetiyapabbata monastery.
In front of the building he erected a beautiful stone Thūpa; there he planted a Bo branch and constructed a great structure (around the Bo branch?).
He built a bath ... for the Bhikkhunīs. He also made a fence round the Padumassara garden.
He caused a ditch to be dug for the protection of the town, and a wall to be constructed full seven yards (in height).
He (also) caused the ponds Khema and Dugga to be dug (which he gave) for a certain time (?) (to the Fraternity). He (also) caused the Setuppala well and the beautiful Vaṇṇaka dike (?) to be constructed. This prince reigned twenty-two years.
Long Discourses
With Subha
So I have heard.
At one time Venerable Ānanda was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery. It was not long after the Buddha had become fully extinguished.
Now at that time the brahmin student Subha, Todeyya’s son, was residing in Sāvatthī on some business.
Then he addressed a certain student,
“Here, student, go to the ascetic Ānanda and in my name bow with your head to his feet. Ask him if he is healthy and well, nimble, strong, and living comfortably.
And then say:
‘Sir, please visit the student Subha, Todeyya’s son, at his home out of compassion.’”
“Yes, sir,” replied the student, and did as he was asked.
When he had spoken, Venerable Ānanda said to him,
“It’s not the right time, student.
I’ve drunk sufficient refreshments for today.
But hopefully tomorrow I’ll get a chance to visit him.”
“Yes, sir,” replied the student. He went back to Subha, and told him what had happened, adding,
“This much, sir, I managed to do. At least Master Ānanda will take the opportunity to visit tomorrow.”
Then when the night had passed, Ānanda robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went with Venerable Cetaka as his second monk to Subha’s home, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Subha went up to Ānanda, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to Ānanda:
“Master Ānanda, you were Master Gotama’s attendant. You were close to him, living in his presence.
You ought to know what things Master Gotama praised, and in which he encouraged, settled, and grounded all these people.
What were those things?”
“Student, the Buddha praised three sets of things, and that’s what he encouraged, settled, and grounded all these people in.
What three?
The entire spectrum of noble ethics, immersion, and wisdom.
These are the three sets of things that the Buddha praised.”
The Entire Spectrum of Ethics
“But what was that noble spectrum of ethics that the Buddha praised?”
“Student, it’s when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.
He has realized with his own insight this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—and he makes it known to others.
He teaches Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And he reveals a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
A householder hears that teaching, or a householder’s child, or someone reborn in some clan.
They gain faith in the Realized One,
and reflect:
‘Living in a house is cramped and dirty, but the life of one gone forth is wide open.
It’s not easy for someone living at home to lead the spiritual life utterly full and pure, like a polished shell.
Why don’t I shave off my hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness?’
After some time they give up a large or small fortune, and a large or small family circle. They shave off hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
Once they’ve gone forth, they live restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken. They act skillfully by body and speech. They’re purified in livelihood and accomplished in ethical conduct. They guard the sense doors, have mindfulness and situational awareness, and are content.
And how is a mendicant accomplished in ethics?
It’s when a mendicant gives up killing living creatures. They renounce the rod and the sword. They’re scrupulous and kind, living full of compassion for all living beings. …
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes rites for propitiation, for granting wishes, for ghosts, for the earth, for rain, for property settlement, and for preparing and consecrating house sites, and rites involving rinsing and bathing, and oblations. It also includes administering emetics, purgatives, expectorants, and phlegmagogues; administering ear-oils, eye restoratives, nasal medicine, ointments, and counter-ointments; surgery with needle and scalpel, treating children, prescribing root medicines, and binding on herbs.
They refrain from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood. …
This pertains to their ethics.
A mendicant thus accomplished in ethics sees no danger in any quarter in regards to their ethical restraint.
It’s like a king who has defeated his enemies. He sees no danger from his foes in any quarter.
A mendicant thus accomplished in ethics sees no danger in any quarter in regards to their ethical restraint.
When they have this entire spectrum of noble ethics, they experience a blameless happiness inside themselves.
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics.
This is that noble spectrum of ethics that the Buddha praised.
But there is still more to be done.”
“It’s incredible, Master Ānanda, it’s amazing,
This noble spectrum of ethics is complete, not lacking anything!
Such a complete spectrum of ethics cannot be seen among the other ascetics and brahmins.
Were other ascetics and brahmins to see such a complete spectrum of noble ethics in themselves, they’d be delighted with just that much:
‘At this point it’s enough; at this point our work is done. We’ve reached the goal of our ascetic life. There is nothing more to be done.’
And yet you say:
‘But there is still more to be done.’
The Spectrum of Immersion
But what, Master Ānanda, was that noble spectrum of immersion that the Buddha praised?”
“And how, student, does a mendicant guard the sense doors?
When a mendicant sees a sight with their eyes, they don’t get caught up in the features and details.
If the faculty of sight were left unrestrained, bad unskillful qualities of desire and aversion would become overwhelming. For this reason, they practice restraint, protecting the faculty of sight, and achieving its restraint.
When they hear a sound with their ears …
When they smell an odor with their nose …
When they taste a flavor with their tongue …
When they feel a touch with their body …
When they know a thought with their mind, they don’t get caught up in the features and details.
If the faculty of mind were left unrestrained, bad unskillful qualities of desire and aversion would become overwhelming. For this reason, they practice restraint, protecting the faculty of mind, and achieving its restraint.
When they have this noble sense restraint, they experience an unsullied bliss inside themselves.
That’s how a mendicant guards the sense doors.
And how does a mendicant have mindfulness and situational awareness?
It’s when a mendicant acts with situational awareness when going out and coming back; when looking ahead and aside; when bending and extending the limbs; when bearing the outer robe, bowl and robes; when eating, drinking, chewing, and tasting; when urinating and defecating; when walking, standing, sitting, sleeping, waking, speaking, and keeping silent.
That’s how a mendicant has mindfulness and situational awareness.
And how is a mendicant content?
It’s when a mendicant is content with robes to look after the body and alms-food to look after the belly.
Wherever they go, they set out taking only these things.
They’re like a bird: wherever it flies, wings are its only burden.
In the same way, a mendicant is content with robes to look after the body and alms-food to look after the belly.
Wherever they go, they set out taking only these things.
That’s how a mendicant is content.
When they have this noble spectrum of ethics, this noble sense restraint, this noble mindfulness and situational awareness, and this noble contentment,
they frequent a secluded lodging—a wilderness, the root of a tree, a hill, a ravine, a mountain cave, a charnel ground, a forest, the open air, a heap of straw.
After the meal, they return from alms-round, sit down cross-legged with their body straight, and establish mindfulness right there.
Giving up desire for the world, they meditate with a heart rid of desire, cleansing the mind of desire.
Giving up ill will and malevolence, they meditate with a mind rid of ill will, full of compassion for all living beings, cleansing the mind of ill will.
Giving up dullness and drowsiness, they meditate with a mind rid of dullness and drowsiness, perceiving light, mindful and aware, cleansing the mind of dullness and drowsiness.
Giving up restlessness and remorse, they meditate without restlessness, their mind peaceful inside, cleansing the mind of restlessness and remorse.
Giving up doubt, they meditate having gone beyond doubt, not undecided about skillful qualities, cleansing the mind of doubt.
Suppose a man who has gotten into debt were to apply himself to work,
and his efforts proved successful.
He would pay off the original loan and have enough left over to support his partner.
Thinking about this,
he’d be filled with joy and happiness.
Suppose there was a person who was sick, suffering, gravely ill. They’d lose their appetite and get physically weak.
But after some time they’d recover from that illness, and regain their appetite and their strength.
Thinking about this,
they’d be filled with joy and happiness.
Suppose a person was imprisoned in a jail.
But after some time they were released from jail, safe and sound, with no loss of wealth.
Thinking about this,
they’d be filled with joy and happiness.
Suppose a person was a bondservant. They belonged to someone else and were unable to go where they wish.
But after some time they’d be freed from servitude and become their own master, an emancipated individual able to go where they wish.
Thinking about this,
they’d be filled with joy and happiness.
Suppose there was a person with wealth and property who was traveling along a desert road, which was perilous, with nothing to eat.
But after some time they crossed over the desert safely, reaching the neighborhood of a village, a sanctuary free of peril.
Thinking about this,
they’d be filled with joy and happiness.
In the same way, as long as these five hindrances are not given up inside themselves, a mendicant regards them as a debt, a disease, a prison, slavery, and a desert crossing.
But when these five hindrances are given up inside themselves, a mendicant regards this as freedom from debt, good health, release from prison, emancipation, and sanctuary.
Seeing that the hindrances have been given up in them, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, they feel bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, they enter and remain in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
They drench, steep, fill, and spread their body with rapture and bliss born of seclusion. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with rapture and bliss born of seclusion.
It’s like when a deft bathroom attendant or their apprentice pours bath powder into a bronze dish, sprinkling it little by little with water.
They knead it until the ball of bath powder is soaked and saturated with moisture, spread through inside and out; yet no moisture oozes out.
In the same way, a mendicant drenches, steeps, fills, and spreads their body with rapture and bliss born of seclusion. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with rapture and bliss born of seclusion.
This pertains to their immersion.
Furthermore, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, a mendicant enters and remains in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
They drench, steep, fill, and spread their body with rapture and bliss born of immersion. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with rapture and bliss born of immersion.
It’s like a deep lake fed by spring water.
There’s no inlet to the east, west, north, or south, and no rainfall to replenish it from time to time.
But the stream of cool water welling up in the lake drenches, steeps, fills, and spreads throughout the lake. There’s no part of the lake that’s not spread through with cool water.
In the same way, a mendicant drenches, steeps, fills, and spreads their body with rapture and bliss born of immersion. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with rapture and bliss born of immersion.
This pertains to their immersion.
Furthermore, with the fading away of rapture, a mendicant enters and remains in the third absorption, where they meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
They drench, steep, fill, and spread their body with bliss free of rapture. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with bliss free of rapture.
It’s like a pool with blue water lilies, or pink or white lotuses. Some of them sprout and grow in the water without rising above it, thriving underwater. From the tip to the root they’re drenched, steeped, filled, and soaked with cool water. There’s no part of them that’s not soaked with cool water.
In the same way, a mendicant drenches, steeps, fills, and spreads their body with bliss free of rapture. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with bliss free of rapture.
This pertains to their immersion.
Furthermore, giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, a mendicant enters and remains in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
They sit spreading their body through with pure bright mind.
There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with pure bright mind.
It’s like someone sitting wrapped from head to foot with white cloth. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread over with white cloth.
In the same way, a mendicant sits spreading their body through with pure bright mind. There's no part of their body that's not spread with pure bright mind.
This pertains to their immersion.
This is that noble spectrum of immersion that the Buddha praised.
But there is still more to be done.”
“It’s incredible, Master Ānanda, it’s amazing!
This noble spectrum of immersion is complete, not lacking anything!
Such a complete spectrum of immersion cannot be seen among the other ascetics and brahmins.
Were other ascetics and brahmins to see such a complete spectrum of noble immersion in themselves, they’d be delighted with just that much:
‘At this point it’s enough; at this point our work is done. We’ve reached the goal of our ascetic life. There is nothing more to be done.’
And yet you say:
‘But there is still more to be done.’
The Spectrum of Wisdom
But what, Master Ānanda, was that noble spectrum of wisdom that the Buddha praised?”
“When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge and vision.
They understand:
‘This body of mine is physical. It’s made up of the four primary elements, produced by mother and father, built up from rice and porridge, liable to impermanence, to wearing away and erosion, to breaking up and destruction. And this consciousness of mine is attached to it, tied to it.’
Suppose there was a beryl gem that was naturally beautiful, eight-faceted, well-worked, transparent, clear, and unclouded, endowed with all good qualities.
And it was strung with a thread of blue, yellow, red, white, or golden brown.
And someone with good eyesight were to take it in their hand and examine it:
‘This beryl gem is naturally beautiful, eight-faceted, well-worked, transparent, clear, and unclouded, endowed with all good qualities.
And it’s strung with a thread of blue, yellow, red, white, or golden brown.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge and vision.
This pertains to their wisdom.
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward the creation of a mind-made body.
From this body they create another body, physical, mind-made, complete in all its various parts, not deficient in any faculty.
Suppose a person was to draw a reed out from its sheath.
They’d think:
‘This is the reed, this is the sheath. The reed and the sheath are different things. The reed has been drawn out from the sheath.’
Or suppose a person was to draw a sword out from its scabbard.
They’d think:
‘This is the sword, this is the scabbard. The sword and the scabbard are different things. The sword has been drawn out from the scabbard.’
Or suppose a person was to draw a snake out from its slough.
They’d think:
‘This is the snake, this is the slough. The snake and the slough are different things. The snake has been drawn out from the slough.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward the creation of a mind-made body.
This pertains to their wisdom.
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward psychic power.
They wield the many kinds of psychic power: multiplying themselves and becoming one again; going unimpeded through a wall, a rampart, or a mountain as if through space; diving in and out of the earth as if it were water; walking on water as if it were earth; flying cross-legged through the sky like a bird; touching and stroking with the hand the sun and moon, so mighty and powerful; controlling the body as far as the Brahmā realm.
Suppose an expert potter or their apprentice had some well-prepared clay. They could produce any kind of pot that they like.
Or suppose an expert ivory-carver or their apprentice had some well-prepared ivory. They could produce any kind of ivory item that they like.
Or suppose an expert goldsmith or their apprentice had some well-prepared gold. They could produce any kind of gold item that they like.
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward psychic power.
This pertains to their wisdom.
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward clairaudience.
With clairaudience that is purified and superhuman, they hear both kinds of sounds, human and divine, whether near or far.
Suppose there was a person traveling along the road.
They’d hear the sound of drums, clay drums, horns, kettledrums, and tom-toms.
They’d think: ‘That’s the sound of drums,’ and ‘that’s the sound of clay-drums,’ and ‘that’s the sound of horns, kettledrums, and tom-toms.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward clairaudience.
This pertains to their wisdom.
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward comprehending the minds of others.
They understand
mind with greed as ‘mind with greed’,
and mind without greed as ‘mind without greed’.
They understand mind with hate …
mind without hate …
mind with delusion …
mind without delusion …
constricted mind …
scattered mind …
expansive mind …
unexpansive mind …
mind that is not supreme …
mind that is supreme …
immersed mind …
unimmersed mind …
freed mind …
They understand unfreed mind as ‘unfreed mind’.
Suppose there was a woman or man who was young, youthful, and fond of adornments, and they check their own reflection in a clean bright mirror or a clear bowl of water. If they had a spot they’d know ‘I have a spot,’ and if they had no spots they’d know ‘I have no spots.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward comprehending the minds of others.
This pertains to their wisdom.
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward recollection of past lives.
They recollect many kinds of past lives, that is, one, two, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand rebirths; many eons of the world contracting, many eons of the world expanding, many eons of the world contracting and expanding.
They remember:
‘There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food.
This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended.
When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.’ And so they recollect their many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
Suppose a person was to leave their home village and go to another village.
From that village they’d go to yet another village. And from that village they’d return to their home village. They’d think:
‘I went from my home village to another village.
There I stood like this, sat like that, spoke like this, or kept silent like that.
From that village I went to yet another village. There too I stood like this, sat like that, spoke like this, or kept silent like that. And from that village I returned to my home village.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward recollection of past lives.
This pertains to their wisdom.
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge of the death and rebirth of sentient beings.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place.
They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
‘These dear beings did bad things by way of body, speech, and mind.
They spoke ill of the noble ones; they had wrong view; and they chose to act out of that wrong view.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell. These dear beings, however, did good things by way of body, speech, and mind. They never spoke ill of the noble ones; they had right view; and they chose to act out of that right view. When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.’ And so, with clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
Suppose there was a stilt longhouse at the central square.
A person with good eyesight standing there might see people entering and leaving a house, walking along the streets and paths, and sitting at the central square. They’d think:
‘These are people entering and leaving a house, walking along the streets and paths, and sitting at the central square.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend and project it toward knowledge of the death and rebirth of sentient beings.
This pertains to their wisdom.
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge of the ending of defilements.
They truly understand: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering’.
They truly understand: ‘These are defilements’ … ‘This is the origin of defilements’ … ‘This is the cessation of defilements’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of defilements’.
Knowing and seeing like this, their mind is freed from the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.
When they’re freed, they know they’re freed.
They understand: ‘Rebirth is ended, the spiritual journey has been completed, what had to be done has been done, there is no return to any state of existence.’
Suppose that in a mountain glen there was a lake that was transparent, clear, and unclouded.
A person with good eyesight standing on the bank would see the mussel shells, gravel and pebbles, and schools of fish swimming about or staying still.
They’d think:
‘This lake is transparent, clear, and unclouded.
And here are the mussel shells, gravel and pebbles, and schools of fish swimming about or staying still.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge of the ending of defilements.
This pertains to their wisdom.
This is that noble spectrum of wisdom that the Buddha praised.
And there is nothing more to be done.”
“It’s incredible, Master Ānanda, it’s amazing!
This noble spectrum of wisdom is complete, not lacking anything!
Such a complete spectrum of wisdom cannot be seen among the other ascetics and brahmins.
And there is nothing more to be done.
Excellent, Master Ānanda! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, Master Ānanda has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to Master Gotama, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may Master Ānanda remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
Long Discourses
With Soṇadaṇḍa
The Brahmins and Householders of Campā
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Aṅgas together with a large Saṅgha of around five hundred mendicants when he arrived at Campā,
where he stayed by the banks of the Gaggarā Lotus Pond.
Now at that time the brahmin Soṇadaṇḍa was living in Campā. It was a crown property given by King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, teeming with living creatures, full of hay, wood, water, and grain, a royal endowment of the highest quality.
The brahmins and householders of Campā heard:
“It seems the ascetic Gotama—a Sakyan, gone forth from a Sakyan family—has arrived at Campā and is staying on the banks of the Gaggarā Lotus Pond.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
He has realized with his own insight this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—and he makes it known to others.
He teaches Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And he reveals a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
It’s good to see such perfected ones.”
Then, having departed Campā, they formed into companies and headed to the Gaggarā Lotus Pond.
Now at that time the brahmin Soṇadaṇḍa had retired to the upper floor of his stilt longhouse for his midday nap.
He saw the brahmins and householders heading for the lotus pond,
and addressed his steward,
“My steward, why are the brahmins and householders headed for the Gaggarā Lotus Pond?”
“The ascetic Gotama has arrived at Campā and is staying on the banks of the Gaggarā Lotus Pond.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
They’re going to see that Master Gotama.”
“Well then, go to the brahmins and householders and say to them:
‘Sirs, the brahmin Soṇadaṇḍa asks
you to wait, as he will also go to see the ascetic Gotama.’”
“Yes, sir,” replied the steward, and did as he was asked.
The Qualities of Soṇadaṇḍa
Now at that time around five hundred brahmins from abroad were residing in Campā on some business.
They heard that
the brahmin Soṇadaṇḍa was going to see the ascetic Gotama.
They approached Soṇadaṇḍa and said to him,
“Is it really true that you are going to see the ascetic Gotama?”
“Yes, gentlemen, it is true.”
“Please don’t, master Soṇadaṇḍa!
It’s not appropriate for you to go to see the ascetic Gotama.
For if you do so, your reputation will diminish and his will increase.
For this reason it’s not appropriate for you to go to see the ascetic Gotama;
it’s appropriate that he comes to see you.
You are well born on both your mother’s and father’s side, of pure descent, irrefutable and impeccable in questions of ancestry back to the seventh paternal generation.
For this reason it’s not appropriate for you to go to see the ascetic Gotama;
it’s appropriate that he comes to see you.
You’re rich, affluent, and wealthy. …
You recite and remember the hymns, and have mastered the three Vedas, together with their vocabularies, ritual, phonology and etymology, and the testament as fifth. You know philology and grammar, and are well versed in cosmology and the marks of a great man. …
You are attractive, good-looking, lovely, of surpassing beauty. You are magnificent, splendid, remarkable to behold. …
You are ethical, mature in ethical conduct. …
You’re a good speaker, with a polished, clear, and articulate voice that expresses the meaning. …
You teach the teachers of many, and teach three hundred students to recite the hymns.
Many students come from various districts and countries for the sake of the hymns, wishing to learn the hymns. …
You’re old, elderly and senior, advanced in years, and have reached the final stage of life.
The ascetic Gotama is young, and has newly gone forth. …
You’re honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed by King Bimbisāra of Magadha …
and the brahmin Pokkharasāti. …
You live in Campā, a crown property given by King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, teeming with living creatures, full of hay, wood, water, and grain, a royal endowment of the highest quality.
For this reason, too, it’s not appropriate for you to go to see the ascetic Gotama;
it’s appropriate that he comes to see you.
The Qualities of the Buddha
When they had spoken, Soṇadaṇḍa said to those brahmins:
“Well then, gentlemen, listen to why it’s appropriate for me to go to see the ascetic Gotama,
and it’s not appropriate for him to come to see me.
He is well born on both his mother’s and father’s side, of pure descent, irrefutable and impeccable in questions of ancestry back to the seventh paternal generation.
For this reason it’s not appropriate for the ascetic Gotama to come to see me;
rather, it’s appropriate for me to go to see him.
When he went forth he abandoned a large family circle. …
When he went forth he abandoned abundant gold coin and bullion stored in dungeons and towers. …
He went forth from the lay life to homelessness while still a youth, young, black-haired, blessed with youth, in the prime of life. …
Though his mother and father wished otherwise, weeping with tearful faces, he shaved off his hair and beard, dressed in ocher robes, and went forth from the lay life to homelessness. …
He is attractive, good-looking, lovely, of surpassing beauty. He is magnificent, splendid, remarkable to behold. …
He is ethical, possessing ethical conduct that is noble and skillful. …
He’s a good speaker, with a polished, clear, and articulate voice that expresses the meaning. …
He’s a teacher of teachers. …
He has ended sensual desire, and is rid of caprice. …
He teaches the efficacy of deeds and action. He doesn’t wish any harm upon the community of brahmins. …
He went forth from an eminent family of unbroken aristocratic lineage. …
He went forth from a rich, affluent, and wealthy family. …
People come from distant lands and distant countries to question him. …
Many thousands of deities have gone for refuge for life to him. …
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’ …
He has the thirty-two marks of a great man. …
He is welcoming, congenial, polite, smiling, open, the first to speak. …
He’s honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed by the four assemblies. …
Many gods and humans are devoted to him. …
While he is residing in a village or town, non-human entities do not harass them. …
He leads an order and a community, and teaches a community, and is said to be the best of the various religious founders.
He didn’t come by his fame in the same ways as those other ascetics and brahmins.
Rather, he came by his fame due to his supreme knowledge and conduct. …
King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha and his wives and children have gone for refuge for life to the ascetic Gotama. …
King Pasenadi of Kosala and his wives and children have gone for refuge for life to the ascetic Gotama. …
The brahmin Pokkharasāti and his wives and children have gone for refuge for life to the ascetic Gotama. …
He’s honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed by King Bimbisāra of Magadha …
King Pasenadi of Kosala …
and the brahmin Pokkharasāti.
The ascetic Gotama has arrived at Campā and is staying at the Gaggarā Lotus Pond.
Any ascetic or brahmin who comes to stay in our village district is our guest,
and should be honored and respected as such.
For this reason, too, it’s not appropriate for Master Gotama to come to see me;
rather, it’s appropriate for me to go to see him.
This is the extent of Master Gotama’s praise that I have learned. But his praises are not confined to this,
for the praise of Master Gotama is limitless.”
When he had spoken, those brahmins said to him,
“According to Soṇadaṇḍa’s praises, if Master Gotama were staying within a hundred leagues, it’d be worthwhile for a faithful gentleman to go to see him, even if he had to carry his own provisions in a shoulder bag.”
“Well then, gentlemen, let’s all go to see the ascetic Gotama.”
Soṇadaṇḍa’s Second Thoughts
Then Soṇadaṇḍa together with a large group of brahmins went to see the Buddha.
But as he reached the far side of the forest, this thought came to mind,
“Suppose I was to ask the ascetic Gotama a question.
He might say to me:
‘Brahmin, you shouldn’t ask your question like that. This is how you should ask it.’ And the assembly might disparage me for that:
‘Soṇadaṇḍa is foolish and incompetent. He’s not able to properly ask the ascetic Gotama a question.’
And when you’re disparaged by the assembly, your reputation diminishes.
When your reputation diminishes, your wealth also diminishes.
But my wealth relies on my reputation.
Or if the ascetic Gotama asks me a question, I might not satisfy him with my answer.
He might say to me:
‘Brahmin, you shouldn’t answer the question like that. This is how you should answer it.’ And the assembly might disparage me for that:
‘Soṇadaṇḍa is foolish and incompetent. He’s not able to satisfy the ascetic Gotama’s mind with his answer.’
And when you’re disparaged by the assembly, your reputation diminishes.
When your reputation diminishes, your wealth also diminishes.
But my wealth relies on my reputation.
On the other hand, if I were to turn back after having come so far without having seen the ascetic Gotama, the assembly might disparage me for that:
‘Soṇadaṇḍa is foolish and incompetent. He’s stuck-up and scared. He doesn’t dare to go and see the ascetic Gotama. For how on earth can he turn back after having come so far without having seen the ascetic Gotama!’
And when you’re disparaged by the assembly, your reputation diminishes.
When your reputation diminishes, your wealth also diminishes.
But my wealth relies on my reputation.”
Then Soṇadaṇḍa went up to the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side.
Before sitting down to one side, some of the brahmins and householders of Campā bowed, some exchanged greetings and polite conversation, some held up their joined palms toward the Buddha, some announced their name and clan, while some kept silent.
But while sitting there, Soṇadaṇḍa continued to be plagued by many second thoughts. He thought,
“If only the ascetic Gotama would ask me about my own teacher’s scriptural heritage of the three Vedas! Then I could definitely satisfy his mind with my answer.”
What Makes a Brahmin
Then the Buddha, knowing what Soṇadaṇḍa was thinking, thought,
“This brahmin Soṇadaṇḍa is worried by his own thoughts.
Why don’t I ask him about his own teacher’s scriptural heritage of the three Vedas?”
So he said to Soṇadaṇḍa,
“Brahmin, how many factors must a brahmin possess for the brahmins to describe him as a brahmin;
and so that when he says ‘I am a brahmin’ he speaks rightly, without falling into falsehood?”
Then Soṇadaṇḍa thought,
“The ascetic Gotama has asked me about exactly what I wanted, what I wished for, what I desired, what I yearned for; that is, my own scriptural heritage.
I can definitely satisfy his mind with my answer.”
Then Soṇadaṇḍa straightened his back, looked around the assembly, and said to the Buddha,
“Master Gotama, a brahmin must possess five factors for the brahmins to describe him as a brahmin;
and so that when he says ‘I am a brahmin’ he speaks rightly, without falling into falsehood.
What five?
It’s when a brahmin is well born on both his mother’s and father’s side, of pure descent, irrefutable and impeccable in questions of ancestry back to the seventh paternal generation.
He recites and remembers the hymns, and has mastered the three Vedas, together with their vocabularies, ritual, phonology and etymology, and the testament as fifth. He knows philology and grammar, and is well versed in cosmology and the marks of a great man.
He is attractive, good-looking, lovely, of surpassing beauty. He is magnificent, splendid, remarkable to behold.
He is ethical, mature in ethical conduct.
He’s astute and clever, being the first or second to hold the sacrificial ladle.
These are the five factors which a brahmin must possess for the brahmins to describe him as a brahmin;
and so that when he says ‘I am a brahmin’ he speaks rightly, without falling into falsehood.”
“But brahmin, is it possible to set aside one of these five factors and still rightly describe someone as a brahmin?”
“It is possible, Master Gotama.
We could leave appearance out of the five factors.
For what does appearance matter?
A brahmin must possess the remaining four factors for the brahmins to rightly describe him as a brahmin.”
“But brahmin, is it possible to set aside one of these four factors and still rightly describe someone as a brahmin?”
“It is possible, Master Gotama.
We could leave the hymns out of the five factors.
For what do the hymns matter?
A brahmin must possess the remaining three factors for the brahmins to rightly describe him as a brahmin.”
“But brahmin, is it possible to set aside one of these three factors and still rightly describe someone as a brahmin?”
“It is possible, Master Gotama.
We could leave birth out of the five factors.
For what does birth matter?
It’s when a brahmin is ethical, mature in ethical conduct;
and he’s astute and clever, being the first or second to hold the sacrificial ladle.
A brahmin must possess these two factors for the brahmins to rightly describe him as a brahmin.”
When he had spoken, those brahmins said to him,
“Please don’t say that, Master Soṇadaṇḍa, please don’t say that!
You’re just condemning appearance, the hymns, and birth! You’re totally going over to the ascetic Gotama’s doctrine!”
So the Buddha said to them,
“Well, brahmins, if you think that
Soṇadaṇḍa is uneducated, a poor speaker, witless, and not capable of having a dialogue with me about this, then leave him aside and you can have a dialogue with me.
But if you think that
he’s learned, a good speaker, astute, and capable of having a dialogue with me about this, then you should stand aside and let him have a dialogue with me.”
When he said this, Soṇadaṇḍa said to the Buddha,
“Let it be, Master Gotama, be silent. I myself will respond to them in a legitimate manner.”
Then he said to those brahmins,
“Don’t say this, gentlemen, don’t say this:
‘You’re just condemning appearance, the hymns, and birth! You’re totally going over to the ascetic Gotama’s doctrine!’
I’m not condemning appearance, hymns, or birth.”
Now at that time Soṇadaṇḍa’s nephew, the student Aṅgaka was sitting in that assembly.
Then Soṇadaṇḍa said to those brahmins,
“Gentlemen, do you see my nephew, the student Aṅgaka?”
“Yes, sir.”
“Aṅgaka is attractive, good-looking, lovely, of surpassing beauty. He is magnificent, splendid, remarkable to behold. There’s no-one in this assembly so good-looking, apart from the ascetic Gotama.
Aṅgaka recites and remembers the hymns, and has mastered the three Vedas, together with their vocabularies, ritual, phonology and etymology, and the testament as fifth. He knows philology and grammar, and is well versed in cosmology and the marks of a great man.
And I am the one who teaches him the hymns.
Aṅgaka is well born on both his mother’s and father’s side, of pure descent, irrefutable and impeccable in questions of ancestry back to the seventh paternal generation.
And I know his mother and father.
But if Aṅgaka were to kill living creatures, steal, commit adultery, lie, and drink alcohol, then what’s the use of his appearance, his hymns, or his birth?
It’s when a brahmin is ethical, mature in ethical conduct;
and he’s astute and clever, being the first or second to hold the sacrificial ladle.
A brahmin must possess these two factors for the brahmins to rightly describe him as a brahmin.”
The Discussion of Ethics and Wisdom
“But brahmin, is it possible to set aside one of these two factors and still rightly describe someone as a brahmin?”
“No, Master Gotama.
For wisdom is cleansed by ethics, and ethics are cleansed by wisdom.
Ethics and wisdom always go together.
An ethical person is wise, and a wise person ethical.
And ethics and wisdom are said to be the best things in the world.
It’s just like when you clean one hand with the other, or clean one foot with the other.
In the same way, wisdom is cleansed by ethics, and ethics are cleansed by wisdom.
Ethics and wisdom always go together.
An ethical person is wise, and a wise person ethical.
And ethics and wisdom are said to be the best things in the world.”
“That’s so true, brahmin, that’s so true! For wisdom is cleansed by ethics, and ethics are cleansed by wisdom.
Ethics and wisdom always go together.
An ethical person is wise, and a wise person ethical.
And ethics and wisdom are said to be the best things in the world.
It’s just like when you clean one hand with the other, or clean one foot with the other.
In the same way, wisdom is cleansed by ethics, and ethics are cleansed by wisdom.
Ethics and wisdom always go together.
An ethical person is wise, and a wise person ethical.
And ethics and wisdom are said to be the best things in the world.
But what, brahmin, is that ethical conduct?
And what is that wisdom?”
“That’s all I know about this matter, Master Gotama.
May Master Gotama himself please clarify the meaning of this.”
“Well then, brahmin, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes sir,” Soṇadaṇḍa replied.
The Buddha said this:
“It’s when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha …
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics.
This, brahmin, is that ethical conduct. …
They enter and remain in the first absorption …
second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption …
They extend and project the mind toward knowledge and vision …
This pertains to their wisdom. …
They understand: ‘… there is no return to any state of existence.’
This pertains to their wisdom.
This, brahmin, is that wisdom.”
Soṇadaṇḍa Declares Himself a Lay Follower
When he had spoken, Soṇadaṇḍa said to the Buddha,
“Excellent, Master Gotama! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, Master Gotama has made the Teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to Master Gotama, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.
Would you and the Order of monks please accept a meal from me tomorrow?”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, Soṇadaṇḍa got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before leaving.
And when the night had passed Soṇadaṇḍa had a variety of delicious foods prepared in his own home. Then he had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Itʼs time, Master Gotama, the meal is ready.”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the home of Soṇadaṇḍa together with the mendicant Saṅgha, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Soṇadaṇḍa served and satisfied the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha with his own hands with a variety of delicious foods.
When the Buddha had eaten and washed his hand and bowl, Soṇadaṇḍa took a low seat and sat to one side.
Seated to one side he said to the Buddha:
“Master Gotama, if, when I have gone to an assembly, I rise from my seat and bow to the Buddha, that assembly might disparage me for that.
And when you’re disparaged by the assembly, your reputation diminishes.
When your reputation diminishes, your wealth also diminishes.
But my wealth relies on my reputation.
If, when I have gone to an assembly, I raise my joined palms, please take it that I have risen from my seat.
And if I undo my turban, please take it that I have bowed.
And Master Gotama, if, when I am in a carriage, I rise from my seat and bow to the Buddha, that assembly might disparage me for that.
If, when I am in a carriage, I hold up my goad, please take it that I have got down from my carriage.
And if I lower my sunshade, please take it that I have bowed.”
Then the Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired the brahmin Soṇadaṇḍa with a Dhamma talk, after which he got up from his seat and left.
Long Discourses
King Mahāsudassana
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying between a pair of sal trees in the sal forest of the Mallas at Upavattana near Kusinārā at the time of his final extinguishment.
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, please don’t become fully extinguished in this little hamlet, this jungle hamlet, this branch hamlet.
There are other great cities such as
Campā, Rājagaha, Sāvatthī, Sāketa, Kosambī, and Benares.
Let the Buddha become fully extinguished there.
There are many well-to-do aristocrats, brahmins, and householders there who are devoted to the Buddha. They will perform the rites of venerating the Realized One’s corpse.”
“Don’t say that, Ānanda! Don’t say that
this is a little hamlet, a jungle hamlet, a branch hamlet.
The Capital City of Kusāvatī
Once upon a time there was a king named Mahāsudassana whose dominion extended to all four sides, and who achieved stability in the country.
His capital was this Kusinārā, which at the time was named Kusāvatī.
It stretched for twelve leagues from east to west, and seven leagues from north to south.
The royal capital of Kusāvatī was successful, prosperous, populous, full of people, with plenty of food.
It was just like Āḷakamandā, the royal capital of the gods, which is successful, prosperous, populous, full of spirits, with plenty of food.
Kusāvatī was never free of ten sounds by day or night, namely:
the sound of elephants, horses, chariots, drums, clay drums, arched harps, singing, horns, gongs, and handbells; and the cry, ‘Eat, drink, be merry!’ as the tenth.
Kusāvatī was encircled by seven ramparts:
one made of gold, one made of silver, one made of beryl, one made of crystal, one made of ruby, one made of emerald, and one made of all precious things.
It had four gates,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
At each gate there were seven pillars, three fathoms deep and four fathoms high,
made of gold, silver, beryl, crystal, ruby, emerald, and all precious things.
It was surrounded by seven rows of palm trees,
made of gold, silver, beryl, crystal, ruby, emerald, and all precious things.
The golden palms had trunks of gold, and leaves and fruits of silver.
The silver palms had trunks of silver, and leaves and fruits of gold.
The beryl palms had trunks of beryl, and leaves and fruits of crystal.
The crystal palms had trunks of crystal, and leaves and fruits of beryl.
The ruby palms had trunks of ruby, and leaves and fruits of emerald.
The emerald palms had trunks of emerald, and leaves and fruits of ruby.
The palms of all precious things had trunks of all precious things, and leaves and fruits of all precious things.
When those rows of palm trees were blown by the wind they sounded graceful, tantalizing, sensuous, lovely, and intoxicating,
like a quintet made up of skilled musicians who had practiced well and kept excellent rhythm.
And any addicts, carousers, or drunkards in Kusāvatī at that time were entertained by that sound.
The Seven Treasures
The Wheel-Treasure
King Mahāsudassana possessed seven treasures and four blessings.
What seven?
On a fifteenth day sabbath, King Mahāsudassana had bathed his head and gone upstairs in the royal longhouse to observe the sabbath.
And the heavenly wheel-treasure appeared to him, with a thousand spokes, with rim and hub, complete in every detail.
Seeing this, the king thought,
‘I have heard that when the heavenly wheel-treasure appears to a king in this way, he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
Am I then a wheel-turning monarch?’
Then King Mahāsudassana, rising from his seat and arranging his robe over one shoulder, took a ceremonial vase in his left hand and besprinkled the wheel-treasure with his right hand, saying:
‘Roll forth, O wheel-treasure! Triumph, O wheel-treasure!’
Then the wheel-treasure rolled towards the east. And the king followed it together with his army of four divisions. In whatever place the wheel-treasure stood still, there the king came to stay together with his army.
And any opposing rulers of the eastern quarter came to him and said,
‘Come, great king! Welcome, great king! We are yours, great king, instruct us.’
The king said,
‘Do not kill living creatures. Do not steal. Do not commit sexual misconduct. Do not lie. Do not drink alcohol. Maintain the current level of taxation.’
And so the opposing rulers of the eastern quarter became his vassals.
Then the wheel-treasure, having plunged into the eastern ocean and emerged again, rolled towards the south. …
Having plunged into the southern ocean and emerged again, it rolled towards the west. …
Having plunged into the western ocean and emerged again, it rolled towards the north, followed by the king together with his army of four divisions.
In whatever place the wheel-treasure stood still, there the king came to stay together with his army.
And any opposing rulers of the northern quarter came to him and said,
‘Come, great king! Welcome, great king! We are yours, great king, instruct us.’
The king said,
‘Do not kill living creatures. Do not steal. Do not commit sexual misconduct. Do not lie. Do not drink alcohol. Maintain the current level of taxation.’
And so the opposing rulers of the northern quarter became his vassals.
And then the wheel-treasure, having triumphed over this land surrounded by ocean, returned to the royal capital of Kusāvatī. There it stood still by the gate to Mahāsudassana’s royal compound at the High Court as if fixed to an axle, illuminating the royal compound.
Such is the wheel-treasure that appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
The Elephant-Treasure
Next, the elephant-treasure appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
It was an all-white sky-walker with psychic power, touching the ground in seven places, a king of elephants named Sabbath.
Seeing him, the king was impressed,
‘This would truly be a fine elephant vehicle, if he would submit to taming.’
Then the elephant-treasure submitted to taming, as if he was a fine thoroughbred elephant that had been tamed for a long time.
Once it so happened that King Mahāsudassana, testing that same elephant-treasure, mounted him in the morning and traversed the land surrounded by ocean before returning to the royal capital in time for breakfast.
Such is the elephant-treasure that appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
The Horse-Treasure
Next, the horse-treasure appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
It was an all-white sky-walker with psychic power, with head of black and mane like woven reeds, a royal steed named Thundercloud.
Seeing him, the king was impressed,
‘This would truly be a fine horse vehicle, if he would submit to taming.’
Then the horse-treasure submitted to taming, as if he was a fine thoroughbred horse that had been tamed for a long time.
Once it so happened that King Mahāsudassana, testing that same horse-treasure, mounted him in the morning and traversed the land surrounded by ocean before returning to the royal capital in time for breakfast.
Such is the horse-treasure that appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
The Jewel-Treasure
Next, the jewel-treasure appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
It was a beryl gem that was naturally beautiful, eight-faceted, well-worked, transparent, clear, and unclouded, endowed with all good qualities.
And the radiance of that jewel spread all-round for a league.
Once it so happened that King Mahāsudassana, testing that same jewel-treasure, mobilized his army of four divisions and, with the jewel hoisted on his banner, set out in the dark of the night.
Then the villagers around them set off to work, thinking that it was day.
Such is the jewel-treasure that appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
The Woman-Treasure
Next, the woman-treasure appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
She was attractive, good-looking, lovely, of surpassing beauty. She was neither too tall nor too short; neither too thin nor too fat; neither too dark nor too light. She outdid human beauty without reaching divine beauty.
And her touch was like a tuft of cotton-wool or kapok.
When it was cool her limbs were warm, and when it was warm her limbs were cool.
The fragrance of sandal floated from her body, and lotus from her mouth.
She got up before the king and went to bed after him, and was obliging, behaving nicely and speaking politely.
The woman-treasure did not betray the wheel-turning monarch even in thought, still less in deed.
Such is the woman-treasure that appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
The Householder-Treasure
Next, the householder-treasure appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
The power of clairvoyance manifested in him as a result of past deeds, by which he sees hidden treasure, both owned and ownerless.
He approached the king and said,
‘Relax, sire. I will take care of the treasury.’
Once it so happened that the wheel-turning monarch, testing that same householder-treasure, boarded a boat and sailed to the middle of the Ganges river. Then he said to the householder-treasure,
‘Householder, I need gold coins and bullion.’
‘Well then, great king, draw the boat up to one shore.’
‘It’s right here, householder, that I need gold coins and bullion.’
Then that householder-treasure, immersing both hands in the water, pulled up a pot full of gold coin and bullion, and said to the king,
‘Is this sufficient, great king? Has enough been done, great king, enough offered?’
The king said,
‘That is sufficient, householder. Enough has been done, enough offered.’
Such is the householder-treasure that appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
The Counselor-Treasure
Next, the counselor-treasure appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
He was astute, competent, intelligent, and capable of getting the king to appoint who should be appointed, dismiss who should be dismissed, and retain who should be retained.
He approached the king and said,
‘Relax, sire. I shall issue instructions.’
Such is the counselor-treasure that appeared to King Mahāsudassana.
These are the seven treasures possessed by King Mahāsudassana.
The Four Blessings
King Mahāsudassana possessed four blessings.
And what are the four blessings?
He was attractive, good-looking, lovely, of surpassing beauty, more so than other people.
This is the first blessing.
Furthermore, he was long-lived, more so than other people.
This is the second blessing.
Furthermore, he was rarely ill or unwell, and his stomach digested well, being neither too hot nor too cold, more so than other people.
This is the third blessing.
Furthermore, he was as dear and beloved to the brahmins and householders
as a father is to his children.
And the brahmins and householders were as dear to the king
as children are to their father.
Once it so happened that King Mahāsudassana went with his army of four divisions to visit a park.
Then the brahmins and householders went up to him and said,
‘Slow down, Your Majesty, so we may see you longer!’
And the king addressed his charioteer,
‘Drive slowly, charioteer, so I can see the brahmins and householders longer!’
This is the fourth blessing.
These are the four blessings possessed by King Mahāsudassana.
Lotus Ponds in the Palace of Principle
Then King Mahāsudassana thought,
‘Why don’t I have lotus ponds built between the palms, at intervals of a hundred bow lengths?’
So that’s what he did.
The lotus ponds were lined with tiles of four colors,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
And four flights of stairs of four colors descended into each lotus pond,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
The golden stairs had posts of gold, and banisters and finials of silver.
The silver stairs had posts of silver, and banisters and finials of gold.
The beryl stairs had posts of beryl, and banisters and finials of crystal.
The crystal stairs had posts of crystal, and banisters and finials of beryl.
Those lotus ponds were surrounded by two balustrades, made of gold and silver.
The golden balustrades had posts of gold, and banisters and finials of silver.
The silver balustrades had posts of silver, and banisters and finials of gold.
Then King Mahāsudassana thought,
‘Why don’t I plant flowers in the lotus ponds such as blue water lilies, and lotuses of pink, yellow, and white, blooming all year round, and accessible to the public?’
So that’s what he did.
Then King Mahāsudassana thought,
‘Why don’t I appoint bath attendants to help bathe the people who come to bathe in the lotus ponds?’
So that’s what he did.
Then King Mahāsudassana thought,
‘Why don’t I set up charities on the banks of the lotus ponds,
so that those in need of food, drink, clothes, vehicles, beds, women, gold, or silver can get what they need?’
So that’s what he did.
Then the brahmins and householders came to the king bringing abundant wealth and said,
‘Sire, this abundant wealth is specially for you alone; may Your Highness accept it!’
‘There’s enough raised for me through regular taxes. Let this be for you; and here, take even more!’
When the king turned them down, they withdrew to one side to think up a plan,
‘It wouldn’t be proper for us to take this abundant wealth back to our own homes.
Why don’t we build a home for King Mahāsudassana?’
They went up to the king and said,
‘We shall have a home built for you, sire!’
King Mahāsudassana consented in silence.
And then Sakka, lord of gods, knowing what the king was thinking, addressed the god Vissakamma,
‘Come, dear Vissakamma, build a palace named Principle as a home for King Mahāsudassana.’
‘Yes, lord,’ replied Vissakamma. Then, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, he vanished from the gods of the Thirty-Three and appeared in front of King Mahāsudassana.
Vissakamma said to the king,
‘I shall build a palace named Principle as a home for you, sire.’
King Mahāsudassana consented in silence.
And so that’s what Vissakamma did.
The Palace of Principle stretched for a league from east to west, and half a league from north to south.
It was lined with tiles of four colors, three fathoms high,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
It had 84,000 pillars of four colors,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
It was covered with panels of four colors,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
It had twenty-four staircases of four colors,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
The golden stairs had posts of gold, and banisters and finials of silver.
The silver stairs had posts of silver, and banisters and finials of gold.
The beryl stairs had posts of beryl, and banisters and finials of crystal.
The crystal stairs had posts of crystal, and banisters and finials of beryl.
It had 84,000 chambers of four colors,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
In each chamber a couch was spread: in the golden chamber a couch of silver; in the silver chamber a couch of gold; in the beryl chamber a couch of ivory; in the crystal chamber a couch of hardwood.
At the door of the golden chamber stood a palm tree of silver, with trunk of silver, and leaves and fruits of gold.
At the door of the silver chamber stood a palm tree of gold, with trunk of gold, and leaves and fruits of silver.
At the door of the beryl chamber stood a palm tree of crystal, with trunk of crystal, and leaves and fruits of beryl.
At the door of the crystal chamber stood a palm tree of beryl, with trunk of beryl, and leaves and fruits of crystal.
Then King Mahāsudassana thought,
‘Why don’t I build a grove of golden palm trees at the door to the great foyer, where I can sit for the day?’
So that’s what he did.
The Palace of Principle was surrounded by two balustrades, made of gold and silver.
The golden balustrades had posts of gold, and banisters and finials of silver.
The silver balustrades had posts of silver, and banisters and finials of gold.
The Palace of Principle was surrounded by two nets of bells,
made of gold and silver.
The golden net had bells of silver, and the silver net had bells of gold.
When those nets of bells were blown by the wind they sounded graceful, tantalizing, sensuous, lovely, and intoxicating,
like a quintet made up of skilled musicians who had practiced well and kept excellent rhythm.
And any addicts, carousers, or drunkards in Kusāvatī at that time were entertained by that sound.
When it was finished, the palace was hard to look at, dazzling to the eyes,
like the sun rising in a clear and cloudless sky in the last month of the rainy season.
Then King Mahāsudassana thought,
‘Why don’t I build a lotus pond named Principle in front of the palace?’
So that’s what he did.
The Lotus Pond of Principle stretched for a league from east to west, and half a league from north to south.
It was lined with tiles of four colors,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
It had twenty-four staircases of four colors,
made of gold, silver, beryl, and crystal.
The golden stairs had posts of gold, and banisters and finials of silver.
The silver stairs had posts of silver, and banisters and finials of gold.
The beryl stairs had posts of beryl, and banisters and finials of crystal.
The crystal stairs had posts of crystal, and banisters and finials of beryl.
It was surrounded by two balustrades, made of gold and silver.
The golden balustrades had posts of gold, and banisters and finials of silver.
The silver balustrades had posts of silver, and banisters and finials of gold.
It was surrounded by seven rows of palm trees,
made of gold, silver, beryl, crystal, ruby, emerald, and all precious things.
The golden palms had trunks of gold, and leaves and fruits of silver.
The silver palms had trunks of silver, and leaves and fruits of gold.
The beryl palms had trunks of beryl, and leaves and fruits of crystal.
The crystal palms had trunks of crystal, and leaves and fruits of beryl.
The ruby palms had trunks of ruby, and leaves and fruits of emerald.
The emerald palms had trunks of emerald, and leaves and fruits of ruby.
The palms of all precious things had trunks of all precious things, and leaves and fruits of all precious things.
When those rows of palm trees were blown by the wind they sounded graceful, tantalizing, sensuous, lovely, and intoxicating,
like a quintet made up of skilled musicians who had practiced well and kept excellent rhythm.
And any addicts, carousers, or drunkards in Kusāvatī at that time were entertained by that sound.
When the palace and its lotus pond were finished, King Mahāsudassana served those who were reckoned as true ascetics and brahmins with all they desired. Then he ascended the Palace of Principle.
Attaining Absorption
Then King Mahāsudassana thought,
‘Of what deed of mine is this the fruit and result, that I am now so mighty and powerful?’
Then King Mahāsudassana thought,
‘It is the fruit and result of three kinds of deeds:
giving, self-control, and restraint.’
Then he went to the great foyer, stood at the door, and expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
‘Stop here, sensual, malicious, and cruel thoughts—
no further!’
Then he entered the great foyer and sat on the golden couch. Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, he entered and remained in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
As the placing of the mind and keeping it connected were stilled, he entered and remained in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
And with the fading away of rapture, he entered and remained in the third absorption, where he meditated with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
With the giving up of pleasure and pain, and the ending of former happiness and sadness, he entered and remained in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
Then King Mahāsudassana left the great foyer and entered the golden chamber, where he sat on the golden couch.
He meditated spreading a heart full of love to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way he spread a heart full of love above, below, across, everywhere, all around, to everyone in the world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
He meditated spreading a heart full of compassion …
He meditated spreading a heart full of rejoicing …
He meditated spreading a heart full of equanimity to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, he spread a heart full of equanimity to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Of All Cities
King Mahāsudassana had 84,000 cities, with the royal capital of Kusāvatī foremost.
He had 84,000 palaces, with the Palace of Principle foremost.
He had 84,000 chambers, with the great foyer foremost.
He had 84,000 couches made of gold, silver, ivory, and hardwood. They were spread with woollen covers—shag-piled, pure white, or embroidered with flowers—and spread with a fine deer hide, with a canopy above and red pillows at both ends.
He had 84,000 bull elephants with gold adornments and banners, covered with gold netting, with the royal bull elephant named Sabbath foremost.
He had 84,000 horses with gold adornments and banners, covered with gold netting, with the royal steed named Thundercloud foremost.
He had 84,000 chariots upholstered with the hide of lions, tigers, and leopards, and cream rugs, with gold adornments and banners, covered with gold netting, with the chariot named Triumph foremost.
He had 84,000 jewels, with the jewel-treasure foremost.
He had 84,000 women, with Queen Subhaddā foremost.
He had 84,000 householders, with the householder-treasure foremost.
He had 84,000 aristocrat vassals, with the counselor-treasure foremost.
He had 84,000 milk-cows with silken reins and bronze pails.
He had 8,400,000,000 fine cloths of linen, cotton, silk, and wool.
He had 84,000 servings of food, which were presented to him as offerings in the morning and evening.
Now at that time his 84,000 royal elephants came to attend on him in the morning and evening.
Then King Mahāsudassana thought,
‘What if instead half of the elephants took turns to attend on me at the end of each century?’
He instructed the counselor-treasure to do this, and so it was done.
The Visit of Queen Subhaddā
Then, after many years, many hundred years, many thousand years had passed, Queen Subhaddā thought,
‘It is long since I have seen the king.
Why don’t I go to see him?’
So the queen addressed the ladies of the harem,
‘Come, bathe your heads and dress in yellow.
It is long since we saw the king, and we shall go to see him.’
‘Yes, ma’am,’ replied the ladies of the harem. They did as she asked and returned to the queen.
Then the queen addressed the counselor-treasure,
‘Dear counselor-treasure, please ready the army of four divisions. It is long since we saw the king, and we shall go to see him.’
‘Yes, my queen,’ he replied, and did as he was asked. He informed the queen,
‘My queen, the army of four divisions is ready,
please go at your convenience.’
Then Queen Subhaddā together with the ladies of the harem went with the army to the Palace of Principle. She ascended the palace and went to the great foyer,
where she stood leaning against a door-post.
Hearing them, the king thought,
‘What’s that, it sounds like a big crowd!’ Coming out of the foyer he saw Queen Subhaddā leaning against a door-post and said to her,
‘Please stay there, my queen, don’t enter in here.’
Then he addressed a certain man,
‘Come, mister, bring the golden couch from the great foyer and set it up in the golden palm grove.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ that man replied, and did as he was asked.
The king laid down in the lion’s posture—on the right side, placing one foot on top of the other—mindful and aware.
Then Queen Subhaddā thought,
‘The king’s faculties are so very clear, and the complexion of his skin is pure and bright. Let him not pass away!’ She said to him,
‘Sire, you have 84,000 cities, with the royal capital of Kusāvatī foremost.
Arouse desire for these! Take an interest in life!’
And she likewise urged the king to live on by taking an interest in all his possessions as described above.
When the queen had spoken, the king said to her,
‘For a long time, my queen, you have spoken to me with loving, desirable, pleasant, and agreeable words.
And yet in my final hour, your words are undesirable, unpleasant, and disagreeable!’
‘Then how exactly, Your Majesty, am I to speak to you?’
‘Like this, my queen:
“Sire, we must be parted and separated from all we hold dear and beloved. Don’t pass away with concerns. Such concern is suffering, and it’s criticized.
Sire, you have 84,000 cities, with the royal capital of Kusāvatī foremost.
Give up desire for these! Take no interest in life!”’
And so on for all the king’s possessions.
When the king had spoken, Queen Subhaddā cried and burst out in tears.
Wiping away her tears, the queen said to the king:
‘Sire, we must be parted and separated from all we hold dear and beloved. Don’t pass away with concerns. Such concern is suffering, and it’s criticized.
Sire, you have 84,000 cities, with the royal capital of Kusāvatī foremost.
Give up desire for these! Take no interest in life!’
And she continued, listing all the king’s possessions.
Rebirth in the Brahmā Realm
Not long after that, King Mahāsudassana passed away.
And the feeling he had close to death was like a householder or their child falling asleep after eating a delectable meal.
When he passed away King Mahāsudassana was reborn in a good place, a Brahmā realm.
Ānanda, King Mahāsudassana played children’s games for 84,000 years.
He ruled as viceroy for 84,000 years.
He ruled as king for 84,000 years.
He led the spiritual life as a layman in the Palace of Principle for 84,000 years.
And having developed the four Brahmā meditations, when his body broke up, after death, he was reborn in a good place, a Brahmā realm.
Now, Ānanda, you might think:
‘Surely King Mahāsudassana must have been someone else at that time?’
But you should not see it like that.
I myself was King Mahāsudassana at that time.
Mine were the 84,000 cities, with the royal capital of Kusāvatī foremost. And mine were all the other possessions.
Of those 84,000 cities, I only stayed in one, the capital Kusāvatī.
Of those 84,000 mansions, I only dwelt in one, the Palace of Principle.
Of those 84,000 chambers, I only dwelt in the great foyer.
Of those 84,000 couches, I only used one, made of gold or silver or ivory or heartwood.
Of those 84,000 bull elephants, I only rode one, the royal bull elephant named Sabbath.
Of those 84,000 horses, I only rode one, the royal horse named Thundercloud.
Of those 84,000 chariots, I only rode one, the chariot named Triumph.
Of those 84,000 women, I was only served by one, a maiden of the aristocratic or merchant classes.
Of those 8,400,000,000 cloths, I only wore one pair, made of fine linen, cotton, silk, or wool.
Of those 84,000 servings of food, I only had one, eating at most a serving of rice and suitable sauce.
See, Ānanda! All those conditioned phenomena have passed, ceased, and perished.
So impermanent are conditions,
so unstable are conditions,
so unreliable are conditions.
This is quite enough for you to become disillusioned, dispassionate, and freed regarding all conditions.
Six times, Ānanda, I recall having laid down my body at this place. And the seventh time was as a wheel-turning monarch, a just and principled king, at which time my dominion extended to all four sides, I achieved stability in the country, and I possessed the seven treasures.
But Ānanda, I do not see any place in this world with its gods, Māras, and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its gods and humans where the Realized One would lay down his body for the eighth time.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“Oh! Conditions are impermanent,
their nature is to rise and fall;
having arisen, they cease;
their stilling is true bliss.”
Long Discourses
Inspiring Confidence
Sāriputta’s Lion’s Roar
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Nālandā in Pāvārika’s mango grove.
Then Sāriputta went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, I have such confidence in the Buddha that I believe there’s no other ascetic or brahmin—whether past, future, or present—whose direct knowledge is superior to the Buddha when it comes to awakening.”
“That’s a grand and dramatic statement, Sāriputta. You’ve roared a definitive, categorical lion’s roar, saying:
‘I have such confidence in the Buddha that
I believe there’s no other ascetic or brahmin—whether past, future, or present—whose direct knowledge is superior to the Buddha when it comes to awakening.’
What about all the perfected ones, the fully awakened Buddhas who lived in the past? Have you comprehended their minds to know that
those Buddhas had such ethics, or such qualities, or such wisdom, or such meditation, or such freedom?”
“No, sir.”
“And what about all the perfected ones, the fully awakened Buddhas who will live in the future? Have you comprehended their minds to know that
those Buddhas will have such ethics, or such qualities, or such wisdom, or such meditation, or such freedom?”
“No, sir.”
“And what about me, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha at present? Have you comprehended my mind to know that
I have such ethics, or such qualities, or such wisdom, or such meditation, or such freedom?”
“No, sir.”
“Well then, Sāriputta, given that you don’t comprehend the minds of Buddhas past, future, or present,
what exactly are you doing, making such a grand and dramatic statement, roaring such a definitive, categorical lion’s roar?”
“Sir, though I don’t comprehend the minds of Buddhas past, future, and present,
still I understand this by inference from the teaching.
Suppose there were a king’s frontier citadel with fortified embankments, ramparts, and arches, and a single gate.
And it has a gatekeeper who is astute, competent, and clever. He keeps strangers out and lets known people in.
As he walks around the patrol path, he doesn’t see a hole or cleft in the wall, not even one big enough for a cat to slip out.
They’d think,
‘Whatever sizable creatures enter or leave the citadel, all of them do so via this gate.’
In the same way, I understand this by inference from the teaching:
‘All the perfected ones, fully awakened Buddhas—whether past, future, or present—give up the five hindrances, corruptions of the heart that weaken wisdom. Their mind is firmly established in the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. They correctly develop the seven awakening factors. And they wake up to the supreme perfect awakening.’
Sir, once I approached the Buddha to listen to the teaching.
He explained Dhamma with its higher and higher stages, with its better and better stages, with its dark and bright sides.
When I directly knew a certain principle of those teachings, in accordance with how I was taught, I came to a conclusion about the teachings. I had confidence in the Teacher:
‘The Blessed One is a fully awakened Buddha. The teaching is well explained. The Saṅgha is practicing well.’
Teaching Skillful Qualities
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches skillful qualities is unsurpassable.
This consists of such skillful qualities as
the four kinds of mindfulness meditation, the four right efforts, the four bases of psychic power, the five faculties, the five powers, the seven awakening factors, and the noble eightfold path.
By these a mendicant realizes the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life. And they live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to skillful qualities.
The Buddha understands this without exception. There is nothing to be understood beyond this whereby another ascetic or brahmin might be superior in direct knowledge to the Buddha when it comes to skillful qualities.
Describing the Sense Fields
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the description of the sense fields is unsurpassable.
There are these six interior and exterior sense fields.
The eye and sights, the ear and sounds, the nose and smells, the tongue and tastes, the body and touches, and the mind and thoughts.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to describing the sense fields.
The Buddha understands this without exception. There is nothing to be understood beyond this whereby another ascetic or brahmin might be superior in direct knowledge to the Buddha when it comes to describing the sense fields.
The Conception of the Embryo
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the conception of the embryo is unsurpassable.
There are these four kinds of conception.
Firstly, someone is unaware when conceived in their mother’s womb, unaware as they remain there, and unaware as they emerge.
This is the first kind of conception.
Furthermore, someone is aware when conceived in their mother’s womb, but unaware as they remain there, and unaware as they emerge.
This is the second kind of conception.
Furthermore, someone is aware when conceived in their mother’s womb, aware as they remain there, but unaware as they emerge.
This is the third kind of conception.
Furthermore, someone is aware when conceived in their mother’s womb, aware as they remain there, and aware as they emerge.
This is the fourth kind of conception.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to the conception of the embryo.
Ways of Revealing
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the different ways of revealing is unsurpassable.
There are these four ways of revealing.
Firstly, someone reveals by means of a sign,
‘This is what you’re thinking, such is your thought, and thus is your state of mind.’
And even if they reveal this many times, it turns out exactly so, not otherwise.
This is the first way of revealing.
Furthermore, someone reveals after hearing it from humans or non-humans or deities,
‘This is what you’re thinking, such is your thought, and thus is your state of mind.’
And even if they reveal this many times, it turns out exactly so, not otherwise.
This is the second way of revealing.
Furthermore, someone reveals by hearing the sound of thought spreading as someone thinks and considers,
‘This is what you’re thinking, such is your thought, and thus is your state of mind.’
And even if they reveal this many times, it turns out exactly so, not otherwise.
This is the third way of revealing.
Furthermore, someone comprehends the mind of a person who has attained the immersion that’s free of placing the mind and keeping it connected.
They understand,
‘Judging by the way this person’s intentions are directed, immediately after this mind state, they’ll think this thought.’
And even if they reveal this many times, it turns out exactly so, not otherwise.
This is the fourth way of revealing.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to the ways of revealing.
Attainments of Vision
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the attainments of vision is unsurpassable.
There are these four attainments of vision.
Firstly, some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they examine their own body up from the soles of the feet and down from the tips of the hairs, wrapped in skin and full of many kinds of filth.
‘In this body there is head hair, body hair, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, diaphragm, spleen, lungs, intestines, mesentery, undigested food, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, grease, saliva, snot, synovial fluid, urine.’
This is the first attainment of vision.
Furthermore, some ascetic or brahmin attains that and goes beyond it.
They examine a person’s bones with skin, flesh, and blood.
This is the second attainment of vision.
Furthermore, some ascetic or brahmin attains that and goes beyond it.
They understand a person’s stream of consciousness, unbroken on both sides, established in both this world and the next.
This is the third attainment of vision.
Furthermore, some ascetic or brahmin attains that and goes beyond it.
They understand a person’s stream of consciousness, unbroken on both sides, not established in either this world or the next.
This is the fourth attainment of vision.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to attainments of vision.
Descriptions of Individuals
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the description of individuals is unsurpassable.
There are these seven individuals.
One freed both ways, one freed by wisdom, a personal witness, one attained to view, one freed by faith, a follower of the teachings, a follower by faith.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to the description of individuals.
Kinds of Striving
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the kinds of striving is unsurpassable.
There are these seven awakening factors: the awakening factors of mindfulness, investigation of principles, energy, rapture, tranquility, immersion, and equanimity.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to the kinds of striving.
Ways of Practice
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the ways of practice is unsurpassable.
Painful practice with slow insight,
painful practice with swift insight,
pleasant practice with slow insight, and
pleasant practice with swift insight.
Of these, the painful practice with slow insight is said to be inferior both ways: because it’s painful and because it’s slow.
The painful practice with swift insight is said to be inferior because it’s painful.
The pleasant practice with slow insight is said to be inferior because it’s slow.
But the pleasant practice with swift insight is said to be superior both ways: because it’s pleasant and because it’s swift.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to the ways of practice.
Behavior in Speech
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches behavior in speech is unsurpassable.
It’s when someone doesn’t use speech that’s connected with lying, or divisive, or backbiting, or aggressively trying to win.
They speak only wise counsel, valuable and timely.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to behavior in speech.
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches a person’s ethical behavior is unsurpassable.
It’s when someone is honest and faithful. They don’t use deceit, flattery, hinting, or belittling, and they don’t use material possessions to chase after other material possessions. They guard the sense doors and eat in moderation. They’re fair, dedicated to wakefulness, tireless, energetic, and meditative. They have good memory, eloquence, range, retention, and thoughtfulness. They’re not greedy for sensual pleasures. They are mindful and alert.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to a person’s ethical behavior.
Responsiveness to Instruction
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the different degrees of responsiveness to instruction is unsurpassable.
There are these four degrees of responsiveness to instruction.
The Buddha knows by investigating inside another individual:
‘By practicing as instructed this individual will, with the ending of three fetters, become a stream-enterer, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.’
The Buddha knows by investigating inside another individual:
‘By practicing as instructed this individual will, with the ending of three fetters, and the weakening of greed, hate, and delusion, become a once-returner. They will come back to this world once only, then make an end of suffering.’
The Buddha knows by investigating inside another individual:
‘By practicing as instructed this individual will, with the ending of the five lower fetters, be reborn spontaneously. They will be extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.’
The Buddha knows by investigating inside another individual:
‘By practicing as instructed this individual will realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.’
This is unsurpassable when it comes to the different degrees of responsiveness to instruction.
The Knowledge and Freedom of Others
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the knowledge and freedom of other individuals is unsurpassable.
The Buddha knows by investigating inside another individual:
‘With the ending of three fetters this individual will become a stream-enterer, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.’
The Buddha knows by investigating inside another individual:
‘With the ending of three fetters, and the weakening of greed, hate, and delusion, this individual will become a once-returner. They will come back to this world once only, then make an end of suffering.’
The Buddha knows by investigating inside another individual:
‘With the ending of the five lower fetters, this individual will be reborn spontaneously. They will be extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.’
The Buddha knows by investigating inside another individual:
‘This individual will realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.’
This is unsurpassable when it comes to the knowledge and freedom of other individuals.
Eternalism
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches eternalist doctrines is unsurpassable.
There are these three eternalist doctrines.
Firstly, some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect many hundreds of thousands of past lives,
with features and details.
‘I know that in the past the cosmos expanded or contracted.
I don’t know whether in the future the cosmos will expand or contract.
The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.’
This is the first eternalist doctrine.
Furthermore, some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect their past lives for as many as ten eons of the expansion and contraction of the cosmos,
with features and details.
‘I know that in the past the cosmos expanded or contracted.
I don’t know whether in the future the cosmos will expand or contract.
The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.’
This is the second eternalist doctrine.
Furthermore, some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect their past lives for as many as forty eons of the expansion and contraction of the cosmos,
with features and details.
‘I know that in the past the cosmos expanded or contracted.
I don’t know whether in the future the cosmos will expand or contract.
The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.’
This is the third eternalist doctrine.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to eternalist doctrines.
Recollecting Past Lives
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the knowledge of recollecting past lives is unsurpassable.
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect their many kinds of past lives.
That is: one, two, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand rebirths; many eons of the world contracting, many eons of the world expanding, many eons of the world contracting and expanding. They remember:
‘There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food.
This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.’ And so they recollect their many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
Sir, there are gods whose life span cannot be reckoned or calculated.
Still, no matter what incarnation they have previously been reborn in—whether physical or formless or percipient or non-percipient or neither percipient nor non-percipient—
they recollect their many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to the knowledge of recollecting past lives.
Death and Rebirth
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches the knowledge of the death and rebirth of sentient beings is unsurpassable.
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that with clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn
—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds:
‘These dear beings did bad things by way of body, speech, and mind.
They spoke ill of the noble ones; they had wrong view; and they chose to act out of that wrong view.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
These dear beings, however, did good things by way of body, speech, and mind.
They never spoke ill of the noble ones; they had right view; and they chose to act out of that right view. When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.’ And so, with clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to the knowledge of death and rebirth.
Psychic Powers
And moreover, sir, how the Buddha teaches psychic power is unsurpassable.
There are these two kinds of psychic power.
There are psychic powers that are accompanied by defilements and attachments, and are said to be ignoble.
And there are psychic powers that are free of defilements and attachments, and are said to be noble.
What are the psychic powers that are accompanied by defilements and attachments, and are said to be ignoble?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they wield the many kinds of psychic power:
multiplying themselves and becoming one again; going unimpeded through a wall, a rampart, or a mountain as if through space; diving in and out of the earth as if it were water; walking on water as if it were earth; flying cross-legged through the sky like a bird; touching and stroking with the hand the sun and moon, so mighty and powerful; controlling the body as far as the Brahmā realm.
These are the psychic powers that are accompanied by defilements and attachments, and are said to be ignoble.
But what are the psychic powers that are free of defilements and attachments, and are said to be noble?
It’s when, if a mendicant wishes:
‘May I meditate perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive,’ that’s what they do.
If they wish:
‘May I meditate perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive,’ that’s what they do.
If they wish:
‘May I meditate perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive and the unrepulsive,’ that’s what they do.
If they wish:
‘May I meditate perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive and the repulsive,’ that’s what they do.
If they wish:
‘May I meditate staying equanimous, mindful and aware, rejecting both the repulsive and the unrepulsive,’ that’s what they do.
These are the psychic powers that are free of defilements and attachments, and are said to be noble.
This is unsurpassable when it comes to psychic powers.
The Buddha understands this without exception. There is nothing to be understood beyond this whereby another ascetic or brahmin might be superior in direct knowledge to the Buddha when it comes to psychic powers.
The Four Absorptions
The Buddha has achieved what should be achieved by a faithful gentleman by being energetic and strong, by human strength, energy, vigor, and exertion.
The Buddha doesn’t indulge in sensual pleasures, which are low, crude, ordinary, ignoble, and pointless. And he doesn’t indulge in self-mortification, which is painful, ignoble, and pointless.
He gets the four absorptions—blissful meditations in the present life that belong to the higher mind—when he wants, without trouble or difficulty.
On Being Questioned
Sir, if they were to ask me,
‘Reverend Sāriputta, is there any other ascetic or brahmin—whether past, future, or present—whose direct knowledge is superior to the Buddha when it comes to awakening?’ I would tell them ‘No.’
But if they were to ask me,
‘Reverend Sāriputta, is there any other ascetic or brahmin—whether past or future—whose direct knowledge is equal to the Buddha when it comes to awakening?’ I would tell them ‘Yes.’
But if they were to ask: ‘Reverend Sāriputta, is there any other ascetic or brahmin at present whose direct knowledge is equal to the Buddha when it comes to awakening?’ I would tell them ‘No.’
But if they were to ask me,
‘But why does Venerable Sāriputta grant this in respect of some but not others?’ I would answer them like this,
‘Reverends, I have heard and learned this in the presence of the Buddha:
“The perfected ones, fully awakened Buddhas of the past and the future are equal to myself when it comes to awakening.”
And I have also heard and learned this in the presence of the Buddha:
“It’s impossible for two perfected ones, fully awakened Buddhas to arise in the same solar system at the same time.”’
Answering this way, I trust that I repeated what the Buddha has said, and didn’t misrepresent him with an untruth. I trust my explanation was in line with the teaching, and that there are no legitimate grounds for rebuke or criticism.”
“Indeed, Sāriputta, in answering this way you repeat what I’ve said, and don’t misrepresent me with an untruth. Your explanation is in line with the teaching, and there are no legitimate grounds for rebuke or criticism.”
Incredible and Amazing
When he had spoken, Venerable Udāyī said to the Buddha,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing! The Realized One has so few wishes, such contentment, such self-effacement!
For even though the Realized One has such power and might, he will not make a display of himself.
If the wanderers following other paths were to see even a single one of these qualities in themselves they’d carry around a banner to that effect.
It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing! The Realized One has so few wishes, such contentment, such self-effacement!
For even though the Realized One has such power and might, he will not make a display of himself.”
“See, Udāyī, how the Realized One has so few wishes, such contentment, such self-effacement.
For even though the Realized One has such power and might, he will not make a display of himself.
If the wanderers following other paths were to see even a single one of these qualities in themselves they’d carry around a banner to that effect.
See, Udāyī, how the Realized One has so few wishes, such contentment, such self-effacement.
For even though the Realized One has such power and might, he will not make a display of himself.”
Then the Buddha said to Venerable Sāriputta,
“So Sāriputta, you should frequently speak this exposition of the teaching to the monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen.
Though there will be some foolish people who have doubt or uncertainty regarding the Realized One, when they hear this exposition of the teaching they’ll give up that doubt or uncertainty.”
That’s how Venerable Sāriputta declared his confidence in the Buddha’s presence.
And that’s why the name of this discussion is “Inspiring Confidence”.
Long Discourses
The Prime Net
Talk on Wanderers
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was traveling along the road between Rājagaha and Nālanda together with a large Saṅgha of around five hundred mendicants.
The wanderer Suppiya was also traveling along the same road, together with his pupil, the brahmin student Brahmadatta.
Meanwhile, Suppiya criticized the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha in many ways,
but his pupil Brahmadatta praised them in many ways.
And so both teacher and pupil followed behind the Buddha and the Saṅgha of mendicants directly contradicting each other.
Then the Buddha took up residence for the night in the royal rest-house in Ambalaṭṭhikā together with the Saṅgha of mendicants.
And Suppiya and Brahmadatta did likewise.
There too, Suppiya criticized the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha in many ways,
but his pupil Brahmadatta praised them in many ways.
And so both teacher and pupil kept on directly contradicting each other.
Then several mendicants rose at the crack of dawn and sat together in the pavilion, where the topic of evaluation came up:
“It’s incredible, reverends, it’s amazing how the diverse attitudes of sentient beings have been clearly comprehended by the Blessed One, who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
For this Suppiya criticizes the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha in many ways,
while his pupil Brahmadatta praises them in many ways.
And so both teacher and pupil followed behind the Buddha and the Saṅgha of mendicants directly contradicting each other.”
When the Buddha found out about this discussion on evaluation among the mendicants, he went to the pavilion, where he sat on the seat spread out and addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants, what were you sitting talking about just now? What conversation was left unfinished?”
The mendicants told him what had happened, adding,
“This was our conversation that was unfinished when the Buddha arrived.”
“Mendicants, if others criticize me, the teaching, or the Saṅgha, don’t make yourselves resentful, bitter, and exasperated.
You’ll get angry and upset, which would be an obstacle for you alone.
If others were to criticize me, the teaching, or the Saṅgha, and you got angry and upset, would you be able to understand whether they spoke well or poorly?”
“No, sir.”
“If others criticize me, the teaching, or the Saṅgha, you should explain that what is untrue is in fact untrue:
‘This is why that’s untrue, this is why that’s false. There’s no such thing in us, it’s not found among us.’
If others praise me, the teaching, or the Saṅgha, don’t make yourselves thrilled, elated, and excited.
You’ll get thrilled, elated, and excited, which would be an obstacle for you alone.
If others praise me, the teaching, or the Saṅgha, you should acknowledge that what is true is in fact true:
‘This is why that’s true, this is why that’s correct. There is such a thing in us, it is found among us.’
The Shorter Section on Ethics
When an ordinary person speaks praise of the Realized One, they speak only of trivial, insignificant details of mere ethics.
And what are the trivial, insignificant details of mere ethics that an ordinary person speaks of?
‘The ascetic Gotama has given up killing living creatures. He has renounced the rod and the sword. He’s scrupulous and kind, living full of compassion for all living beings.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘The ascetic Gotama has given up stealing. He takes only what’s given, and expects only what’s given. He keeps himself clean by not thieving.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘The ascetic Gotama has given up unchastity. He is celibate, set apart, avoiding the common practice of sex.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘The ascetic Gotama has given up lying. He speaks the truth and sticks to the truth. He’s honest and trustworthy, and doesn’t trick the world with his words.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘The ascetic Gotama has given up divisive speech.
He doesn’t repeat in one place what he heard in another so as to divide people against each other. Instead, he reconciles those who are divided, supporting unity, delighting in harmony, loving harmony, speaking words that promote harmony.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘The ascetic Gotama has given up harsh speech. He speaks in a way that’s mellow, pleasing to the ear, lovely, going to the heart, polite, likable and agreeable to the people.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘The ascetic Gotama has given up talking nonsense. His words are timely, true, and meaningful, in line with the teaching and training. He says things at the right time which are valuable, reasonable, succinct, and beneficial.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘The ascetic Gotama refrains from injuring plants and seeds.’
‘He eats in one part of the day, abstaining from eating at night and food at the wrong time.’
‘He refrains from dancing, singing, music, and seeing shows.’
‘He refrains from beautifying and adorning himself with garlands, perfumes, and makeup.’
‘He refrains from high and luxurious beds.’
‘He refrains from receiving gold and money,
raw grains,
women and girls,
male and female bondservants,
goats and sheep,
chickens and pigs,
elephants, cows, horses, and mares,
and fields and land.’
‘He refrains from running errands and messages;
buying and selling;
falsifying weights, metals, or measures;
bribery, fraud, cheating, and duplicity;
mutilation, murder, abduction, banditry, plunder, and violence.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
The shorter section on ethics is finished.
The Middle Section on Ethics
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in injuring plants and seeds.
These include plants propagated from roots, stems, cuttings, or joints; and those from regular seeds as the fifth.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such injury to plants and seeds.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in storing up goods for their own use.
This includes such things as food, drink, clothes, vehicles, bedding, fragrance, and material possessions.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from storing up such goods.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in seeing shows.
This includes such things as dancing, singing, music, performances, and storytelling; clapping, gongs, and kettledrums; art exhibitions and acrobatic displays; battles of elephants, horses, buffaloes, bulls, goats, rams, chickens, and quails; staff-fights, boxing, and wrestling; combat, roll calls of the armed forces, battle-formations, and regimental reviews.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such shows.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in gambling that causes negligence.
This includes such things as checkers, draughts, checkers in the air, hopscotch, spillikins, board-games, tip-cat, drawing straws, dice, leaf-flutes, toy plows, somersaults, pinwheels, toy measures, toy carts, toy bows, guessing words from syllables, and guessing another’s thoughts.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such gambling.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still make use of high and luxurious bedding.
This includes such things as sofas, couches, woolen covers—shag-piled, colorful, white, embroidered with flowers, quilted, embroidered with animals, double- or single-fringed—and silk covers studded with gems, as well as silken sheets, woven carpets, rugs for elephants, horses, or chariots, antelope hide rugs, and spreads of fine deer hide, with a canopy above and red cushions at both ends.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such bedding.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in beautifying and adorning themselves with garlands, fragrance, and makeup.
This includes such things as applying beauty products by anointing, massaging, bathing, and rubbing; mirrors, ointments, garlands, fragrances, and makeup; face-powder, foundation, bracelets, headbands, fancy walking-sticks or containers, rapiers, parasols, fancy sandals, turbans, jewelry, chowries, and long-fringed white robes.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such beautification and adornment.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in unworthy talk. This includes such topics as
talk about kings, bandits, and ministers; talk about armies, threats, and wars; talk about food, drink, clothes, and beds; talk about garlands and fragrances; talk about family, vehicles, villages, towns, cities, and countries; talk about women and heroes; street talk and well talk; talk about the departed; motley talk; tales of land and sea; and talk about being reborn in this or that state of existence.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such unworthy talk.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in arguments.
They say such things as: “You don’t understand this teaching and training. I understand this teaching and training. What, you understand this teaching and training? You’re practicing wrong. I’m practicing right. I stay on topic, you don’t. You said last what you should have said first. You said first what you should have said last. What you’ve thought so much about has been disproved. Your doctrine is refuted. Go on, save your doctrine! You’re trapped; get yourself out of this—if you can!”
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such argumentative talk.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in running errands and messages.
This includes running errands for rulers, ministers, aristocrats, brahmins, householders, or princes who say: “Go here, go there. Take this, bring that from there.”
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such errands.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in deceit, flattery, hinting, and belittling, and using material possessions to chase after other material possessions.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such deceit and flattery.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
The middle section on ethics is finished.
The Large Section on Ethics
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes such fields as limb-reading, omenology, divining celestial portents, interpreting dreams, divining bodily marks, divining holes in cloth gnawed by mice, fire offerings, ladle offerings, offerings of husks, rice powder, rice, ghee, or oil; offerings from the mouth, blood sacrifices, palmistry; geomancy for building sites, fields, and cemeteries; exorcisms, earth magic, snake charming, poisons; the crafts of the scorpion, the rat, the bird, and the crow; prophesying life span, chanting for protection, and animal cries.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes reading the marks of gems, cloth, clubs, swords, spears, arrows, weapons, women, men, boys, girls, male and female bondservants, elephants, horses, buffaloes, bulls, cows, goats, rams, chickens, quails, monitor lizards, rabbits, tortoises, or deer.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes making predictions that the king will march forth or march back; or that our king will attack and the enemy king will retreat, or vice versa; or that our king will triumph and the enemy king will be defeated, or vice versa; and so there will be victory for one and defeat for the other.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes making predictions that there will be an eclipse of the moon, or sun, or stars; that the sun, moon, and stars will be in conjunction or in opposition; that there will be a meteor shower, a fiery sky, an earthquake, thunder; that there will be a rising, a setting, a darkening, a brightening of the moon, sun, and stars. And it also includes making predictions about the results of all such phenomena.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes predicting whether there will be plenty of rain or drought; plenty to eat or famine; an abundant harvest or a bad harvest; security or peril; sickness or health. It also includes such occupations as computing, accounting, calculating, poetry, and cosmology.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes making arrangements for giving and taking in marriage; for engagement and divorce; and for scattering rice inwards or outwards at the wedding ceremony. It also includes casting spells for good or bad luck, curses to prevent conception, bind the tongue, or lock the jaws; charms for the hands and ears; questioning a mirror, a girl, or a god as an oracle; worshiping the sun, worshiping the Great One, breathing fire, and invoking Siri, the goddess of luck.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
‘There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes rites for propitiation, for granting wishes, for ghosts, for the earth, for rain, for property settlement, and for preparing and consecrating house sites, and rites involving rinsing and bathing, and oblations. It also includes administering emetics, purgatives, expectorants, and phlegmagogues; administering ear-oils, eye restoratives, nasal medicine, ointments, and counter-ointments; surgery with needle and scalpel, treating children, prescribing root medicines, and binding on herbs.
The ascetic Gotama refrains from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.’
Such is an ordinary person’s praise of the Realized One.
These are the trivial, insignificant details of mere ethics that an ordinary person speaks of when they speak praise of the Realized One.
The longer section on ethics is finished.
Theories About the Past
There are other principles—deep, hard to see, hard to understand, peaceful, sublime, beyond the scope of logic, subtle, comprehensible to the astute—which the Realized One makes known after realizing them with his own insight. Those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
And what are these principles?
There are some ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the past, and assert various hypotheses concerning the past on eighteen grounds.
And what are the eighteen grounds on which they rely?
Eternalism
There are some ascetics and brahmins who are eternalists, who assert that the self and the cosmos are eternal on four grounds.
And what are the four grounds on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect their many kinds of past lives.
That is:
one, two, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand rebirths.
They remember: ‘There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.’ And so they recollect their many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
‘The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.
Why is that?
Because by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus I experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that I recollect my many kinds of past lives,
with features and details.
Because of this I know:
“The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.’
This is the first ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos are eternal.
And what is the second ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect their many kinds of past lives.
That is:
one eon of the cosmos contracting and expanding; two, three, four, five, or ten eons of the cosmos contracting and expanding.
They remember: ‘There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.’ And so they recollect their many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
‘The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.
Why is that?
Because by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus I experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that I recollect my many kinds of past lives,
with features and details.
Because of this I know:
“The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar. They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.”’
This is the second ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos are eternal.
And what is the third ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect their many kinds of past lives.
That is:
ten eons of the cosmos contracting and expanding; twenty, thirty, or forty eons of the cosmos contracting and expanding.
They remember: ‘There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.’ And so they recollect their many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
‘The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.
Why is that?
Because by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus I experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that I recollect my many kinds of past lives,
with features and details.
Because of this I know:
“The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar. They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.”’
This is the third ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos are eternal.
And what is the fourth ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin relies on logic and inquiry. They speak of what they have worked out by logic, following a line of inquiry, expressing their own perspective:
‘The self and the cosmos are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They remain the same for all eternity, while these sentient beings wander and transmigrate and pass away and rearise.’
This is the fourth ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos are eternal.
These are the four grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins assert that the self and the cosmos are eternal.
Any ascetics and brahmins who assert that the self and the cosmos are eternal do so on one or other of these four grounds. Outside of this there is none.
The Realized One understands this:
‘If you hold on to and attach to these grounds for views it leads to such and such a destiny in the next life.’
He understands this, and what goes beyond this. Yet since he does not misapprehend that understanding, he has realized extinguishment within himself.
Having truly understood the origin, ending, gratification, drawback, and escape from feelings, the Realized One is freed through not grasping.
These are the principles—deep, hard to see, hard to understand, peaceful, sublime, beyond the scope of logic, subtle, comprehensible to the astute—which the Realized One makes known after realizing them with his own insight. And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
Partial Eternalism
There are some ascetics and brahmins who are partial eternalists, who assert that the self and the cosmos are partially eternal and partially not eternal on four grounds.
And what are the four grounds on which they rely?
There comes a time when, after a very long period has passed, this cosmos contracts.
As the cosmos contracts, sentient beings are mostly headed for the realm of streaming radiance.
There they are mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the sky, steadily glorious, and they remain like that for a very long time.
There comes a time when, after a very long period has passed, this cosmos expands.
As it expands an empty mansion of Brahmā appears.
Then a certain sentient being—due to the running out of their life-span or merit—passes away from that host of radiant deities and is reborn in that empty mansion of Brahmā.
There they are mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the sky, steadily glorious, and they remain like that for a very long time.
But after staying there all alone for a long time, they become dissatisfied and anxious:
‘Oh, if only another being would come to this state of existence.’
Then other sentient beings—due to the running out of their life-span or merit—pass away from that host of radiant deities and are reborn in that empty mansion of Brahmā in company with that being.
There they too are mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the sky, steadily glorious, and they remain like that for a very long time.
Now, the being who was reborn there first thinks:
‘I am Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born.
These beings were created by me!
Why is that?
Because first I thought:
“Oh, if only another being would come to this state of existence.”
Such was my heart’s wish, and then these creatures came to this state of existence.’
And the beings who were reborn there later also think:
‘This must be Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born.
And we have been created by him.
Why is that?
Because we see that he was reborn here first, and we arrived later.’
And the being who was reborn first is more long-lived, beautiful, and illustrious than those who arrived later.
It’s possible that one of those beings passes away from that host and is reborn in this state of existence.
Having done so, they go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
By dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus, they experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect that past life, but no further.
‘He who is Brahmā—the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born—is permanent, everlasting, eternal, imperishable, remaining the same for all eternity.
We who were created by that Brahmā are impermanent, not lasting, short-lived, perishable, and have come to this state of existence.
This is the first ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos are partially eternal.
And what is the second ground on which they rely?
There are gods named ‘depraved by play.’ They spend too much time laughing, playing, and making merry.
And in doing so, they lose their mindfulness, and they pass away from that host of gods.
It’s possible that one of those beings passes away from that host and is reborn in this state of existence.
Having done so, they go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
By dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus, they experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect that past life, but no further.
‘The gods not depraved by play don’t spend too much time laughing, playing, and making merry.
So they don’t lose their mindfulness, and don’t pass away from that host of gods.
They are permanent, everlasting, eternal, imperishable, remaining the same for all eternity.
But we who were depraved by play spent too much time laughing, playing, and making merry.
In doing so, we lost our mindfulness, and passed away from that host of gods.
We are impermanent, not lasting, short-lived, perishable, and have come to this state of existence.’
This is the second ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos are partially eternal.
And what is the third ground on which they rely?
There are gods named ‘malevolent’.
They spend too much time gazing at each other, so they grow angry with each other, and their bodies and minds get tired.
They pass away from that host of gods.
It’s possible that one of those beings passes away from that host and is reborn in this state of existence.
Having done so, they go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
By dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus, they experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect that past life, but no further.
‘The gods who are not malevolent don’t spend too much time gazing at each other, so they don’t grow angry with each other, their bodies and minds don’t get tired, and they don’t pass away from that host of gods.
They are permanent, everlasting, eternal, imperishable, remaining the same for all eternity.
But we who were malevolent spent too much time gazing at each other, we grew angry with each other, our bodies and minds got tired, and we passed away from that host of gods.
We are impermanent, not lasting, short-lived, perishable, and have come to this state of existence.’
This is the third ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos are partially eternal.
And what is the fourth ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin relies on logic and inquiry.
They speak of what they have worked out by logic, following a line of inquiry, expressing their own perspective:
‘That which is called “the eye” or “the ear” or “the nose” or “the tongue” or “the body”: that self is impermanent, not lasting, transient, perishable.
That which is called “mind” or “sentience” or “consciousness”: that self is permanent, everlasting, eternal, imperishable, remaining the same for all eternity.’
This is the fourth ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos are partially eternal.
These are the four grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins assert that the self and the cosmos are partially eternal and partially not eternal.
Any ascetics and brahmins who assert that the self and the cosmos are partially eternal and partially not eternal do so on one or other of these four grounds. Outside of this there is none.
The Realized One understands this:
‘If you hold on to and attach to these grounds for views it leads to such and such a destiny in the next life.’
He understands this, and what goes beyond this. Yet since he does not misapprehend that understanding, he has realized extinguishment within himself.
Having truly understood the origin, ending, gratification, drawback, and escape from feelings, the Realized One is freed through not grasping.
These are the principles—deep, hard to see, hard to understand, peaceful, sublime, beyond the scope of logic, subtle, comprehensible to the astute—which the Realized One makes known after realizing them with his own insight. And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
The Cosmos is Finite or Infinite
There are some ascetics and brahmins who theorize about size, and assert that the cosmos is finite or infinite on four grounds.
And what are the four grounds on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they meditate perceiving the cosmos as finite.
‘The cosmos is finite and bounded.
Why is that?
Because by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus I experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that I meditate perceiving the cosmos as finite.
Because of this I know:
“The cosmos is finite and bounded.”’
This is the first ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the cosmos is finite or infinite.
And what is the second ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they meditate perceiving the cosmos as infinite.
‘The cosmos is infinite and unbounded.
The ascetics and brahmins who say that
the cosmos is finite are wrong.
The cosmos is infinite and unbounded.
Why is that?
Because by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus I experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that I meditate perceiving the cosmos as infinite.
Because of this I know:
“The cosmos is infinite and unbounded.”’
This is the second ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the cosmos is finite or infinite.
And what is the third ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin—by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus—experiences an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they meditate perceiving the cosmos as finite vertically but infinite horizontally.
‘The cosmos is both finite and infinite.
The ascetics and brahmins who say that
the cosmos is finite are wrong,
and so are those who say that
the cosmos is infinite.
The cosmos is both finite and infinite.
Why is that?
Because by dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus I experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that I meditate perceiving the cosmos as finite vertically but infinite horizontally.
Because of this I know:
“The cosmos is both finite and infinite.”’
This is the third ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the cosmos is finite or infinite.
And what is the fourth ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin relies on logic and inquiry.
They speak of what they have worked out by logic, following a line of inquiry, expressing their own perspective:
‘The cosmos is neither finite nor infinite.
The ascetics and brahmins who say that
the cosmos is finite are wrong,
as are those who say that
the cosmos is infinite,
and also those who say that
the cosmos is both finite and infinite.
The cosmos is neither finite nor infinite.’
This is the fourth ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the cosmos is finite or infinite.
These are the four grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins assert that the cosmos is finite or infinite.
Any ascetics and brahmins who assert that the cosmos is finite or infinite do so on one or other of these four grounds. Outside of this there is none.
The Realized One understands this:
‘If you hold on to and attach to these grounds for views it leads to such and such a destiny in the next life.’
He understands this, and what goes beyond this. Yet since he does not misapprehend that understanding, he has realized extinguishment within himself.
Having truly understood the origin, ending, gratification, drawback, and escape from feelings, the Realized One is freed through not grasping.
These are the principles—deep, hard to see, hard to understand, peaceful, sublime, beyond the scope of logic, subtle, comprehensible to the astute—which the Realized One makes known after realizing them with his own insight. And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
Equivocators
There are some ascetics and brahmins who are equivocators. Whenever they’re asked a question, they resort to evasiveness and equivocation on four grounds.
And what are the four grounds on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin doesn’t truly understand what is skillful and what is unskillful.
They think:
‘I don’t truly understand what is skillful and what is unskillful.
If I were to declare that something was skillful or unskillful I might be wrong.
That would be stressful for me,
and that stress would be an obstacle.’
So from fear and disgust with false speech they avoid stating whether something is skillful or unskillful. Whenever they’re asked a question, they resort to evasiveness and equivocation:
‘I don’t say it’s like this. I don’t say it’s like that. I don’t say it’s otherwise. I don’t say it’s not so. And I don’t deny it’s not so.’
This is the first ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely when resorting to evasiveness and equivocation.
And what is the second ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin doesn’t truly understand what is skillful and what is unskillful.
They think:
‘I don’t truly understand what is skillful and what is unskillful.
If I were to declare that something was skillful or unskillful I might feel desire or greed or hate or repulsion.
That would be grasping on my part.
That would be stressful for me,
and that stress would be an obstacle.’
So from fear and disgust with grasping they avoid stating whether something is skillful or unskillful. Whenever they’re asked a question, they resort to evasiveness and equivocation:
‘I don’t say it’s like this. I don’t say it’s like that. I don’t say it’s otherwise. I don’t say it’s not so. And I don’t deny it’s not so.’
This is the second ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely when resorting to evasiveness and equivocation.
And what is the third ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin doesn’t truly understand what is skillful and what is unskillful.
They think:
‘I don’t truly understand what is skillful and what is unskillful.
Suppose I were to declare that something was skillful or unskillful.
There are clever ascetics and brahmins who are subtle, accomplished in the doctrines of others, hair-splitters. You’d think they live to demolish convictions with their intellect.
They might pursue, press, and grill me about that.
I’d be stumped by such a grilling.
That would be stressful for me,
and that stress would be an obstacle.’
So from fear and disgust with examination they avoid stating whether something is skillful or unskillful. Whenever they’re asked a question, they resort to evasiveness and equivocation:
‘I don’t say it’s like this. I don’t say it’s like that. I don’t say it’s otherwise. I don’t say it’s not so. And I don’t deny it’s not so.’
This is the third ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely when resorting to evasiveness and equivocation.
And what is the fourth ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin is dull and stupid.
Because of that, whenever they’re asked a question, they resort to evasiveness and equivocation:
‘Suppose you were to ask me whether there is another world. If I believed there was, I would say so.
But I don’t say it’s like this. I don’t say it’s like that. I don’t say it’s otherwise. I don’t say it’s not so. And I don’t deny it’s not so.
Suppose you were to ask me whether there is no other world …
whether there both is and is not another world …
whether there neither is nor is not another world …
whether there are beings who are reborn spontaneously …
whether there are not beings who are reborn spontaneously …
whether there both are and are not beings who are reborn spontaneously …
whether there neither are nor are not beings who are reborn spontaneously …
whether there is fruit and result of good and bad deeds …
whether there is not fruit and result of good and bad deeds …
whether there both is and is not fruit and result of good and bad deeds …
whether there neither is nor is not fruit and result of good and bad deeds …
whether a Realized One exists after death …
whether a Realized One doesn’t exist after death …
whether a Realized One both exists and doesn’t exist after death …
whether a Realized One neither exists nor doesn’t exist after death. If I believed there was, I would say so.
But I don’t say it’s like this. I don’t say it’s like that. I don’t say it’s otherwise. I don’t say it’s not so. And I don’t deny it’s not so.’
This is the fourth ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely when resorting to evasiveness and equivocation.
These are the four grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins who are equivocators resort to evasiveness and equivocation whenever they’re asked a question.
Any ascetics and brahmins who resort to equivocation do so on one or other of these four grounds. Outside of this there is none.
And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
Doctrines of Origination by Chance
There are some ascetics and brahmins who theorize about chance. They assert that the self and the cosmos arose by chance on two grounds.
And what are the two grounds on which they rely?
There are gods named ‘non-percipient beings’.
When perception arises they pass away from that host of gods.
It’s possible that one of those beings passes away from that host and is reborn in this state of existence.
Having done so, they go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
By dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus, they experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect the arising of perception, but no further.
‘The self and the cosmos arose by chance.
Why is that?
Because formerly I didn’t exist. Now, having not been, I’ve sprung into existence.’
This is the first ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos arose by chance.
And what is the second ground on which they rely?
It’s when some ascetic or brahmin relies on logic and inquiry.
They speak of what they have worked out by logic, following a line of inquiry, expressing their own perspective:
‘The self and the cosmos arose by chance.’
This is the second ground on which some ascetics and brahmins rely to assert that the self and the cosmos arose by chance.
These are the two grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins who theorize about chance assert that the self and the cosmos arose by chance.
Any ascetics and brahmins who theorize about chance do so on one or other of these two grounds. Outside of this there is none.
And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
These are the eighteen grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the past assert various hypotheses concerning the past.
Any ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the past do so on one or other of these eighteen grounds. Outside of this there is none.
The Realized One understands this:
‘If you hold on to and attach to these grounds for views it leads to such and such a destiny in the next life.’
He understands this, and what goes beyond this. Yet since he does not misapprehend that understanding, he has realized extinguishment within himself.
Having truly understood the origin, ending, gratification, drawback, and escape from feelings, the Realized One is freed through not grasping.
These are the principles—deep, hard to see, hard to understand, peaceful, sublime, beyond the scope of logic, subtle, comprehensible to the astute—which the Realized One makes known after realizing them with his own insight. And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
Theories About the Future
There are some ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the future, and assert various hypotheses concerning the future on forty-four grounds.
And what are the forty-four grounds on which they rely?
Percipient Life After Death
There are some ascetics and brahmins who say there is life after death, and assert that the self lives on after death in a percipient form on sixteen grounds.
And what are the sixteen grounds on which they rely?
They assert: ‘The self is sound and percipient after death, and it is physical …
non-physical …
both physical and non-physical …
neither physical nor non-physical …
infinite …
both finite and infinite …
neither finite nor infinite …
of unified perception …
of diverse perception …
of limited perception …
of limitless perception …
experiences nothing but happiness …
experiences nothing but suffering …
experiences both happiness and suffering …
experiences neither happiness nor suffering.’
These are the sixteen grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins assert that the self lives on after death in a percipient form.
Any ascetics and brahmins who assert that the self lives on after death in a percipient form do so on one or other of these sixteen grounds. Outside of this there is none.
And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
Non-Percipient Life After Death
There are some ascetics and brahmins who say there is life after death, and assert that the self lives on after death in a non-percipient form on eight grounds.
And what are the eight grounds on which they rely?
They assert: ‘The self is sound and non-percipient after death, and it is physical …
non-physical …
both physical and non-physical …
neither physical nor non-physical …
infinite …
both finite and infinite …
neither finite nor infinite.’
These are the eight grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins assert that the self lives on after death in a non-percipient form.
Any ascetics and brahmins who assert that the self lives on after death in a non-percipient form do so on one or other of these eight grounds. Outside of this there is none.
And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
Neither Percipient Nor Non-Percipient Life After Death
There are some ascetics and brahmins who say there is life after death, and assert that the self lives on after death in a neither percipient nor non-percipient form on eight grounds.
And what are the eight grounds on which they rely?
They assert: ‘The self is sound and neither percipient nor non-percipient after death, and it is physical …
non-physical …
both physical and non-physical …
neither physical nor non-physical …
infinite …
both finite and infinite …
neither finite nor infinite.’
These are the eight grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins assert that the self lives on after death in a neither percipient nor non-percipient form.
Any ascetics and brahmins who assert that the self lives on after death in a neither percipient nor non-percipient form do so on one or other of these eight grounds. Outside of this there is none.
And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
Annihilationism
There are some ascetics and brahmins who are annihilationists. They assert the annihilation, eradication, and obliteration of an existing being on seven grounds.
And what are the seven grounds on which they rely?
There are some ascetics and brahmins who have this doctrine and view:
‘This self is physical, made up of the four primary elements, and produced by mother and father. Since it’s annihilated and destroyed when the body breaks up, and doesn’t exist after death, that’s how this self becomes rightly annihilated.’
That is how some assert the annihilation of an existing being.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self becomes rightly annihilated.
There is another self that is divine, physical, sensual, consuming solid food.
You don’t know or see that.
But I know it and see it.
Since this self is annihilated and destroyed when the body breaks up, and doesn’t exist after death, that’s how this self becomes rightly annihilated.’
That is how some assert the annihilation of an existing being.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self becomes rightly annihilated.
There is another self that is divine, physical, mind-made, complete in all its various parts, not deficient in any faculty.
You don’t know or see that.
But I know it and see it.
Since this self is annihilated and destroyed when the body breaks up, and doesn’t exist after death, that’s how this self becomes rightly annihilated.’
That is how some assert the annihilation of an existing being.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self becomes rightly annihilated.
There is another self which has gone totally beyond perceptions of form. With the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that “space is infinite”, it’s reborn in the dimension of infinite space.
You don’t know or see that.
But I know it and see it.
Since this self is annihilated and destroyed when the body breaks up, and doesn’t exist after death, that’s how this self becomes rightly annihilated.’
That is how some assert the annihilation of an existing being.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self becomes rightly annihilated.
There is another self which has gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite space. Aware that “consciousness is infinite”, it’s reborn in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
You don’t know or see that.
But I know it and see it.
Since this self is annihilated and destroyed when the body breaks up, and doesn’t exist after death, that’s how this self becomes rightly annihilated.’
That is how some assert the annihilation of an existing being.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self becomes rightly annihilated.
There is another self that has gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness. Aware that “there is nothing at all”, it’s been reborn in the dimension of nothingness.
You don’t know or see that.
But I know it and see it.
Since this self is annihilated and destroyed when the body breaks up, and doesn’t exist after death, that’s how this self becomes rightly annihilated.’
That is how some assert the annihilation of an existing being.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self becomes rightly annihilated.
There is another self that has gone totally beyond the dimension of nothingness. Aware that “this is peaceful, this is sublime”, it’s been reborn in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
You don’t know or see that.
But I know it and see it.
Since this self is annihilated and destroyed when the body breaks up, and doesn’t exist after death, that’s how this self becomes rightly annihilated.’
That is how some assert the annihilation of an existing being.
These are the seven grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins assert the annihilation, eradication, and obliteration of an existing being.
Any ascetics and brahmins who assert the annihilation, eradication, and obliteration of an existing being do so on one or other of these seven grounds. Outside of this there is none.
And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
Extinguishment in the Present Life
There are some ascetics and brahmins who speak of extinguishment in the present life. They assert the ultimate extinguishment of an existing being in the present life on five grounds.
And what are the five grounds on which they rely?
There are some ascetics and brahmins who have this doctrine and view:
‘When this self amuses itself, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation, that’s how this self attains ultimate extinguishment in the present life.’
That is how some assert the extinguishment of an existing being in the present life.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self attains ultimate extinguishment in the present life.
Why is that?
Because sensual pleasures are impermanent, suffering, and perishable. Their decay and perishing give rise to sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress.
Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, this self enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected. That’s how this self attains ultimate extinguishment in the present life.’
That is how some assert the extinguishment of an existing being in the present life.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self attains ultimate extinguishment in the present life.
Why is that?
Because the placing of the mind and the keeping it connected there are coarse.
But when the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, this self enters and remains in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected. That’s how this self attains ultimate extinguishment in the present life.’
That is how some assert the extinguishment of an existing being in the present life.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self attains ultimate extinguishment in the present life.
Why is that?
Because the rapture and emotional excitement there are coarse.
But with the fading away of rapture, this self enters and remains in the third absorption, where it meditates with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, “Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss”. That’s how this self attains ultimate extinguishment in the present life.’
That is how some assert the extinguishment of an existing being in the present life.
But someone else says to them:
‘*That* self of which you speak does exist, I don’t deny it.
But that’s not how *this* self attains ultimate extinguishment in the present life.
Why is that?
Because the bliss and enjoyment there are coarse.
But giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, this self enters and remains in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness. That’s how this self attains ultimate extinguishment in the present life.’
That is how some assert the extinguishment of an existing being in the present life.
These are the five grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins assert the ultimate extinguishment of an existing being in the present life.
Any ascetics and brahmins who assert the ultimate extinguishment of an existing being in the present life do so on one or other of these five grounds. Outside of this there is none.
And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
These are the forty-four grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the future assert various hypotheses concerning the future.
Any ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the future do so on one or other of these forty-four grounds. Outside of this there is none.
And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
These are the sixty-two grounds on which those ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the past and the future assert various hypotheses concerning the past and the future.
Any ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the past or the future do so on one or other of these sixty-two grounds. Outside of this there is none.
The Realized One understands this:
‘If you hold on to and attach to these grounds for views it leads to such and such a destiny in the next life.’
He understands this, and what goes beyond this. Yet since he does not misapprehend that understanding, he has realized extinguishment within himself.
Having truly understood the origin, ending, gratification, drawback, and escape from feelings, the Realized One is freed through not grasping.
These are the principles—deep, hard to see, hard to understand, peaceful, sublime, beyond the scope of logic, subtle, comprehensible to the astute—which the Realized One makes known after realizing them with his own insight. And those who genuinely praise the Realized One would rightly speak of these things.
The Grounds For Assertions About the Self and the Cosmos
Anxiety and Evasiveness
Now, these things are only the feeling of those who do not know or see, the agitation and evasiveness of those under the sway of craving. Namely, when those ascetics and brahmins assert that the self and the cosmos are eternal on four grounds …
partially eternal on four grounds …
finite or infinite on four grounds …
or they resort to equivocation on four grounds …
or they assert that the self and the cosmos arose by chance on two grounds …
they theorize about the past on these eighteen grounds …
or they assert that the self lives on after death in a percipient form on sixteen grounds …
or that the self lives on after death in a non-percipient form on eight grounds …
or that the self lives on after death in a neither percipient nor non-percipient form on eight grounds …
or they assert the annihilation of an existing being on seven grounds …
or they assert the ultimate extinguishment of an existing being in the present life on five grounds …
they theorize about the future on these forty-four grounds …
When those ascetics and brahmins theorize about the past and the future on these sixty-two grounds, these things are only the feeling of those who do not know or see, the agitation and evasiveness of those under the sway of craving.
Conditioned by Contact
Now, these things are conditioned by contact. Namely, when those ascetics and brahmins assert that the self and the cosmos are eternal on four grounds …
partially eternal on four grounds …
finite or infinite on four grounds …
or they resort to equivocation on four grounds …
or they assert that the self and the cosmos arose by chance on two grounds …
they theorize about the past on these eighteen grounds …
or they assert that the self lives on after death in a percipient form on sixteen grounds …
or that the self lives on after death in a non-percipient form on eight grounds …
or that the self lives on after death in a neither percipient nor non-percipient form on eight grounds …
or they assert the annihilation of an existing being on seven grounds …
or they assert the ultimate extinguishment of an existing being in the present life on five grounds …
they theorize about the future on these forty-four grounds …
When those ascetics and brahmins theorize about the past and the future on these sixty-two grounds, that too is conditioned by contact.
Not Possible
Now, when those ascetics and brahmins theorize about the past and the future on these sixty-two grounds, it is not possible that they should experience these things without contact.
Dependent Origination
Now, when those ascetics and brahmins theorize about the past and the future on these sixty-two grounds, all of them experience this by repeated contact through the six fields of contact. Their feeling is a condition for craving. Craving is a condition for grasping. Grasping is a condition for continued existence. Continued existence is a condition for rebirth. Rebirth is a condition for old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress to come to be.
The End of the Round
When a mendicant truly understands the six fields of contacts’ origin, ending, gratification, drawback, and escape, they understand what lies beyond all these things.
All of these ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the past or the future are trapped in the net of these sixty-two grounds, so that wherever they emerge they are caught and trapped in this very net.
Suppose a deft fisherman or his apprentice were to cast a fine-meshed net over a small pond.
They’d think:
‘Any sizable creatures in this pond will be trapped in the net.
Wherever they emerge they are caught and trapped in this very net.’
In the same way, all of these ascetics and brahmins who theorize about the past or the future are trapped in the net of these sixty-two grounds, so that wherever they emerge they are caught and trapped in this very net.
The Realized One’s body remains, but his attachment to rebirth has been cut off.
As long as his body remains he will be seen by gods and humans.
But when his body breaks up, after life has ended, gods and humans will see him no more.
When the stalk of a bunch of mangoes is cut, all the mangoes attached to the stalk will follow along.
In the same way, the Realized One’s body remains, but his attachment to rebirth has been cut off.
As long as his body remains he will be seen by gods and humans.
But when his body breaks up, after life has ended, gods and humans will see him no more.”
When he had spoken, Venerable Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing! What is the name of this exposition of the teaching?”
“Well, then, Ānanda, you may remember this exposition of the teaching as ‘The Net of Meaning’, or else ‘The Net of the Teaching’, or else ‘The Prime Net’, or else ‘The Net of Views’, or else ‘The Supreme Victory in Battle’.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what the Buddha said.
And while this discourse was being spoken, the galaxy shook.
Long Discourses
The Great Discourse on the Buddha’s Extinguishment
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain.
Now at that time King Ajātasattu Vedehiputta of Māgadha wanted to invade the Vajjis.
He declared:
“I shall wipe out these Vajjis, so mighty and powerful! I shall destroy them, and lay ruin and devastation upon them!”
And then King Ajātasattu addressed Vassakāra the brahmin minister of Māgadha,
“Please, brahmin, go to the Buddha, and in my name bow with your head to his feet. Ask him if he is healthy and well, nimble, strong, and living comfortably.
And then say:
‘Sir, King Ajātasattu Vedehiputta of Māgadha wants to invade the Vajjis.
“I shall wipe out these Vajjis, so mighty and powerful! I shall destroy them, and lay ruin and devastation upon them!”’
Remember well how the Buddha answers and tell it to me.
For Realized Ones say nothing that is not so.”
The Brahmin Vassakāra
“Yes, sir,” Vassakāra replied. He had the finest carriages harnessed. Then he mounted a fine carriage and, along with other fine carriages, set out from Rājagaha for the Vulture’s Peak Mountain.
He went by carriage as far as the terrain allowed, then descended and approached the Buddha on foot, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to the Buddha,
“Master Gotama, King Ajātasattu Vedehiputta of Māgadha bows with his head to your feet. He asks if you are healthy and well, nimble, strong, and living comfortably.
Master Gotama, King Ajātasattu wants to invade the Vajjis.
He has declared:
‘I shall wipe out these Vajjis, so mighty and powerful! I shall destroy them, and lay ruin and devastation upon them!’”
Principles That Prevent Decline
Now at that time Venerable Ānanda was standing behind the Buddha fanning him.
Then the Buddha said to him,
“Ānanda, have you heard that the Vajjis meet frequently and have many meetings?”
“I have heard that, sir.”
“As long as the Vajjis meet frequently and have many meetings, they can expect growth, not decline.
Ānanda, have you heard that the Vajjis meet in harmony, leave in harmony, and carry on their business in harmony?”
“I have heard that, sir.”
“As long as the Vajjis meet in harmony, leave in harmony, and carry on their business in harmony, they can expect growth, not decline.
Ānanda, have you heard that the Vajjis don’t make new decrees or abolish existing decrees, but proceed having undertaken the traditional Vajjian principles as they have been decreed?”
“I have heard that, sir.”
“As long as the Vajjis don’t make new decrees or abolish existing decrees, but proceed having undertaken the traditional Vajjian principles as they have been decreed, they can expect growth, not decline.
Ānanda, have you heard that the Vajjis honor, respect, esteem, and venerate Vajjian elders, and think them worth listening to?”
“I have heard that, sir.”
“As long as the Vajjis honor, respect, esteem, and venerate Vajjian elders, and think them worth listening to, they can expect growth, not decline.
Ānanda, have you heard that the Vajjis don’t rape or abduct women or girls from their families and force them to live with them?”
“I have heard that, sir.”
“As long as the Vajjis don’t rape or abduct women or girls from their families and force them to live with them, they can expect growth, not decline.
Ānanda, have you heard that the Vajjis honor, respect, esteem, and venerate the Vajjian shrines, whether inner or outer, not neglecting the proper spirit-offerings that were given and made in the past?”
“I have heard that, sir.”
“As long as the Vajjis honor, respect, esteem, and venerate the Vajjian shrines, whether inner or outer, not neglecting the proper spirit-offerings that were given and made in the past, they can expect growth, not decline.
Ānanda, have you heard that the Vajjis organize proper protection, shelter, and security for perfected ones, so that more perfected ones might come to the realm and those already here may live in comfort?”
“I have heard that, sir.”
“As long as the Vajjis organize proper protection, shelter, and security for perfected ones, so that more perfected ones might come to the realm and those already here may live in comfort, they can expect growth, not decline.”
Then the Buddha said to Vassakāra,
“Brahmin, this one time I was staying near Vesālī at the Sārandada woodland shrine.
There I taught the Vajjis these seven principles that prevent decline.
As long as these seven principles that prevent decline last among the Vajjis, and as long as the Vajjis are seen following them, they can expect growth, not decline.”
When the Buddha had spoken, Vassakāra said to him,
“Master Gotama, if the Vajjis follow even a single one of these principles they can expect growth, not decline.
How much more so all seven!
King Ajātasattu cannot defeat the Vajjis in war, unless by diplomacy or by sowing dissension.
Well, now, Master Gotama, I must go. I have many duties, and much to do.”
“Please, brahmin, go at your convenience.”
Then Vassakāra the brahmin, having approved and agreed with what the Buddha said, got up from his seat and left.
Principles That Prevent Decline Among the Mendicants
Soon after he had left, the Buddha said to Ānanda,
“Go, Ānanda, gather all the mendicants staying in the vicinity of Rājagaha together in the assembly hall.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda.
He did what the Buddha asked. Then he went back, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, the mendicant Saṅgha has assembled. Please, sir, go at your convenience.”
Then the Buddha went to the assembly hall, where he sat on the seat spread out
and addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, I will teach you these seven principles that prevent decline.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“As long as the mendicants meet frequently and have many meetings, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as the mendicants meet in harmony, leave in harmony, and carry on their business in harmony, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as the mendicants don’t make new decrees or abolish existing decrees, but undertake and follow the training rules as they have been decreed, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as the mendicants honor, respect, esteem, and venerate the senior mendicants—of long standing, long gone forth, fathers and leaders of the Saṅgha—and think them worth listening to, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as the mendicants don’t fall under the sway of arisen craving for future lives, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as the mendicants take care to live in wilderness lodgings, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as the mendicants individually establish mindfulness, so that more good-hearted spiritual companions might come, and those that have already come may live comfortably, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as these seven principles that prevent decline last among the mendicants, and as long as the mendicants are seen following them, they can expect growth, not decline.
I will teach you seven more principles that prevent decline. …
As long as the mendicants don’t relish work, loving it and liking to relish it, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as they don’t enjoy talk …
they don’t have wicked desires, falling under the sway of wicked desires …
they don’t have bad friends, companions, and associates …
they don’t stop half-way after achieving some insignificant distinction, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as these seven principles that prevent decline last among the mendicants, and as long as the mendicants are seen following them, they can expect growth, not decline.
I will teach you seven more principles that prevent decline. …
As long as the mendicants are faithful …
conscientious …
energetic …
wise, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as these seven principles that prevent decline last among the mendicants, and as long as the mendicants are seen following them, they can expect growth, not decline.
I will teach you seven more principles that prevent decline. …
As long as the mendicants develop the awakening factors of mindfulness …
investigation of principles …
tranquility …
immersion …
equanimity, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as these seven principles that prevent decline last among the mendicants, and as long as the mendicants are seen following them, they can expect growth, not decline.
I will teach you seven more principles that prevent decline. …
As long as the mendicants develop the perceptions of impermanence …
not-self …
ugliness …
drawbacks …
giving up …
fading away …
cessation, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as these seven principles that prevent decline last among the mendicants, and as long as the mendicants are seen following them, they can expect growth, not decline.
I will teach you six principles that prevent decline. …
As long as the mendicants consistently treat their spiritual companions with bodily kindness …
verbal kindness …
and mental kindness both in public and in private, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as the mendicants share without reservation any material possessions they have gained by legitimate means, even the food placed in the alms-bowl, using them in common with their ethical spiritual companions, they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as the mendicants live according to the precepts shared with their spiritual companions, both in public and in private—such precepts as are unbroken, impeccable, spotless, and unmarred, liberating, praised by sensible people, not mistaken, and leading to immersion—they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as the mendicants live according to the view shared with their spiritual companions, both in public and in private—the view that is noble and emancipating, and leads one who practices it to the complete end of suffering—they can expect growth, not decline.
As long as these six principles that prevent decline last among the mendicants, and as long as the mendicants are seen following them, they can expect growth, not decline.”
And while staying there at the Vulture’s Peak the Buddha often gave this Dhamma talk to the mendicants:
“Such is ethics, such is immersion, such is wisdom.
When immersion is imbued with ethics it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When wisdom is imbued with immersion it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When the mind is imbued with wisdom it is rightly freed from the defilements, namely,
the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.”
When the Buddha had stayed in Rājagaha as long as he wished, he addressed Venerable Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Ambalaṭṭhikā.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at Ambalaṭṭhikā,
where he stayed in the royal rest-house.
And while staying there, too, he often gave this Dhamma talk to the mendicants:
“Such is ethics, such is immersion, such is wisdom.
When immersion is imbued with ethics it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When wisdom is imbued with immersion it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When the mind is imbued with wisdom it is rightly freed from the defilements, namely,
the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.”
When the Buddha had stayed in Ambalaṭṭhikā as long as he wished, he addressed Venerable Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Nāḷandā.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at Nāḷandā,
where he stayed in Pāvārika’s mango grove.
Sāriputta’s Lion’s Roar
Then Sāriputta went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, I have such confidence in the Buddha that
I believe there’s no other ascetic or brahmin—whether past, future, or present—whose direct knowledge is superior to the Buddha when it comes to awakening.”
“That’s a grand and dramatic statement, Sāriputta. You’ve roared a definitive, categorical lion’s roar, saying:
‘I have such confidence in the Buddha that
I believe there’s no other ascetic or brahmin—whether past, future, or present—whose direct knowledge is superior to the Buddha when it comes to awakening.’
What about all the perfected ones, the fully awakened Buddhas who lived in the past? Have you comprehended their minds to know that
those Buddhas had such ethics, or such qualities, or such wisdom, or such meditation, or such freedom?”
“No, sir.”
“And what about all the perfected ones, the fully awakened Buddhas who will live in the future? Have you comprehended their minds to know that
those Buddhas will have such ethics, or such qualities, or such wisdom, or such meditation, or such freedom?”
“No, sir.”
“And what about me, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha at present? Have you comprehended my mind to know that
I have such ethics, or such teachings, or such wisdom, or such meditation, or such freedom?”
“No, sir.”
“Well then, Sāriputta, given that you don’t comprehend the minds of Buddhas past, future, or present,
what exactly are you doing, making such a grand and dramatic statement, roaring such a definitive, categorical lion’s roar?”
“Sir, though I don’t comprehend the minds of Buddhas past, future, and present,
still I understand this by inference from the teaching.
Suppose there was a king’s frontier citadel with fortified embankments, ramparts, and arches, and a single gate.
And it has a gatekeeper who is astute, competent, and intelligent. He keeps strangers out and lets known people in.
As he walks around the patrol path, he doesn’t see a hole or cleft in the wall, not even one big enough for a cat to slip out.
He thinks:
‘Whatever sizable creatures enter or leave the citadel, all of them do so via this gate.’
In the same way, I understand this by inference from the teaching:
‘All the perfected ones, fully awakened Buddhas—whether past, future, or present—give up the five hindrances, corruptions of the heart that weaken wisdom. Their mind is firmly established in the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. They correctly develop the seven awakening factors. And they wake up to the supreme perfect awakening.’”
And while staying at Nāḷandā, too, the Buddha often gave this Dhamma talk to the mendicants:
“Such is ethics, such is immersion, such is wisdom.
When immersion is imbued with ethics it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When wisdom is imbued with immersion it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When the mind is imbued with wisdom it is rightly freed from the defilements, namely,
the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.”
The Drawbacks of Unethical Conduct
When the Buddha had stayed in Nāḷandā as long as he wished, he addressed Venerable Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Pāṭali Village.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at Pāṭali Village.
The lay followers of Pāṭali Village heard that he had arrived.
So they went to see him, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, please consent to come to our guest house.”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, the lay followers of Pāṭali Village got up from their seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right.
Then they went to the guest house, where they spread carpets all over, prepared seats, set up a water jar, and placed a lamp. Then they went back to the Buddha, bowed, stood to one side, and told him of their preparations, saying:
“Please, sir, come at your convenience.”
In the morning, the Buddha robed up and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the guest house together with the Saṅgha of mendicants. Having washed his feet he entered the guest house and sat against the central column facing east.
The Saṅgha of mendicants also washed their feet, entered the guest house, and sat against the west wall facing east, with the Buddha right in front of them.
The lay followers of Pāṭali Village also washed their feet, entered the guest house, and sat against the east wall facing west, with the Buddha right in front of them.
Then the Buddha addressed them:
“Householders, there are these five drawbacks for an unethical person because of their failure in ethics.
What five?
Firstly, an unethical person loses substantial wealth on account of negligence.
This is the first drawback for an unethical person because of their failure in ethics.
Furthermore, an unethical person gets a bad reputation.
This is the second drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person enters any kind of assembly timid and embarrassed, whether it’s an assembly of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, or ascetics.
This is the third drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person feels lost when they die.
This is the fourth drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person, when their body breaks up, after death, is reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
This is the fifth drawback.
These are the five drawbacks for an unethical person because of their failure in ethics.
The Benefits of Ethical Conduct
There are these five benefits for an ethical person because of their accomplishment in ethics.
What five?
Firstly, an ethical person gains substantial wealth on account of diligence.
This is the first benefit.
Furthermore, an ethical person gets a good reputation.
This is the second benefit.
Furthermore, an ethical person enters any kind of assembly bold and self-assured, whether it’s an assembly of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, or ascetics.
This is the third benefit.
Furthermore, an ethical person dies not feeling lost.
This is the fourth benefit.
Furthermore, when an ethical person’s body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
This is the fifth benefit.
These are the five benefits for an ethical person because of their accomplishment in ethics.”
The Buddha spent most of the night educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring the lay followers of Pāṭali Village with a Dhamma talk. Then he dismissed them,
“The night is getting late, householders. Please go at your convenience.”
“Yes, sir,” replied the lay followers of Pāṭali Village. They got up from their seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right, before leaving.
Soon after they left the Buddha entered a private cubicle.
Building a Citadel
Now at that time the Magadhan ministers Sunidha and Vassakāra were building a citadel at Pāṭali Village to keep the Vajjis out.
At that time thousands of deities were taking possession of building sites in Pāṭali Village.
Illustrious rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by illustrious deities.
Middling rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by middling deities.
Lesser rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by lesser deities.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, the Buddha saw those deities taking possession of building sites in Pāṭali Village.
The Buddha rose at the crack of dawn and addressed Ānanda,
“Ānanda, who is building a citadel at Pāṭali Village?”
“Sir, the Magadhan ministers Sunidha and Vassakāra are building a citadel to keep the Vajjis out.”
“It’s as if they were building the citadel in consultation with the gods of the Thirty-Three.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, I saw those deities taking possession of building sites.
Illustrious rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by illustrious deities.
Middling rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by middling deities.
Lesser rulers or royal ministers inclined to build houses at sites possessed by lesser deities.
As far as the civilized region extends, as far as the trading zone extends, this will be the chief city: the Pāṭaliputta trade center.
But Pāṭaliputta will face three threats:
from fire, flood, and dissension.”
Then the Magadhan ministers Sunidha and Vassakāra approached the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, they stood to one side and said,
“Would Master Gotama together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept today’s meal from me?”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, they went to their own guest house, where they had a variety of delicious foods prepared. Then they had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Itʼs time, Master Gotama, the meal is ready.”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to their guest house together with the mendicant Saṅgha, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Sunidha and Vassakāra served and satisfied the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha with their own hands with a variety of delicious foods.
When the Buddha had eaten and washed his hand and bowl, Sunidha and Vassakāra took a low seat and sat to one side.
The Buddha expressed his appreciation with these verses:
“In the place he makes his dwelling,
having fed the astute
and the virtuous here,
the restrained spiritual practitioners,
he should dedicate an offering
to the deities there.
Venerated, they venerate him;
honored, they honor him.
After that they have compassion for him,
like a mother for the child at her breast.
A man beloved of the deities
always sees nice things.”
When the Buddha had expressed his appreciation to Sunidha and Vassakāra with these verses, he got up from his seat and left.
Sunidha and Vassakāra followed behind the Buddha, thinking,
“The gate through which the ascetic Gotama departs today shall be named the Gotama Gate.
The ford at which he crosses the Ganges River shall be named the Gotama Ford.”
Then the gate through which the Buddha departed was named the Gotama Gate.
Then the Buddha came to the Ganges River.
Now at that time the Ganges was full to the brim so a crow could drink from it.
Wanting to cross from the near to the far shore, some people were seeking a boat, some a dinghy, while some were tying up a raft.
But, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, the Buddha, together with the mendicant Saṅgha, vanished from the near shore and landed on the far shore.
He saw all those people wanting to cross over.
Knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Those who cross a deluge or stream
have built a bridge and left the marshes behind.
While some people are still tying a raft,
intelligent people have crossed over.”
Talk on the Noble Truths
Then the Buddha said to Venerable Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Koṭigāma.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at Koṭigāma,
and stayed there.
There he addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, not understanding and not penetrating four noble truths, both you and I have wandered and transmigrated for such a very long time.
What four?
The noble truths of suffering,
the origin of suffering,
the cessation of suffering,
and the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering.
These noble truths of suffering, origin, cessation, and the path have been understood and comprehended. Craving for continued existence has been cut off; the attachment to continued existence is ended; now there are no more future lives.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“Because of not truly seeing
the four noble truths,
we have transmigrated for a long time
from one rebirth to the next.
But now that these truths have been seen,
the attachment to rebirth is eradicated.
The root of suffering is cut off,
now there are no more future lives.”
And while staying at Koṭigāma, too, the Buddha often gave this Dhamma talk to the mendicants:
“Such is ethics, such is immersion, such is wisdom.
When immersion is imbued with ethics it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When wisdom is imbued with immersion it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When the mind is imbued with wisdom it is rightly freed from the defilements, namely,
the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.”
The Deaths in Nādika
When the Buddha had stayed in Koṭigāma as long as he wished, he said to Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Nādika.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at Nādika,
where he stayed in the brick house.
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, the monk named Sāḷha has passed away in Nādika. Where has he been reborn in his next life?
The nun named Nandā,
the layman named Sudatta,
and the laywoman named Sujātā have passed away in Nādika. Where have they been reborn in the next life?
The laymen named Kakkaṭa,
Kaṭissaha,
Santuṭṭha,
Bhadda, and
Subhadda have passed away in Nādika. Where have they been reborn in the next life?”
“Ānanda, the monk Sāḷha had realized the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, having realized it with his own insight due to the ending of defilements.
The nun Nandā had ended the five lower fetters. She’s been reborn spontaneously, and will be extinguished there, not liable to return from that world.
The layman Sudatta had ended three fetters, and weakened greed, hate, and delusion. He’s a once-returner; he will come back to this world once only, then make an end of suffering.
The laywoman Sujātā had ended three fetters. She’s a stream-enterer, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.
The laymen Kakkaṭa,
Kaṭissaha,
Santuṭṭha,
Bhadda, and
and Subhadda had ended the five lower fetters. They’ve been reborn spontaneously, and will be extinguished there, not liable to return from that world.
Over fifty laymen in Nādika have passed away having ended the five lower fetters. They’ve been reborn spontaneously, and will be extinguished there, not liable to return from that world.
More than ninety laymen in Nādika have passed away having ended three fetters, and weakened greed, hate, and delusion. They’re once-returners, who will come back to this world once only, then make an end of suffering.
In excess of five hundred laymen in Nādika have passed away having ended three fetters. They’re stream-enterers, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.
The Mirror of the Teaching
It’s hardly surprising that a human being should pass away.
But if you should come and ask me about it each and every time someone passes away, that would be a bother for me.
So Ānanda, I will teach you the explanation of the Dhamma called ‘the mirror of the teaching’. A noble disciple who has this may declare of themselves:
‘I’ve finished with rebirth in hell, the animal realm, and the ghost realm. I’ve finished with all places of loss, bad places, the underworld. I am a stream-enterer! I’m not liable to be reborn in the underworld, and am bound for awakening.’
And what is that mirror of the teaching?
It’s when a noble disciple has experiential confidence in the Buddha:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
They have experiential confidence in the teaching:
‘The teaching is well explained by the Buddha—visible in this very life, immediately effective, inviting inspection, relevant, so that sensible people can know it for themselves.’
They have experiential confidence in the Saṅgha:
‘The Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples is practicing the way that’s good, direct, methodical, and proper. It consists of the four pairs, the eight individuals. This is the Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples that is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.’
And a noble disciple’s ethical conduct is loved by the noble ones, unbroken, impeccable, spotless, and unmarred, liberating, praised by sensible people, not mistaken, and leading to immersion.
This is that mirror of the teaching.”
And while staying there in Nādika the Buddha often gave this Dhamma talk to the mendicants:
“Such is ethics, such is immersion, such is wisdom.
When immersion is imbued with ethics it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When wisdom is imbued with immersion it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When the mind is imbued with wisdom it is rightly freed from the defilements, namely,
the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.”
When the Buddha had stayed in Nādika as long as he wished, he addressed Venerable Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Vesālī.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at Vesālī,
where he stayed in Ambapālī’s mango grove.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, a mendicant should live mindful and aware.
This is my instruction to you.
And how is a mendicant mindful?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
That’s how a mendicant is mindful.
And how is a mendicant aware?
It’s when a mendicant acts with situational awareness when going out and coming back; when looking ahead and aside; when bending and extending the limbs; when bearing the outer robe, bowl and robes; when eating, drinking, chewing, and tasting; when urinating and defecating; when walking, standing, sitting, sleeping, waking, speaking, and keeping silent.
That’s how a mendicant is aware.
A mendicant should live mindful and aware.
This is my instruction to you.”
Ambapālī the Courtesan
Ambapālī the courtesan heard that the Buddha had arrived and was staying in her mango grove.
She had the finest carriages harnessed.
Then she mounted a fine carriage and, along with other fine carriages, set out from Vesālī for her own park.
She went by carriage as far as the terrain allowed, then descended and approached the Buddha on foot. She bowed and sat down to one side.
The Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired her with a Dhamma talk.
Then she said to the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Buddha together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept tomorrow’s meal from me.”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, Ambapālī got up from her seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on her right, before leaving.
The Licchavis of Vesālī also heard that the Buddha had arrived and was staying in Ambapālī’s mango grove.
They had the finest carriages harnessed. Then they mounted a fine carriage and, along with other fine carriages, set out from Vesālī.
Some of the Licchavis were in blue, of blue color, clad in blue, adorned with blue. And some were similarly colored in yellow, red, or white.
Then Ambapālī the courtesan collided with those Licchavi youths, axle to axle, wheel to wheel, yoke to yoke.
The Licchavis said to her,
“What the hell, Ambapālī, are you doing colliding with us axle to axle, wheel to wheel, yoke to yoke?”
“Well, masters, it’s because I’ve invited the Buddha for tomorrow’s meal together with the mendicant Saṅgha.”
“Girl, give us that meal for a hundred thousand!”
“Masters, even if you were to give me Vesālī with her fiefdoms, I still wouldn’t give that meal to you.”
Then the Licchavis snapped their fingers, saying,
“We’ve been beaten by the mango-matron! We’ve been beaten by the mango-matron!”
Then they continued on to Ambapālī’s grove.
The Buddha saw them coming off in the distance,
and addressed the mendicants:
“Any of the mendicants who’ve never seen the gods of the Thirty-Three, just have a look at the assembly of Licchavis.
See the assembly of Licchavis,
check them out:
they’re just like the Thirty-Three!”
The Licchavis went by carriage as far as the terrain allowed, then descended and approached the Buddha on foot. They bowed to the Buddha, sat down to one side,
and the Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired them with a Dhamma talk.
Then they said to the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Buddha together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept tomorrow’s meal from us.”
Then the Buddha said to the Licchavis,
“I have already accepted tomorrow’s meal from Ambapālī the courtesan.”
Then the Licchavis snapped their fingers, saying,
“We’ve been beaten by the mango-matron! We’ve been beaten by the mango-matron!”
And then those Licchavis approved and agreed with what the Buddha said. They got up from their seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right, before leaving.
And when the night had passed Ambapālī had a variety of delicious foods prepared in her own park. Then she had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Sir, it’s time. The meal is ready.”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the home of Ambapālī together with the mendicant Saṅgha, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Ambapālī served and satisfied the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha with her own hands with a variety of delicious foods.
When the Buddha had eaten and washed his hands and bowl, Ambapālī took a low seat, sat to one side,
and said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I present this park to the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha.”
The Buddha accepted the park.
Then the Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired her with a Dhamma talk, after which he got up from his seat and left.
And while staying at Vesālī, too, the Buddha often gave this Dhamma talk to the mendicants:
“Such is ethics, such is immersion, such is wisdom.
When immersion is imbued with ethics it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When wisdom is imbued with immersion it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When the mind is imbued with wisdom it is rightly freed from the defilements, namely,
the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.”
Commencing the Rains at Beluva
When the Buddha had stayed in Ambapālī’s grove as long as he wished, he addressed Venerable Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to the little village of Beluva.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at the little village of Beluva,
and stayed there.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, please enter the rainy season residence with whatever friends or acquaintances you have around Vesālī.
I’ll commence the rainy season residence right here in the little village of Beluva.”
“Yes, sir,” those mendicants replied. They did as the Buddha said,
while the Buddha commenced the rainy season residence right there in the little village of Beluva.
After the Buddha had commenced the rainy season residence, he fell severely ill, struck by dreadful pains, close to death.
But he endured unperturbed, with mindfulness and situational awareness.
Then it occurred to the Buddha,
“It would not be appropriate for me to become fully extinguished before informing my attendants and taking leave of the mendicant Saṅgha.
Why don’t I forcefully suppress this illness, stabilize the life force, and live on?”
So that is what he did.
Then the Buddha’s illness died down.
Soon after the Buddha had recovered from that sickness, he came out from his dwelling and sat in the shade of the porch on the seat spread out.
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, it’s fantastic that the Buddha is comfortable and well.
Because when the Buddha was sick, my body felt like it was drugged. I was disorientated, and the teachings weren’t clear to me.
Still, at least I was consoled by the thought that
the Buddha won’t become fully extinguished without making some statement regarding the Saṅgha of mendicants.”
“But what could the mendicant Saṅgha expect from me, Ānanda?
I’ve taught the Dhamma without making any distinction between secret and public teachings.
The Realized One doesn’t have the closed fist of a teacher when it comes to the teachings.
If there’s anyone who thinks:
‘I’ll take charge of the Saṅgha of mendicants,’ or ‘the Saṅgha of mendicants is meant for me,’ let them make a statement regarding the Saṅgha.
But the Realized One doesn’t think like this,
so why should he make some statement regarding the Saṅgha?
I’m now old, elderly and senior. I’m advanced in years and have reached the final stage of life.
I’m currently eighty years old.
Just as a decrepit cart keeps going by relying on straps,
in the same way, the Realized One’s body keeps going by relying on straps, or so you’d think.
Sometimes the Realized One, not focusing on any signs, and with the cessation of certain feelings, enters and remains in the signless immersion of the heart. Only then does the Realized One’s body become more comfortable.
So Ānanda, be your own island, your own refuge, with no other refuge. Let the teaching be your island and your refuge, with no other refuge.
And how does a mendicant do this?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
That’s how a mendicant is their own island, their own refuge, with no other refuge. That’s how the teaching is their island and their refuge, with no other refuge.
Whether now or after I have passed, any who shall live as their own island, their own refuge, with no other refuge; with the teaching as their island and their refuge, with no other refuge—those mendicants of mine who want to train shall be among the best of the best.”
An Obvious Hint
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Vesālī for alms.
Then, after the meal, on his return from alms-round, he addressed Venerable Ānanda:
“Ānanda, get your sitting cloth.
Let’s go to the Cāpāla shrine for the day’s meditation.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. Taking his sitting cloth he followed behind the Buddha.
Then the Buddha went up to the Cāpāla shrine, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Ānanda bowed to the Buddha and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to him:
“Ānanda, Vesālī is lovely. And the Udena, Gotamaka, Sattamba, Bahuputta, Sārandada, and Cāpāla shrines are all lovely.
Whoever has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power—made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them—may, if they wish, live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.
The Realized One has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power, made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them. If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.”
But Ānanda didn’t get it, even though the Buddha dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign.
He didn’t beg the Buddha:
“Sir, may the Blessed One please remain for the eon! May the Holy One please remain for the eon! That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.” For his mind was as if possessed by Māra.
For a second time …
And for a third time, the Buddha said to Ānanda:
“Ānanda, Vesālī is lovely. And the Udena, Gotamaka, Sattamba, Bahuputta, Sārandada, and Cāpāla shrines are all lovely.
Whoever has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power—made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them—may, if they wish, live on for the eon, or what’s left of it.
The Realized One has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power, made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them. If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon, or what’s left of it.”
But Ānanda didn’t get it, even though the Buddha dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign.
He didn’t beg the Buddha:
“Sir, may the Blessed One please remain for the eon! May the Holy One please remain for the eon! That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.” For his mind was as if possessed by Māra.
Then the Buddha got up and said to Venerable Ānanda,
“Go now, Ānanda,
at your convenience.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. He rose from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before sitting at the root of a tree close by.
The Appeal of Māra
And then, not long after Ānanda had left, Māra the Wicked went up to the Buddha, stood to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, may the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have monk disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned, have memorized the teachings, and practice in line with the teachings. Not until they practice properly, living in line with the teaching. Not until they’ve learned their tradition, and explain, teach, assert, establish, disclose, analyze, and make it clear. Not until they can legitimately and completely refute the doctrines of others that come up, and teach with a demonstrable basis.’
Today you do have such monk disciples.
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have nun disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned …’
Today you do have such nun disciples.
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have layman disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned …’
Today you do have such layman disciples.
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have laywoman disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned …’
Today you do have such laywoman disciples.
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until my spiritual life is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.’
Today your spiritual life is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.”
When this was said, the Buddha said to Māra,
“Relax, Wicked One. The final extinguishment of the Realized One will be soon.
Three months from now the Realized One will finally be extinguished.”
Surrendering the Life Force
So at the Cāpāla tree shrine the Buddha, mindful and aware, surrendered the life force.
When he did so there was a great earthquake, awe-inspiring and hair-raising, and thunder cracked the sky.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Weighing up the incomparable against an extension of life,
the sage surrendered the life force.
Happy inside, serene,
he burst out of this self-made chain like a suit of armor.”
The Causes of Earthquakes
Then Venerable Ānanda thought,
“How incredible, how amazing! That was a really big earthquake!
That was really a very big earthquake; awe-inspiring and hair-raising, and thunder cracked the sky!
What’s the cause, what’s the reason for a great earthquake?”
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha,
bowed, sat down to one side,
and said to him,
“How incredible, sir, how amazing!
That was a really big earthquake!
That was really a very big earthquake; awe-inspiring and hair-raising, and thunder cracked the sky!
What’s the cause, what’s the reason for a great earthquake?”
“Ānanda, there are these eight causes and reasons for a great earthquake.
What eight?
This great earth is grounded on water, the water is grounded on air, and the air stands in space.
At a time when a great wind blows, it stirs the water, and the water stirs the earth.
This is the first cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, there is an ascetic or brahmin with psychic power who has achieved mastery of the mind, or a god who is mighty and powerful.
They’ve developed a limited perception of earth and a limitless perception of water. They make the earth shake and rock and tremble.
This is the second cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the being intent on awakening passes away from the host of Joyful Gods, he’s conceived in his mother’s belly, mindful and aware. Then the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the third cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the being intent on awakening comes out of his mother’s belly mindful and aware, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the fourth cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the Realized One realizes the supreme perfect awakening, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the fifth cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the Realized One rolls forth the supreme Wheel of Dhamma, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the sixth cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the Realized One, mindful and aware, surrenders the life force, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the seventh cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the Realized One becomes fully extinguished through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the eighth cause and reason for a great earthquake.
These are the eight causes and reasons for a great earthquake.
Eight Assemblies
There are, Ānanda, these eight assemblies.
What eight?
The assemblies of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, and ascetics. An assembly of the gods of the Four Great Kings. An assembly of the gods of the Thirty-Three. An assembly of Māras. An assembly of Brahmās.
I recall having approached an assembly of hundreds of aristocrats.
There I used to sit with them, converse, and engage in discussion.
And my appearance and voice became just like theirs.
I educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired them with a Dhamma talk.
But when I spoke they didn’t know:
‘Who is this that speaks? Is it a god or a human?’
And when my Dhamma talk was finished I vanished.
But when I vanished they didn’t know:
‘Who was that who vanished? Was it a god or a human?’
I recall having approached an assembly of hundreds of brahmins …
householders …
ascetics …
the gods of the Four Great Kings …
the gods of the Thirty-Three …
There too I used to sit with them, converse, and engage in discussion.
And my appearance and voice became just like theirs.
I educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired them with a Dhamma talk.
But when I spoke they didn’t know:
‘Who is this that speaks? Is it a god or a human?’
And when my Dhamma talk was finished I vanished.
But when I vanished they didn’t know:
‘Who was that who vanished? Was it a god or a human?’
These are the eight assemblies.
Eight Dimensions of Mastery
Ānanda, there are these eight dimensions of mastery.
What eight?
Perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the first dimension of mastery.
Perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the second dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the third dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the fourth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
They’re like a flax flower that’s blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
In the same way, not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the fifth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
They’re like a champak flower that’s yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
In the same way, not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the sixth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
They’re like a scarlet mallow flower that’s red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
In the same way, not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the seventh dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
They’re like the morning star that’s white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
In the same way, not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the eighth dimension of mastery.
These are the eight dimensions of mastery.
The Eight Liberations
Ānanda, there are these eight liberations.
What eight?
Having physical form, they see visions.
This is the first liberation.
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally.
This is the second liberation.
They’re focused only on beauty.
This is the third liberation.
Going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the fourth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the fifth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the sixth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the seventh liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling.
This is the eighth liberation.
These are the eight liberations.
Ānanda, this one time, when I was first awakened, I was staying near Uruvelā at the goatherd’s banyan tree on the bank of the Nerañjarā River.
Then Māra the wicked approached me, stood to one side, and said:
‘Sir, may the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.’
When he had spoken, I said to Māra:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have monk disciples …
nun disciples …
layman disciples …
laywoman disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned.
Not until my spiritual life is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.’
Today, just now at the Cāpāla shrine Māra the Wicked approached me once more with the same request, reminding me of my former statement, and saying that those conditions had been fulfilled.
When he had spoken, I said to Māra:
‘Relax, Wicked One. The final extinguishment of the Realized One will be soon.
Three months from now the Realized One will finally be extinguished.’
So today, just now at the Cāpāla tree shrine, mindful and aware, I surrendered the life force.”
The Appeal of Ānanda
When he said this, Venerable Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Blessed One please remain for the eon! May the Holy One please remain for the eon! That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.”
“Enough now, Ānanda.
Do not beg the Realized One. Now is not the time to beg the Realized One.”
For a second time …
For a third time, Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Blessed One please remain for the eon! May the Holy One please remain for the eon! That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.”
“Ānanda, do you have faith in the Realized One’s awakening?”
“Yes, sir.”
“Then why do you keep pressing me up to the third time?”
“Sir, I have heard and learned this in the presence of the Buddha:
‘Whoever has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power—made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them—may, if they wish, live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.
The Realized One has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power, made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them.
If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.’”
“Do you have faith, Ānanda?”
“Yes, sir.”
“Therefore, Ānanda, the misdeed is yours alone, the mistake is yours alone. For even though the Realized One dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign, you didn’t beg me to remain for the eon, or what’s left of it.
If you had begged me, I would have refused you twice, but consented on the third time.
Therefore, Ānanda, the misdeed is yours alone, the mistake is yours alone.
Ānanda, this one time I was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain.
There I said to you:
‘Ānanda, Rājagaha is lovely, and so is the Vulture’s Peak.
Whoever has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power—made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them—may, if they wish, live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.
The Realized One has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power, made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them. If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.’
But you didn’t get it, even though I dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign. You didn’t beg me to remain for the eon, or what’s left of it.
If you had begged me, I would have refused you twice, but consented on the third time.
Therefore, Ānanda, the misdeed is yours alone, the mistake is yours alone.
Ānanda, this one time I was staying right there near Rājagaha, at the Gotama banyan tree …
at Bandit’s Cliff …
in the Sattapaṇṇi cave on the slopes of Vebhara …
at the Black rock on the slopes of Isigili …
in the Cool Wood, under the Snake’s Hood Grotto …
in the Hot Springs Monastery …
in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground …
in Jīvaka’s mango grove …
in the Maddakucchi deer park …
And in each place I said to you:
‘Ānanda, Rājagaha is lovely, and so are all these places. …
If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.’
But you didn’t get it, even though I dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign. You didn’t beg me to remain for the eon, or what’s left of it.
Ānanda, this one time I was staying right here near Vesālī, at the Udena shrine …
at the Gotamaka shrine …
at the Sattamba shrine …
at the Many Sons shrine …
at the Sārandada shrine …
and just now, today at the Cāpāla shrine. There I said to you:
‘Ānanda, Vesālī is lovely. And the Udena, Gotamaka, Sattamba, Bahuputta, Sārandada, and Cāpāla shrines are all lovely.
Whoever has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power—made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them—may, if they wish, live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.
The Realized One has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power, made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them. If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.’
But you didn’t get it, even though I dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign. You didn’t beg me to remain for the eon, or what’s left of it, saying:
‘Sir, may the Blessed One please remain for the eon! May the Holy One please remain for the eon! That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.’
If you had begged me, I would have refused you twice, but consented on the third time.
Therefore, Ānanda, the misdeed is yours alone, the mistake is yours alone.
Did I not prepare for this when I explained that
we must be parted and separated from all we hold dear and beloved?
How could it possibly be so that what is born, created, conditioned, and liable to fall apart should not fall apart?
The Realized One has discarded, eliminated, released, given up, relinquished, and surrendered the life force. He has definitively stated:
‘The final extinguishment of the Realized One will be soon.
Three months from now the Realized One will finally be extinguished.’
It’s not possible for the Realized One, for the sake of life, to take back the life force once it has been given up like that.
Come, Ānanda, let’s go to the Great Wood, the hall with the peaked roof.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
So the Buddha went with Ānanda to the hall with the peaked roof, and said to him,
“Go, Ānanda, gather all the mendicants staying in the vicinity of Vesālī together in the assembly hall.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda.
He did what the Buddha asked, went up to him, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, the mendicant Saṅgha has assembled. Please, sir, go at your convenience.”
Then the Buddha went to the assembly hall, where he sat on the seat spread out
and addressed the mendicants:
“So, mendicants, having carefully memorized those things I have taught you from my direct knowledge, you should cultivate, develop, and make much of them so that this spiritual practice may last for a long time. That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
And what are those things I have taught from my direct knowledge?
They are: the four kinds of mindfulness meditation, the four right efforts, the four bases of psychic power, the five faculties, the five powers, the seven awakening factors, and the noble eightfold path.
These are the things I have taught from my direct knowledge. Having carefully memorized them, you should cultivate, develop, and make much of them so that this spiritual practice may last for a long time. That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.”
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants:
“Come now, mendicants, I say to you all:
‘Conditions fall apart. Persist with diligence.’
The final extinguishment of the Realized One will be soon.
Three months from now the Realized One will finally be extinguished.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“I’ve reached a ripe old age,
and little of my life is left.
Having given it up, I’ll depart;
I’ve made a refuge for myself.
Diligent and mindful,
be of good virtues, mendicants!
With well-settled thoughts,
take good care of your minds.
Whoever meditates diligently
in this teaching and training,
giving up transmigration through rebirths,
will make an end to suffering.”
The Elephant Look
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Vesālī for alms.
Then, after the meal, on his return from alms-round, he turned his whole body, the way that elephants do, to look back at Vesālī. He said to Venerable Ānanda:
“Ānanda, this will be the last time the Realized One sees Vesālī.
Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Bhaṇḍagāma.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at Bhaṇḍagāma,
and stayed there.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, not understanding and not penetrating four things, both you and I have wandered and transmigrated for such a very long time.
What four?
Noble ethics,
immersion,
and freedom.
These noble ethics, immersion, wisdom, and freedom have been understood and comprehended. Craving for continued existence has been cut off; the attachment to continued existence is ended; now there are no more future lives.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“Ethics, immersion, and wisdom,
and the supreme freedom:
these things have been understood
by Gotama the renowned.
And so the Buddha, having insight,
explained this teaching to the mendicants.
The teacher made an end of suffering,
seeing clearly, he is extinguished.”
And while staying there, too, he often gave this Dhamma talk to the mendicants:
“Such is ethics, such is immersion, such is wisdom.
When immersion is imbued with ethics it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When wisdom is imbued with immersion it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When the mind is imbued with wisdom it is rightly freed from the defilements, namely,
the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.”
The Four Great References
When the Buddha had stayed in Bhaṇḍagāma as long as he wished, he addressed Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Hatthigāma.”…
“Let’s go to Ambagāma.”…
“Let’s go to Jambugāma.”…
“Let’s go to Bhoganagara.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at Bhoganagara,
where he stayed at the Ānanda shrine.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, I will teach you the four great references.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Take a mendicant who says:
‘Reverend, I have heard and learned this in the presence of the Buddha:
this is the teaching, this is the training, this is the Teacher’s instruction.’
You should neither approve nor dismiss that mendicant’s statement.
Instead, you should carefully memorize those words and phrases, then check if they’re included in the discourses or found in the texts on monastic training.
If they’re not included in the discourses or found in the texts on monastic training, you should draw the conclusion:
‘Clearly this is not the word of the Buddha.
It has been incorrectly memorized by that mendicant.’
And so you should reject it.
If they are included in the discourses or found in the texts on monastic training, you should draw the conclusion:
‘Clearly this is the word of the Buddha.
It has been correctly memorized by that mendicant.’
You should remember it. This is the first great reference.
Take another mendicant who says:
‘In such-and-such monastery lives a Saṅgha with seniors and leaders.
I’ve heard and learned this in the presence of that Saṅgha:
this is the teaching, this is the training, this is the Teacher’s instruction.’
You should neither approve nor dismiss that mendicant’s statement.
Instead, you should carefully memorize those words and phrases, then check if they’re included in the discourses or found in the texts on monastic training.
If they’re not included in the discourses or found in the texts on monastic training, you should draw the conclusion:
‘Clearly this is not the word of the Buddha.
It has been incorrectly memorized by that Saṅgha.’
And so you should reject it.
If they are included in the discourses or found in the texts on monastic training, you should draw the conclusion:
‘Clearly this is the word of the Buddha.
It has been correctly memorized by that Saṅgha.’
You should remember it. This is the second great reference.
Take another mendicant who says:
‘In such-and-such monastery there are several senior mendicants who are very learned, knowledgeable in the scriptures, who have memorized the teachings, the texts on monastic training, and the outlines.
I’ve heard and learned this in the presence of those senior mendicants:
this is the teaching, this is the training, this is the Teacher’s instruction.’
You should neither approve nor dismiss that mendicant’s statement.
If they’re not included in the discourses or found in the texts on monastic training, you should draw the conclusion:
‘Clearly this is not the word of the Buddha.
It has not been correctly memorized by those senior mendicants.’
And so you should reject it.
If they are included in the discourses and found in the texts on monastic training, you should draw the conclusion:
‘Clearly this is the word of the Buddha.
It has been correctly memorized by those senior mendicants.’
You should remember it. This is the third great reference.
Take another mendicant who says:
‘In such-and-such monastery there is a single senior mendicant who is very learned and knowledgeable in the scriptures, who has memorized the teachings, the texts on monastic training, and the outlines.
I’ve heard and learned this in the presence of that senior mendicant:
this is the teaching, this is the training, this is the Teacher’s instruction.’
You should neither approve nor dismiss that mendicant’s statement.
Instead, you should carefully memorize those words and phrases, then check if they’re included in the discourses or found in the texts on monastic training.
If they’re not included in the discourses or found in the texts on monastic training, you should draw the conclusion:
‘Clearly this is not the word of the Buddha.
It has been incorrectly memorized by that senior mendicant.’
And so you should reject it.
If they are included in the discourses and found in the texts on monastic training, you should draw the conclusion:
‘Clearly this is the word of the Buddha.
It has been correctly memorized by that senior mendicant.’
You should remember it. This is the fourth great reference.
These are the four great references. You should remember them.”
And while staying at the Ānanda shrine, too, the Buddha often gave this Dhamma talk to the mendicants:
“Such is ethics, such is immersion, such is wisdom.
When immersion is imbued with ethics it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When wisdom is imbued with immersion it’s very fruitful and beneficial.
When the mind is imbued with wisdom it is rightly freed from the defilements, namely,
the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.”
On Cunda the Smith
When the Buddha had stayed in Bhoganagara as long as he wished, he addressed Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Pāvā.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants arrived at Pāvā,
where he stayed in Cunda the smith’s mango grove.
Cunda heard that the Buddha had arrived and was staying in his mango grove.
Then he went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired him with a Dhamma talk.
Then Cunda said to the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Buddha together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept tomorrow’s meal from me.”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, Cunda got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before leaving.
And when the night had passed Cunda had a variety of delicious foods prepared in his own home, and plenty of pork on the turn. Then he had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Sir, it’s time. The meal is ready.”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the home of Cunda together with the mendicant Saṅgha, where he sat on the seat spread out
and addressed Cunda,
“Cunda, please serve me with the pork on the turn that you’ve prepared.
And serve the mendicant Saṅgha with the other foods.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Cunda, and did as he was asked.
Then the Buddha addressed Cunda,
“Cunda, any pork on the turn that’s left over, you should bury it in a pond.
I don’t see anyone in this world—with its gods, Māras, and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its gods and humans—who could properly digest it except for the Realized One.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Cunda. He did as he was asked, then came back to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
Then the Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired him with a Dhamma talk, after which he got up from his seat and left.
After the Buddha had eaten Cunda’s meal, he fell severely ill with bloody dysentery, struck by dreadful pains, close to death.
But he endured unperturbed, with mindfulness and situational awareness.
Then he addressed Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to Kusinārā.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
I’ve heard that after eating
the meal of Cunda the smith,
the wise one fell severely ill,
with pains, close to death.
A severe sickness struck the Teacher
who had eaten the pork on the turn.
While still purging the Buddha said:
“I’ll go to the citadel of Kusinārā.”
Bringing a Drink
Then the Buddha left the road and went to the root of a certain tree, where he addressed Ānanda,
“Please, Ānanda, fold my outer robe in four and spread it out for me. I am tired and will sit down.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda, and did as he was asked.
The Buddha sat on the seat spread out.
When he was seated he said to Venerable Ānanda,
“Please, Ānanda, fetch me some water. I am thirsty and will drink.”
When he said this, Venerable Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“Sir, just now around five hundred carts have passed by. The shallow water has been churned up by their wheels, and it flows cloudy and murky.
The Kakutthā river is not far away, with clear, sweet, cool water, clean, with smooth banks, delightful.
There the Buddha can drink and cool his limbs.”
For a second time, the Buddha asked Ānanda for a drink,
and for a second time Ānanda suggested going to the Kakutthā river.
And for a third time, the Buddha said to Ānanda,
“Please, Ānanda, fetch me some water. I am thirsty and will drink.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. Taking his bowl he went to the river.
Now, though the shallow water in that creek had been churned up by wheels, and flowed cloudy and murky, when Ānanda approached it flowed transparent, clear, and unclouded.
Then Ānanda thought,
“It’s incredible, it’s amazing! The Realized One has such psychic power and might!
For though the shallow water in that creek had been churned up by wheels, and flowed cloudy and murky, when I approached it flowed transparent, clear, and unclouded.”
Gathering a bowl of drinking water he went back to the Buddha, and said to him,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing! The Realized One has such psychic power and might!
Just now, though the shallow water in that creek had been churned up by wheels, and flowed cloudy and murky, when I approached it flowed transparent, clear, and unclouded.
Drink the water, Blessed One! Drink the water, Holy One!”
So the Buddha drank the water.
On Pukkusa the Malla
Now at that time Pukkusa the Malla, a disciple of Āḷāra Kālāma, was traveling along the road from Kusinārā and Pāvā.
He saw the Buddha sitting at the root of a certain tree.
He went up to him, bowed, sat down to one side, and said,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing! Those who have gone forth remain in such peaceful meditations.
Once it so happened that Āḷāra Kālāma, while traveling along a road, left the road and sat at the root of a nearby tree for the day’s meditation.
Then around five hundred carts passed by right next to Āḷāra Kālāma.
Then a certain person coming behind those carts went up to Āḷāra Kālāma and said to him:
‘Sir, didn’t you see the five hundred carts pass by?’
‘No, friend, I didn’t see them.’
‘But sir, didn’t you hear a sound?’
‘No, friend, I didn’t hear a sound.’
‘But sir, were you asleep?’
‘No, friend, I wasn’t asleep.’
‘But sir, were you conscious?’
‘Yes, friend.’
‘So, sir, while conscious and awake you neither saw nor heard a sound as five hundred carts passed by right next to you?
Why sir, even your outer robe is covered with dust!’
‘Yes, friend.’
Then that person thought:
‘It’s incredible, it’s amazing! Those who have gone forth remain in such peaceful meditations,
in that, while conscious and awake he neither saw nor heard a sound as five hundred carts passed by right next to him.’
And after declaring his lofty confidence in Āḷāra Kālāma, he left.”
“What do you think, Pukkusa?
Which is harder and more challenging to do while conscious and awake:
to neither see nor hear a sound as five hundred carts pass by right next to you?
Or to neither see nor hear a sound as it’s raining and pouring, lightning’s flashing, and thunder’s cracking?”
“What do five hundred carts matter, or six hundred, or seven hundred, or eight hundred, or nine hundred, or a thousand, or even a hundred thousand carts?
It’s far harder and more challenging to neither see nor hear a sound as it’s raining and pouring, lightning’s flashing, and thunder’s cracking!”
“This one time, Pukkusa, I was staying near Ātumā in a threshing-hut.
At that time it was raining and pouring, lightning was flashing, and thunder was cracking. And not far from the threshing-hut two farmers who were brothers were killed, as well as four oxen.
Then a large crowd came from Ātumā to the place where that happened.
Now at that time I came out of the threshing-hut and was walking mindfully in the open near the door of the hut.
Then having left that crowd, a certain person approached me, bowed, and stood to one side.
I said to them,
‘Why, friend, has this crowd gathered?’
‘Just now, sir, it was raining and pouring, lightning was flashing, and thunder was cracking. And two farmers who were brothers were killed, as well as four oxen.
Then this crowd gathered here.
But sir, where were you?’
‘I was right here, friend.’
‘But sir, did you see?’
‘No, friend, I didn’t see anything.’
‘But sir, didn’t you hear a sound?’
‘No, friend, I didn’t hear a sound.’
‘But sir, were you asleep?’
‘No, friend, I wasn’t asleep.’
‘But sir, were you conscious?’
‘Yes, friend.’
‘So, sir, while conscious and awake you neither saw nor heard a sound as it was raining and pouring, lightning was flashing, and thunder was cracking?’
‘Yes, friend.’
Then that person thought:
‘It’s incredible, it’s amazing! Those who have gone forth remain in such peaceful meditations,
in that, while conscious and awake he neither saw nor heard a sound as it was raining and pouring, lightning was flashing, and thunder was cracking.’
And after declaring their lofty confidence in me, they bowed and respectfully circled me, keeping me on their right, before leaving.”
When he said this, Pukkusa said to him,
“Any confidence I had in Āḷāra Kālāma I sweep away as in a strong wind, or float away as down a swift stream.
Excellent, sir! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, the Buddha has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may the Buddha remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
Then Pukkusa addressed a certain man,
“Please, my man, fetch a pair of ready to wear polished golden garments.”
“Yes, sir,” replied that man, and did as he was asked.
Then Pukkusa brought the garments to the Buddha,
“Sir, please accept this pair of ready to wear polished golden garments from me out of compassion.”
“Well then, Pukkusa, clothe me in one, and Ānanda in the other.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Pukkusa, and did so.
Then the Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired Pukkusa the Malla with a Dhamma talk,
after which he got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha before leaving.
Then, not long after Pukkusa had left, Ānanda placed the pair of golden garments on the Buddha’s body.
But when placed on the Buddha’s body they seemed to lose their shine.
Then Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing, how pure and bright is the color of the Realized One’s skin.
When this pair of ready to wear polished golden garments is placed on the Buddha’s body they seem to lose their shine.”
“That’s so true, Ānanda, that’s so true! There are two times when the color of the Realized One’s skin becomes extra pure and bright.
The night when a Realized One understands the supreme perfect awakening; and the night he becomes fully extinguished through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over.
These are the are two times when the color of the Realized One’s skin becomes extra pure and bright.
Today, Ānanda, in the last watch of the night, between a pair of sal trees in the sal forest of the Mallas at Upavattana near Kusinārā, shall be the Realized One’s full extinguishment.
Come, Ānanda, let’s go to the Kakutthā River.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
A pair of golden polished garments
was presented by Pukkusa;
when the teacher was clothed with them,
his golden skin glowed bright.
Then the Buddha together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants went to the Kakutthā River. He plunged into the river and bathed and drank. And when he had emerged, he went to the mango grove,
where he addressed Venerable Cundaka,
“Please, Cundaka, fold my outer robe in four and spread it out for me. I am tired and will lie down.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Cundaka, and did as he was asked.
And then the Buddha laid down in the lion’s posture—on the right side, placing one foot on top of the other—mindful and aware, and focused on the time of getting up.
But Cundaka sat down right there in front of the Buddha.
Having gone to Kakutthā Creek,
whose water was transparent, sweet, and clear,
the Teacher, being tired, plunged in,
the Realized One, without compare in the world.
And after bathing and drinking the Teacher emerged.
Before the group of mendicants, in the middle, the Buddha,
the Teacher who rolled forth the present dispensation,
the great hermit went to the mango grove.
He addressed the mendicant named Cundaka:
“Spread out my folded robe so I can lie down.”
The self-developed one urged Cunda,
who quickly spread the folded robe.
The Teacher lay down so tired,
while Cunda sat there before him.
Then the Buddha said to Venerable Ānanda:
“Now it may happen, Ānanda, that others may give rise to some regret for Cunda the smith:
‘It’s your loss, friend Cunda, it’s your misfortune, in that the Realized One became fully extinguished after eating his last meal from you.’
You should dispel remorse in Cunda the smith like this:
‘You’re fortunate, friend Cunda, you’re so very fortunate,
in that the Realized One became fully extinguished after eating his last meal from you.
I have heard and learned this in the presence of the Buddha.
There are two meal offerings that have identical fruit and result, and are more fruitful and beneficial than other meal offerings.
The meal after eating which a Realized One understands the supreme perfect awakening; and the meal after eating which he becomes fully extinguished through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over.
These two meal offerings have identical fruit and result, and are more fruitful and beneficial than other meal offerings.
You’ve accumulated a deed that leads to long life, beauty, happiness, fame, heaven, and sovereignty.’
That’s how you should dispel remorse in Cunda the smith.”
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“A giver’s merit grows;
enmity doesn’t build up when you have self-control.
A skillful person gives up bad things—
with the end of greed, hate, and delusion, they’re extinguished.”
The Pair of Sal Trees
Then the Buddha said to Ānanda,
“Come, Ānanda, let’s go to the far shore of the Golden River, and on to the sal forest of the Mallas at Upavattana near Kusinārā.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
And that’s where they went.
Then the Buddha addressed Ānanda,
“Please, Ānanda, set up a cot for me between the twin sal trees, with my head to the north. I am tired and will lie down.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda, and did as he was asked.
And then the Buddha laid down in the lion’s posture—on the right side, placing one foot on top of the other—mindful and aware.
Now at that time the twin sal trees were in full blossom with flowers out of season.
They sprinkled and bestrewed the Realized One’s body in honor of the Realized One.
And the flowers of the heavenly Flame Tree fell from the sky, and they too sprinkled and bestrewed the Realized One’s body in honor of the Realized One.
And heavenly sandalwood powder fell from the sky, and it too sprinkled and bestrewed the Realized One’s body in honor of the Realized One.
And heavenly music played in the sky in honor of the Realized One.
And heavenly choirs sang in the sky in honor of the Realized One.
Then the Buddha pointed out to Ānanda what was happening, adding:
“That’s not how the Realized One is honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed.
Any monk or nun or male or female lay follower who practices in line with the teachings, practicing properly, living in line with the teachings—they honor, respect, revere, venerate, and esteem the Realized One with the highest honor.
So Ānanda, you should train like this: ‘We shall practice in line with the teachings, practicing properly, living in line with the teaching.’
The Monk Upavāṇa
Now at that time Venerable Upavāṇa was standing in front of the Buddha fanning him.
Then the Buddha made him move,
“Move over, mendicant, don’t stand in front of me.”
Ānanda thought,
“This Venerable Upavāṇa has been the Buddha’s attendant for a long time, close to him, living in his presence.
Yet in his final hour the Buddha makes him move, saying:
‘Move over, mendicant, don’t stand in front of me.’
What is the cause, what is the reason for this?”
Then Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“This Venerable Upavāṇa has been the Buddha’s attendant for a long time, close to him, living in his presence.
Yet in his final hour the Buddha makes him move, saying:
‘Move over, mendicant, don’t stand in front of me.’
What is the cause, sir, what is the reason for this?”
“Most of the deities from ten solar systems have gathered to see the Realized One.
For twelve leagues all around this sal grove there’s no spot, not even a fraction of a hair’s tip, that’s not crowded full of illustrious deities.
The deities are complaining:
‘We’ve come such a long way to see the Realized One!
Only rarely do Realized Ones arise in the world, perfected ones, fully awakened Buddhas.
This very day, in the last watch of the night, the Realized One will become fully extinguished.
And this illustrious mendicant is standing in front of the Buddha blocking the view. We won’t get to see the Realized One in his final hour!’”
“But sir, what kind of deities are you thinking of?”
“There are, Ānanda, deities—both in the sky and on the earth—who are percipient of the earth. With hair disheveled and arms raised, they fall down like their feet were chopped off, rolling back and forth, lamenting:
‘Too soon the Blessed One will become fully extinguished! Too soon the Holy One will become fully extinguished! Too soon the seer will vanish from the world!’
But the deities who are free of desire endure, mindful and aware, thinking:
‘Conditions are impermanent. How could it possibly be otherwise?’”
The Four Inspiring Places
“Previously, sir, when mendicants had completed the rainy season residence in various districts they came to see the Realized One.
We got to see the esteemed mendicants, and to pay homage to them.
But when the Buddha has passed, we won’t get to see the esteemed mendicants or to pay homage to them.”
“Ānanda, a faithful gentleman should go to see these four inspiring places.
What four?
Thinking: ‘Here the Realized One was born!’—that is an inspiring place.
Thinking: ‘Here the Realized One became awakened as a supreme fully awakened Buddha!’—that is an inspiring place.
Thinking: ‘Here the supreme Wheel of Dhamma was rolled forth by the Realized One!’—that is an inspiring place.
Thinking: ‘Here the Realized One became fully extinguished through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over!’—that is an inspiring place.
These are the four inspiring places that a faithful gentleman should go to see.
Faithful monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen will come, and think:
‘Here the Realized One was born!’ and ‘Here the Realized One became awakened as a supreme fully awakened Buddha!’ and ‘Here the supreme Wheel of Dhamma was rolled forth by the Realized One!’ and ‘Here the Realized One became fully extinguished through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over!’
Anyone who passes away while on pilgrimage to these shrines will, when their body breaks up, after death, be reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.”
Ānanda’s Questions
“Sir, how do we proceed when it comes to females?”
“Without seeing, Ānanda.”
“But when seeing, how to proceed?”
“Without getting into conversation, Ānanda.”
“But when in a conversation, how to proceed?”
“Be mindful, Ānanda.”
“Sir, how do we proceed when it comes to the Realized One’s corpse?”
“Don’t get involved in the rites for venerating the Realized One’s corpse, Ānanda.
Please, Ānanda, you must all strive and practice for your own goal! Meditate diligent, keen, and resolute for your own goal!
There are astute aristocrats, brahmins, and householders who are devoted to the Realized One. They will perform the rites for venerating the Realized One’s corpse.”
“But sir, how to proceed when it comes to the Realized One’s corpse?”
“Proceed in the same way as they do for the corpse of a wheel-turning monarch.”
“But how do they proceed with a wheel-turning monarch’s corpse?”
“They wrap a wheel-turning monarch’s corpse with unworn cloth, then with uncarded cotton, then again with unworn cloth.
In this way they wrap the corpse with five hundred double-layers. Then they place it in an iron case filled with oil and close it up with another case. Then, having built a funeral pyre out of all kinds of fragrant substances, they cremate the corpse.
They build a monument for the wheel-turning monarch at the crossroads.
That’s how they proceed with a wheel-turning monarch’s corpse.
Proceed in the same way with the Realized One’s corpse.
A monument for the Realized One is to be built at the crossroads.
When someone there lifts up garlands or fragrance or powder, or bows, or inspires confidence in their heart, that will be for their lasting welfare and happiness.
Persons Worthy of Monument
Ānanda, these four are worthy of a monument.
What four?
A Realized One, a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha; a Buddha awakened for themselves; a disciple of a Realized One; and a wheel-turning monarch.
And for what reason is a Realized One worthy of a monument?
So that many people will inspire confidence in their hearts, thinking: ‘This is the monument for that Blessed One, perfected and fully awakened!’
And having done so, when their body breaks up, after death, they are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
It is for this reason that a Realized One is worthy of a monument.
And for what reason is a Buddha awakened for themselves worthy of a monument?
So that many people will inspire confidence in their hearts, thinking: ‘This is the monument for that Buddha awakened for himself!’
And having done so, when their body breaks up, after death, they are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
It is for this reason that a Buddha awakened for himself is worthy of a monument.
And for what reason is a Realized One’s disciple worthy of a monument?
So that many people will inspire confidence in their hearts, thinking: ‘This is the monument for that Blessed One’s disciple!’
And having done so, when their body breaks up, after death, they are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
It is for this reason that a Realized One’s disciple is worthy of a monument.
And for what reason is a wheel-turning monarch worthy of a monument?
So that many people will inspire confidence in their hearts, thinking: ‘This is the monument for that just and principled king!’
And having done so, when their body breaks up, after death, they are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
It is for this reason that a wheel-turning monarch is worthy of a monument.
These four are worthy of a monument.”
Ānanda’s Incredible Qualities
Then Venerable Ānanda entered a dwelling, and stood there leaning against the door-jamb and crying,
“Oh! I’m still only a trainee with work left to do; and my Teacher’s about to become fully extinguished, he who is so kind to me!”
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants,
“Mendicants, where is Ānanda?”
“Sir, Ānanda has entered a dwelling, and stands there leaning against the door-jamb and crying:
‘Oh! I’m still only a trainee with work left to do; and my Teacher’s about to become fully extinguished, he who is so kind to me!’”
So the Buddha addressed a certain monk,
“Please, monk, in my name tell Ānanda that
the teacher summons him.”
“Yes, sir,” that monk replied. He went to Ānanda and said to him,
“Reverend Ānanda, the teacher summons you.”
“Yes, reverend,” Ānanda replied.
He went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side. The Buddha said to him:
“Enough, Ānanda! Do not grieve, do not lament. Did I not prepare for this when I explained that
we must be parted and separated from all we hold dear and beloved?
How could it possibly be so that what is born, created, conditioned, and liable to fall apart should not fall apart, even the Realized One’s body?
For a long time, Ānanda, you’ve treated the Realized One with deeds of body, speech, and mind that are loving, beneficial, pleasant, whole-hearted, and limitless.
You have done good deeds, Ānanda. Devote yourself to meditation, and you will soon be free of defilements.”
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants:
“The Buddhas of the past or the future have attendants who are no better than Ānanda is for me.
Ānanda is astute,
he is intelligent.
He knows the time for monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, king’s ministers, religious founders, and the disciples of religious founders to visit the Realized One.
There are these four incredible and amazing things about Ānanda.
What four?
If an assembly of monks goes to see Ānanda, they’re uplifted by seeing him
and uplifted by hearing him speak.
And when he falls silent, they’ve never had enough.
If an assembly of nuns …
or laywomen goes to see Ānanda, they’re uplifted by seeing him
and uplifted by hearing him speak.
And when he falls silent, they’ve never had enough.
These are the four incredible and amazing things about Ānanda.
There are these four incredible and amazing things about a wheel-turning monarch.
What four?
If an assembly of aristocrats goes to see a wheel-turning monarch, they’re uplifted by seeing him
and uplifted by hearing him speak.
And when he falls silent, they’ve never had enough.
If an assembly of brahmins …
householders …
or ascetics goes to see a wheel-turning monarch, they’re uplifted by seeing him
and uplifted by hearing him speak.
And when he falls silent, they’ve never had enough.
In the same way, there are those four incredible and amazing things about Ānanda.”
Teaching the Discourse on Mahāsudassana
When he said this, Venerable Ānanda said to the Buddha:
“Sir, please don’t become fully extinguished in this little hamlet, this jungle hamlet, this branch hamlet.
There are other great cities such as
Campā, Rājagaha, Sāvatthī, Sāketa, Kosambī, and Benares.
Let the Buddha become fully extinguished there.
There are many well-to-do aristocrats, brahmins, and householders there who are devoted to the Buddha.
They will perform the rites of venerating the Realized One’s corpse.”
“Don’t say that Ānanda! Don’t say that
this is a little hamlet, a jungle hamlet, a branch hamlet.
Once upon a time there was a king named Mahāsudassana who was a wheel-turning monarch, a just and principled king. His dominion extended to all four sides, he achieved stability in the country, and he possessed the seven treasures.
His capital was this Kusinārā, which at the time was named Kusāvatī.
It stretched for twelve leagues from east to west, and seven leagues from north to south.
The royal capital of Kusāvatī was successful, prosperous, populous, full of people, with plenty of food.
It was just like Āḷakamandā, the royal capital of the gods, which is successful, prosperous, populous, full of spirits, with plenty of food.
Kusāvatī was never free of ten sounds by day or night, namely:
the sound of elephants, horses, chariots, drums, clay drums, arched harps, singing, horns, gongs, and handbells; and the cry: ‘Eat, drink, be merry!’ as the tenth.
Go, Ānanda, into Kusinārā and inform the Mallas:
‘This very day, Vāseṭṭhas, in the last watch of the night, the Realized One will become fully extinguished.
Come forth, Vāseṭṭhas! Come forth, Vāseṭṭhas!
Don’t regret it later, thinking:
‘The Realized One became fully extinguished in our own village district, but we didn’t get a chance to see him in his final hour.’”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. Then he robed up and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Kusinārā with a companion.
The Mallas Pay Homage
Now at that time the Mallas of Kusinārā were sitting together at the meeting hall on some business.
Ānanda went up to them, and announced:
“This very day, Vāseṭṭhas, in the last watch of the night, the Realized One will become fully extinguished.
Come forth, Vāseṭṭhas! Come forth, Vāseṭṭhas!
Don’t regret it later, thinking:
‘The Realized One became fully extinguished in our own village district, but we didn’t get a chance to see him in his final hour.’”
When they heard what Ānanda had to say, the Mallas, their sons, daughters-in-law, and wives became distraught, saddened, and grief-stricken. And some, with hair disheveled and arms raised, falling down like their feet were chopped off, rolling back and forth, lamented,
“Too soon the Blessed One will become fully extinguished! Too soon the Holy One will become fully extinguished! Too soon the seer will vanish from the world!”
Then the Mallas, their sons, daughters-in-law, and wives, distraught, saddened, and grief-stricken went to the Mallian sal grove at Upavattana and approached Ānanda.
Then Ānanda thought,
“If I have the Mallas pay homage to the Buddha one by one, they won’t be finished before first light.
I’d better separate them family by family and then have them pay homage, saying:
‘Sir, the Malla named so-and-so with children, wives, retinue, and ministers bows with his head at your feet.’”
And so that’s what he did.
So by this means Ānanda got the Mallas to finish paying homage to the Buddha in the first watch of the night.
On Subhadda the Wanderer
Now at that time a wanderer named Subhadda was residing near Kusinārā.
He heard that
on that very day, in the last watch of the night, the ascetic Gotama would become fully extinguished.
He thought:
“I have heard that brahmins of the past who were elderly and senior, the teachers of teachers, said:
‘Only rarely do Realized Ones arise in the world, perfected ones, fully awakened Buddhas.’
And this very day, in the last watch of the night, the ascetic Gotama will become fully extinguished.
This state of uncertainty has come up in me.
I am quite confident that the Buddha is capable of teaching me so that I can give up this state of uncertainty.”
Then Subhadda went to the Mallian sal grove at Upavattana, approached Ānanda, and said to him,
“Master Ānanda, I have heard that brahmins of the past who were elderly and senior, the teachers of teachers, said:
‘Only rarely do Realized Ones arise in the world, perfected ones, fully awakened Buddhas.’
And this very day, in the last watch of the night, the ascetic Gotama will become fully extinguished.
This state of uncertainty has come up in me.
I am quite confident that the Buddha is capable of teaching me so that I can give up this state of uncertainty.
Master Ānanda, please let me see the ascetic Gotama.”
When he had spoken, Ānanda said,
“Enough, Reverend Subhadda, do not trouble the Realized One. He is tired.”
For a second time,
and a third time, Subhadda asked Ānanda, and a third time Ānanda refused.
The Buddha heard that discussion between Ānanda and Subhadda.
He said to Ānanda,
“Enough, Ānanda, don’t obstruct Subhadda; let him see the Realized One.
For whatever he asks me, he will only be looking for understanding, not trouble.
And he will quickly understand any answer I give to his question.”
So Ānanda said to the wanderer Subhadda,
“Go, Reverend Subhadda, the Buddha is taking the time for you.”
Then the wanderer Subhadda went up to the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to the Buddha:
“Master Gotama, there are those ascetics and brahmins who lead an order and a community, and teach a community. They’re well-known and famous religious founders, regarded as holy by many people.
Namely: Pūraṇa Kassapa, Makkhali Gosāla, Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta, Sañjaya Belaṭṭhiputta, Pakudha Kaccāyana, and Ajita Kesakambala.
According to their own claims, did all of them have direct knowledge, or none of them, or only some?”
“Enough, Subhadda, let that be.
I shall teach you the Dhamma.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” Subhadda replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Subhadda, in whatever teaching and training the noble eightfold path is not found, there is no true ascetic found, no second ascetic, no third ascetic, and no fourth ascetic.
In whatever teaching and training the noble eightfold path is found, there is a true ascetic found, a second ascetic, a third ascetic, and a fourth ascetic.
In this teaching and training the noble eightfold path is found. Only here is there a true ascetic, here a second ascetic, here a third ascetic, and here a fourth ascetic. Other sects are empty of ascetics.
Were these mendicants to practice well, the world would not be empty of perfected ones.
I was twenty-nine years of age, Subaddha,
when I went forth to discover what is skillful.
It’s been over fifty years
since I went forth.
I am the one who points out the proper teaching:
Outside of here there is no true ascetic.
Were these mendicants to practice well, the world would not be empty of perfected ones.”
When he had spoken, Subhadda said to the Buddha,
“Excellent, sir! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, the Buddha has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
Sir, may I receive the going forth, the ordination in the Buddha’s presence?”
“Subhadda, if someone formerly ordained in another sect wishes to take the going forth, the ordination in this teaching and training, they must spend four months on probation.
When four months have passed, if the mendicants are satisfied, they’ll give the going forth, the ordination into monkhood.
However, I have recognized individual differences in this matter.”
“Sir, if four months probation are required in such a case, I’ll spend four years on probation.
When four years have passed, if the mendicants are satisfied, let them give me the going forth, the ordination into monkhood.”
Then the Buddha said to Ānanda,
“Well then, Ānanda, give Subhadda the going forth.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then Subhadda said to Ānanda,
“You’re so fortunate, Reverand Ānanda, so very fortunate,
to be anointed here in the Teacher’s presence as his pupil!”
And the wanderer Subhadda received the going forth, the ordination in the Buddha’s presence.
Not long after his ordination, Venerable Subhadda, living alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute, soon realized the supreme end of the spiritual path in this very life. He lived having achieved with his own insight the goal for which gentlemen rightly go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
He understood: “Rebirth is ended; the spiritual journey has been completed; what had to be done has been done; there is no return to any state of existence.”
And Venerable Subhadda became one of the perfected.
He was the last personal disciple of the Buddha.
The Buddha’s Last Words
Then the Buddha addressed Venerable Ānanda:
“Now, Ānanda, some of you might think:
‘The teacher’s dispensation has passed. Now we have no Teacher.’
But you should not see it like this.
The teaching and training that I have taught and pointed out for you shall be your Teacher after my passing.
After my passing, mendicants ought not address each other as ‘reverend’, as they do today.
A more senior mendicant ought to address a more junior mendicant by name or clan, or by saying ‘reverend’.
A more junior mendicant ought to address a more senior mendicant using ‘sir’ or ‘venerable’.
If it wishes, after my passing the Saṅgha may abolish the lesser and minor training rules.
After my passing, give the prime punishment to the mendicant Channa.”
“But sir, what is the prime punishment?”
“Channa may say what he likes,
but the mendicants should not advise or instruct him.”
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants,
“Perhaps even a single mendicant has doubt or uncertainty regarding the Buddha, the teaching, the Saṅgha, the path, or the practice. So ask, mendicants! Don’t regret it later, thinking:
‘We were in the Teacher’s presence and we weren’t able to ask the Buddha a question.’”
When this was said, the mendicants kept silent.
For a second time,
and a third time the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Perhaps even a single mendicant has doubt or uncertainty regarding the Buddha, the teaching, the Saṅgha, the path, or the practice. So ask, mendicants! Don’t regret it later, thinking:
‘We were in the Teacher’s presence and we weren’t able to ask the Buddha a question.’”
For a third time, the mendicants kept silent.
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants,
“Mendicants, perhaps you don’t ask out of respect for the Teacher.
So let a friend tell a friend.”
When this was said, the mendicants kept silent.
Then Venerable Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing! I am quite confident that there’s not even a single mendicant in this Saṅgha who has doubt or uncertainty regarding the Buddha, the teaching, the Saṅgha, the path, or the practice.”
“Ānanda, you speak from faith.
But the Realized One knows that there’s not even a single mendicant in this Saṅgha who has doubt or uncertainty regarding the Buddha, the teaching, the Saṅgha, the path, or the practice.
Even the last of these five hundred mendicants is a stream-enterer, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.”
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants:
“Come now, mendicants, I say to you all:
‘Conditions fall apart. Persist with diligence.’”
These were the Realized One’s last words.
The Full Extinguishment
Then the Buddha entered the first absorption. Emerging from that, he entered the second absorption. Emerging from that, he successively entered into and emerged from the third absorption, the fourth absorption, the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness, and the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. Then he entered the cessation of perception and feeling.
Then Venerable Ānanda said to Venerable Anuruddha,
“Venerable Anuruddha, has the Buddha become fully extinguished?”
“No, Reverend Ānanda. He has entered the cessation of perception and feeling.”
Then the Buddha emerged from the cessation of perception and feeling and entered the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. Emerging from that, he successively entered into and emerged from the dimension of nothingness, the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of infinite space, the fourth absorption, the third absorption, the second absorption, and the first absorption. Emerging from that, he successively entered into and emerged from the second absorption and the third absorption. Then he entered the fourth absorption. Emerging from that the Buddha immediately became fully extinguished.
When the Buddha became fully extinguished, along with the full extinguishment there was a great earthquake, awe-inspiring and hair-raising, and thunder cracked the sky.
When the Buddha became fully extinguished, Brahmā Sahampati recited this verse:
“All creatures in this world
must lay down this bag of bones.
For even a Teacher such as this,
unrivaled in the world,
the Realized One, attained to power,
the Buddha became fully extinguished.”
When the Buddha became fully extinguished, Sakka, lord of gods, recited this verse:
“Oh! Conditions are impermanent,
their nature is to rise and fall;
having arisen, they cease;
their stilling is true bliss.”
When the Buddha became fully extinguished, Venerable Anuruddha recited this verse:
“There was no more breathing
for such a one of steady heart.
Imperturbable, committed to peace,
the sage has done his time.
He put up with painful feelings
without flinching.
The liberation of his heart
was like the extinguishing of a lamp.”
When the Buddha became fully extinguished, Venerable Ānanda recited this verse:
“Then there was terror!
Then they had goosebumps!
When the Buddha, endowed with all fine qualities,
became fully extinguished.”
When the Buddha became fully extinguished, some of the mendicants there, with arms raised, falling down like their feet were chopped off, rolling back and forth, lamented: “Too soon the Blessed One has become fully extinguished! Too soon the Holy One has become fully extinguished! Too soon the seer has vanished from the world!”
But the mendicants who were free of desire endured, mindful and aware, thinking,
“Conditions are impermanent. How could it possibly be otherwise?”
Then Anuruddha addressed the mendicants:
“Enough, reverends, do not grieve or lament.
Did the Buddha not prepare us for this when he explained that
we must be parted and separated from all we hold dear and beloved?
How could it possibly be so that what is born, created, conditioned, and liable to fall apart should not fall apart?
The deities are complaining.”
“But sir, what kind of deities are you thinking of?”
“There are, Ānanda, deities—both in the sky and on the earth—who are percipient of the earth. With hair disheveled and arms raised, they fall down like their feet were chopped off, rolling back and forth, lamenting:
‘Too soon the Blessed One has become fully extinguished! Too soon the Holy One has become fully extinguished! Too soon the seer has vanished from the world!’
But the deities who are free of desire endure, mindful and aware, thinking:
‘Conditions are impermanent. How could it possibly be otherwise?’”
Ānanda and Anuruddha spent the rest of the night talking about Dhamma.
Then Anuruddha said to Ānanda,
“Go, Ānanda, into Kusinārā and inform the Mallas:
‘Vāseṭṭhas, the Buddha has become fully extinguished.
Please come at your convenience.’”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. Then, in the morning, he robed up and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Kusinārā with a companion.
Now at that time the Mallas of Kusinārā were sitting together at the meeting hall on some business.
Ānanda went up to them, and announced,
“Vāseṭṭhas, the Buddha has become fully extinguished.
Please come at your convenience.”
When they heard what Ānanda had to say, the Mallas, their sons, daughters-in-law, and wives became distraught, saddened, and grief-stricken. And some, with hair disheveled and arms raised, falling down like their feet were chopped off, rolling back and forth, lamented,
“Too soon the Blessed One has become fully extinguished! Too soon the Holy One has become fully extinguished! Too soon the seer has vanished from the world!”
The Rites of Venerating the Buddha’s Corpse
Then the Mallas ordered their men,
“So then, my men, collect fragrances and garlands, and all the musical instruments in Kusinārā.”
Then—taking those fragrances and garlands, all the musical instruments, and five hundred pairs of garments—they went to the Mallian sal grove at Upavattana and approached the Buddha’s corpse. They spent the day honoring, respecting, revering, and venerating the Buddha’s corpse with dance and song and music and garlands and fragrances, and making awnings and setting up pavilions.
Then they thought,
“It’s too late to cremate the Buddha’s corpse today. Let’s do it tomorrow.”
But they spent the next day the same way, and so too the third, fourth, fifth, and sixth days.
Then on the seventh day they thought,
“Honoring, respecting, revering, and venerating the Buddha’s corpse with dance and song and music and garlands and fragrances, let us carry it to the south of the town, and cremate it there outside the town.”
Now at that time eight of the leading Mallas, having bathed their heads and dressed in unworn clothes, said,
“We shall lift the Buddha’s corpse.” But they were unable to do so.
The Mallas said to Anuruddha,
“What is the cause, Venerable Anuruddha, what is the reason why these eight Mallian leaders are unable to lift the Buddha’s corpse?”
“Vāseṭṭhas, you have one plan, but the deities have a different one.”
“But sir, what is the deities’ plan?”
“You plan to
carry the Buddha’s corpse to the south of the town while venerating it with dance and song and music and garlands and fragrances, and cremate it there outside the town.
The deities plan to
carry the Buddha’s corpse to the north of the town while venerating it with heavenly dance and song and music and garlands and fragrances. Then they plan to enter the town by the northern gate, carry it through the center of the town, leave by the eastern gate, and cremate it there at the Mallian shrine named Makuṭabandhana.”
“Sir, let it be as the deities plan.”
Now at that time the whole of Kusinārā was covered knee-deep with the flowers of the Flame Tree, without gaps even on the filth and rubbish heaps.
Then the deities and the Mallas of Kusinārā carried the Buddha’s corpse to the north of the town while venerating it with heavenly and human dance and song and music and garlands and fragrances. Then they entered the town by the northern gate, carried it through the center of the town, left by the eastern gate, and deposited the corpse there at the Mallian shrine named Makuṭabandhana.
Then the Mallas said to Anuruddha,
“Sir, how do we proceed when it comes to the Realized One’s corpse?”
“Proceed in the same way as they do for the corpse of a wheel-turning monarch.”
“But how do they proceed with a wheel-turning monarch’s corpse?”
“They wrap a wheel-turning monarch’s corpse with unworn cloth, then with uncarded cotton, then again with unworn cloth.
In this way they wrap the corpse with five hundred double-layers. Then they place it in an iron case filled with oil and close it up with another case. Then, having built a funeral pyre out of all kinds of fragrant substances, they cremate the corpse.
They build a monument for the wheel-turning monarch at the crossroads.
That’s how they proceed with a wheel-turning monarch’s corpse.
Proceed in the same way with the Realized One’s corpse.
A monument for the Realized One is to be built at the crossroads.
When someone there lifts up garlands or fragrance or powder, or bows, or inspires confidence in their heart, that will be for their lasting welfare and happiness.”
Then the Mallas ordered their men,
“So then, my men, collect uncarded cotton.”
So the Mallas wrapped the Buddha’s corpse,
and placed it in an iron case filled with oil. Then, having built a funeral pyre out of all kinds of fragrant substances, they lifted the corpse on to the pyre.
Mahākassapa’s Arrival
Now at that time Venerable Mahākassapa was traveling along the road from Pāvā to Kusinārā together with a large Saṅgha of around five hundred mendicants.
Then he left the road and sat at the root of a tree.
Now at that time a certain Ājīvaka ascetic had picked up a Flame Tree flower in Kusinārā and was traveling along the road to Pāvā.
Mahākassapa saw him coming off in the distance and said to him,
“Reverend, might you know about our Teacher?”
“Yes, reverend. Seven days ago the ascetic Gotama became fully extinguished.
From there I picked up this Flame Tree flower.”
Some of the mendicants there, with arms raised, falling down like their feet were chopped off, rolling back and forth, lamented,
“Too soon the Blessed One has become fully extinguished! Too soon the Holy One has become fully extinguished! Too soon the seer has vanished from the world!”
But the mendicants who were free of desire endured, mindful and aware, thinking,
“Conditions are impermanent. How could it possibly be otherwise?”
Now at that time a monk named Subhadda, who had gone forth when old, was sitting in that assembly.
He said to those mendicants,
“Enough, reverends, do not grieve or lament.
We’re well rid of that Great Ascetic harassing us:
‘This is allowable for you; this is not allowable for you.’
Well, now we shall do what we want and not do what we don’t want.”
Then Venerable Mahākassapa addressed the mendicants,
“Enough, reverends, do not grieve or lament.
Did the Buddha not prepare us for this when he explained that
we must be parted and separated from all we hold dear and beloved?
How could it possibly be so that what is born, created, conditioned, and liable to fall apart should not fall apart, even the Realized One’s body?”
Now at that time four of the leading Mallas, having bathed their heads and dressed in unworn clothes, said,
“We shall light the Buddha’s funeral pyre.” But they were unable to do so.
The Mallas said to Anuruddha,
“What is the cause, Venerable Anuruddha, what is the reason why these four Mallian leaders are unable to light the Buddha’s funeral pyre?”
“Vāseṭṭhas, the deities have a different plan.”
“But sir, what is the deities’ plan?”
“The deities’ plan is this:
Venerable Mahākassapa is traveling along the road from Pāvā to Kusinārā together with a large Saṅgha of around five hundred mendicants.
The Buddha’s funeral pyre shall not burn until he bows with his head at the Buddha’s feet.”
“Sir, let it be as the deities plan.”
Then Venerable Mahākassapa came to the Mallian shrine named Makuṭabandhana at Kusinārā and approached the Buddha’s funeral pyre. Arranging his robe over one shoulder and raising his joined palms, he respectfully circled the Buddha three times, keeping him on his right, and bowed with his head to the Buddha’s feet.
And the five hundred mendicants did likewise.
And when Mahākassapa and the five hundred mendicants bowed the Buddha’s funeral pyre burst into flames all by itself.
And when the Buddha’s corpse was cremated no ash or soot was found from outer or inner skin, flesh, sinews, or synovial fluid.
Only the relics remained.
It’s like when ghee or oil blaze and burn, and neither ashes nor soot are found.
In the same way, when the Buddha’s corpse was cremated no ash or soot was found from outer or inner skin, flesh, sinews, or synovial fluid.
Only the relics remained.
And of those five hundred pairs of garments only two were not burnt: the innermost and the outermost.
But when the Buddha’s corpse was consumed the funeral pyre was extinguished by a stream of water that appeared in the sky,
by water dripping from the sal trees,
and by the Mallas’ fragrant water.
Then the Mallas made a cage of spears for the Buddha’s relics in the meeting hall and surrounded it with a buttress of bows. For seven days they honored, respected, revered, and venerated them with dance and song and music and garlands and fragrances.
Distributing the Relics
King Ajātasattu of Magadha heard
that the Buddha had become fully extinguished at Kusinārā.
He sent an envoy to the Mallas of Kusinārā:
“The Buddha was an aristocrat, and so am I. I too deserve a share of the Buddha’s relics. I will build a monument for them and conduct a memorial service.”
The Licchavis of Vesālī also heard
that the Buddha had become fully extinguished at Kusinārā.
They sent an envoy to the Mallas of Kusinārā:
“The Buddha was an aristocrat, and so are we. We too deserve a share of the Buddha’s relics. We will build a monument for them and conduct a memorial service.”
The Sakyans of Kapilavatthu also heard
that the Buddha had become fully extinguished at Kusinārā.
They sent an envoy to the Mallas of Kusinārā:
“The Buddha was our foremost relative. We too deserve a share of the Buddha’s relics. We will build a monument for them and conduct a memorial service.”
The Bulas of Allakappa also heard
that the Buddha had become fully extinguished at Kusinārā.
They sent an envoy to the Mallas of Kusinārā:
“The Buddha was an aristocrat, and so are we. We too deserve a share of the Buddha’s relics. We will build a monument for them and conduct a memorial service.”
The Koḷiyans of Rāmagāma also heard
that the Buddha had become fully extinguished at Kusinārā.
They sent an envoy to the Mallas of Kusinārā:
“The Buddha was an aristocrat, and so are we. We too deserve a share of the Buddha’s relics. We will build a monument for them and conduct a memorial service.”
The brahmin of Veṭhadīpa also heard
that the Buddha had become fully extinguished at Kusinārā.
He sent an envoy to the Mallas of Kusinārā:
“The Buddha was an aristocrat, and I am a brahmin. I too deserve a share of the Buddha’s relics. I will build a monument for them and conduct a memorial service.”
The Mallas of Pāvā also heard
that the Buddha had become fully extinguished at Kusinārā.
They sent an envoy to the Mallas of Kusinārā:
“The Buddha was an aristocrat, and so are we. We too deserve a share of the Buddha’s relics. We will build a monument for them and conduct a memorial service.”
When they had spoken, the Mallas of Kusinārā said to those various groups:
“The Buddha became fully extinguished in our village district. We will not give away a share of his relics.”
Then Doṇa the brahmin said to those various groups:
“Hear, sirs, a single word from me.
Our Buddha’s teaching was acceptance.
It would not be good to fight over
a share of the supreme person’s relics.
Let us make eight portions, good sirs,
rejoicing in unity and harmony.
Let there be monuments far and wide,
so many folk may gain faith in the Seer!”
“Well then, brahmin, you yourself should fairly divide the Buddha’s relics in eight portions.”
“Yes, sirs,” replied Doṇa to those various groups. He divided the relics as asked and said to them,
“Sirs, please give me the urn, and I shall build a monument for it and conduct a memorial service.”
So they gave Doṇa the urn.
The Moras of Pippalivana heard
that the Buddha had become fully extinguished at Kusinārā.
They sent an envoy to the Mallas of Kusinārā:
“The Buddha was an aristocrat, and so are we. We too deserve a share of the Buddha’s relics. We will build a monument for them and conduct a memorial service.”
“There is no portion of the Buddha’s relics left, they have already been portioned out.
Here, take the embers.”
So they took the embers.
Venerating the Relics
Then King Ajātasattu of Magadha,
the Licchavis of Vesālī,
the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu,
the Bulas of Allakappa,
the Koḷiyans of Rāmagāma,
the brahmin of Veṭhadīpa,
the Mallas of Pāvā,
the Mallas of Kusinārā,
the brahmin Doṇa,
and the Moriyas of Pippalivana built monuments for them and conducted memorial services.
Thus there were eight monuments for the relics, a ninth for the urn, and a tenth for the embers.
That is how it was in those days.
There were eight shares of the Seer’s relics.
Seven were worshipped throughout India.
But one share of the most excellent of men
was worshipped in Rāmagāma by a dragon king.
One tooth is venerated by the gods of the Three and Thirty,
and one is worshipped in the city of Gandhāra;
another one in the realm of the Kaliṅga King,
and one is worshipped by a dragon king.
Through their glory this rich earth
is adorned with the best of offerings.
Thus the Seer’s corpse
is well honored by the honorable.
It’s venerated by lords of gods, dragons, and spirits;
and likewise venerated by the finest lords of men.
Honor it with joined palms when you get the chance,
for a Buddha is rare even in a hundred eons.
Altogether forty even teeth,
and the body hair and head hair,
were carried off individually by gods
across the universe.
Long Discourses
The Longer Discourse on the Lion’s Roar
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Ujuñña, in the deer park at Kaṇṇakatthala.
Then the naked ascetic Kassapa went up to the Buddha and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he stood to one side, and said to the Buddha:
“Master Gotama, I have heard the following:
‘The ascetic Gotama criticizes all forms of mortification. He categorically condemns and denounces those self-mortifiers who live rough.’
Do those who say this repeat what the Buddha has said, and not misrepresent him with an untruth? Is their explanation in line with the teaching? Are there any legitimate grounds for rebuke and criticism?
For we don’t want to misrepresent Master Gotama.”
“Kassapa, those who say this do not repeat what I have said. They misrepresent me with what is false, baseless, and untrue.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, I see some self-mortifier who lives rough reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
But I see another self-mortifier who lives rough reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
I see some self-mortifier who takes it easy reborn in a place of loss.
But I see another self-mortifier who takes it easy reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
Since I truly understand the coming and going, passing away and rebirth of these self-mortifiers in this way, how could I criticize all forms of mortification, or categorically condemn and denounce those self-mortifiers who live rough?
There are some clever ascetics and brahmins who are subtle, accomplished in the doctrines of others, hair-splitters.
You’d think they live to demolish convictions with their intellect.
They agree with me in some matters and disagree in others.
Some of the things that they applaud, I also applaud.
Some of the things that they don’t applaud, I also don’t applaud.
But some of the things that they applaud, I don’t applaud.
And some of the things that they don’t applaud, I do applaud.
Some of the things that I applaud, others also applaud.
Some of the things that I don’t applaud, they also don’t applaud.
But some of the things that I don’t applaud, others do applaud.
And some of the things that I do applaud, others don’t applaud.
Examination
I go up to them and say:
‘Let us leave aside those matters on which we disagree.
But there are some matters on which we agree. Regarding these, sensible people, pursuing, pressing, and grilling, would compare teacher with teacher or community with community:
“There are things that are unskillful, blameworthy, not to be cultivated, unworthy of the noble ones, and dark—and are reckoned as such.
Who behaves like they’ve totally given these things up: the ascetic Gotama, or the teachers of other communities?”’
It’s possible that they might say:
‘The ascetic Gotama behaves like he’s totally given those unskillful things up, compared with the teachers of other communities.’
And that’s how, when sensible people pursue the matter, they will mostly praise us.
In addition, sensible people, engaging, pressing, and grilling, would compare teacher with teacher or community with community:
‘There are things that are skillful, blameless, worth cultivating, worthy of the noble ones, and bright—and are reckoned as such.
Who proceeds having totally undertaken these things: the ascetic Gotama, or the teachers of other communities?’
It’s possible that they might say:
‘The ascetic Gotama proceeds having totally undertaken these things, compared with the teachers of other communities.’
And that’s how, when sensible people pursue the matter, they will mostly praise us.
In addition, sensible people, pursuing, pressing, and grilling, would compare teacher with teacher or community with community:
‘There are things that are unskillful, blameworthy, not to be cultivated, unworthy of the noble ones, and dark—and are reckoned as such.
Who behaves like they’ve totally given these things up: the ascetic Gotama’s disciples, or the disciples of other teachers?’
It’s possible that they might say:
‘The ascetic Gotama’s disciples behave like they’ve totally given those unskillful things up, compared with the disciples of other teachers.’
And that’s how, when sensible people pursue the matter, they will mostly praise us.
In addition, sensible people, pursuing, pressing, and grilling, would compare teacher with teacher or community with community:
‘There are things that are skillful, blameless, worth cultivating, worthy of the noble ones, and bright—and are reckoned as such.
Who proceeds having totally undertaken these things: the ascetic Gotama’s disciples, or the disciples of other teachers?’
It’s possible that they might say:
‘The ascetic Gotama’s disciples proceed having totally undertaken those skillful things, compared with the disciples of other teachers.’
And that’s how, when sensible people pursue the matter, they will mostly praise us.
The Noble Eightfold Path
There is, Kassapa, a path, there is a practice, practicing in accordance with which you will know and see for yourself:
‘Only the ascetic Gotama’s words are timely, true, and meaningful, in line with the teaching and training.’
And what is that path?
It is simply this noble eightfold path, that is:
right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
This is the path, this is the practice, practicing in accordance with which you will know and see for yourself: ‘Only the ascetic Gotama’s words are timely, true, and meaningful, in line with the teaching and training.’”
Practicing Self-Mortification
When he had spoken, Kassapa said to the Buddha:
“Reverend Gotama, those ascetics and brahmins consider these practices of self-mortification to be what makes someone a true ascetic or brahmin.
They go naked, ignoring conventions. They lick their hands, and don’t come or wait when asked. They don’t consent to food brought to them, or food prepared on purpose for them, or an invitation for a meal.
They don’t receive anything from a pot or bowl; or from someone who keeps sheep, or who has a weapon or a shovel in their home; or where a couple is eating; or where there is a woman who is pregnant, breastfeeding, or who has a man in her home; or where there’s a dog waiting or flies buzzing. They accept no fish or meat or liquor or wine, and drink no beer.
They go to just one house for alms, taking just one mouthful, or two houses and two mouthfuls, up to seven houses and seven mouthfuls.
They feed on one saucer a day, two saucers a day, up to seven saucers a day.
They eat once a day, once every second day, up to once a week, and so on, even up to once a fortnight.
They live committed to the practice of eating food at set intervals.
Those ascetics and brahmins also consider these practices of self-mortification to be what makes someone a true ascetic or brahmin.
They eat herbs, millet, wild rice, poor rice, water lettuce, rice bran, scum from boiling rice, sesame flour, grass, or cow dung. They survive on forest roots and fruits, or eating fallen fruit.
Those ascetics and brahmins also consider these practices of mortification to be what makes someone a true ascetic or brahmin.
They wear robes of sunn hemp, mixed hemp, corpse-wrapping cloth, rags, lodh tree bark, antelope hide (whole or in strips), kusa grass, bark, wood-chips, human hair, horse-tail hair, or owls’ wings.
They tear out hair and beard, committed to this practice.
They constantly stand, refusing seats.
They squat, committed to persisting in the squatting position.
They lie on a mat of thorns, making a mat of thorns their bed.
They make their bed on a plank, or the bare ground.
They lie only on one side.
They wear dust and dirt.
They stay in the open air.
They sleep wherever they lay their mat.
They eat unnatural things, committed to the practice of eating unnatural foods.
They don’t drink, committed to the practice of not drinking liquids.
They’re committed to the practice of immersion in water three times a day, including the evening.”
The Uselessness of Self-Mortification
“Kassapa, someone may practice all those forms of self-mortification,
but if they haven’t developed and realized any accomplishment in ethics, mind, and wisdom, they are far from being a true ascetic or brahmin.
But take a mendicant who develops a heart of love, free of enmity and ill will. And they realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
When they achieve this, they’re called a mendicant who is a ‘true ascetic’ and also ‘a true brahmin’.
When he had spoken, Kassapa said to the Buddha,
“It’s hard, Master Gotama, to be a true ascetic or a true brahmin.”
“It’s typical, Kassapa, in this world to think that it’s hard to be a true ascetic or brahmin.
But someone might practice all those forms of self-mortification.
And if it was only because of just that much, only because of that self-mortification that it was so very hard to be a true ascetic or brahmin, it wouldn’t be appropriate to say that
it’s hard to be a true ascetic or brahmin.
For it would be quite possible for a householder or a householder’s child—or even the bonded maid who carries the water-jar—
to practice all those forms of self-mortification.
It’s because there’s something other than just that much, something other than that self-mortification that it’s so very hard to be a true ascetic or brahmin. And that’s why it is appropriate to say that
it’s hard to be a true ascetic or brahmin.
Take a mendicant who develops a heart of love, free of enmity and ill will. And they realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
When they achieve this, they’re called a mendicant who is a ‘true ascetic’ and also ‘a true brahmin’.
When he had spoken, Kassapa said to the Buddha,
“It’s hard, Master Gotama, to know a true ascetic or a true brahmin.”
“It’s typical in this world to think that it’s hard to know a true ascetic or brahmin.
But someone might practice all those forms of self-mortification.
And if it was only by just that much, only by that self-mortification that it was so very hard to know a true ascetic or brahmin, it wouldn’t be appropriate to say that
it’s hard to know a true ascetic or brahmin.
For it would be quite possible for a householder or a householder’s child—or even the bonded maid who carries the water-jar—
to know that someone is practicing all those forms of self-mortification.
It’s because there’s something other than just that much, something other than that self-mortification that it’s so very hard to know a true ascetic or brahmin. And that’s why it is appropriate to say that
it’s hard to know a true ascetic or brahmin.
Take a mendicant who develops a heart of love, free of enmity and ill will. And they realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
When they achieve this, they’re called a mendicant who is a ‘true ascetic’ and also ‘a true brahmin’.”
The Accomplishment of Ethics, Immersion, and Wisdom
When he had spoken, Kassapa said to the Buddha,
“But Master Gotama, what is that accomplishment in ethics, in mind, and in wisdom?”
“It’s when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha …
Seeing danger in the slightest fault, a mendicant keeps the rules they’ve undertaken. They act skillfully by body and speech. They’re purified in livelihood and accomplished in ethical conduct. They guard the sense doors, have mindfulness and situational awareness, and are content.
And how is a mendicant accomplished in ethics?
It’s when a mendicant gives up killing living creatures. They renounce the rod and the sword. They’re scrupulous and kind, living full of compassion for all living beings.
This pertains to their accomplishment in ethics. …
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood. …
They refrain from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.
This pertains to their accomplishment in ethics.
A mendicant thus accomplished in ethics sees no danger in any quarter in regards to their ethical restraint.
It’s like a king who has defeated his enemies. He sees no danger from his foes in any quarter.
In the same way, a mendicant thus accomplished in ethics sees no danger in any quarter in regards to their ethical restraint.
When they have this entire spectrum of noble ethics, they experience a blameless happiness inside themselves.
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics.
This, Kassapa, is that accomplishment in ethics. …
They enter and remain in the first absorption …
This pertains to their accomplishment in mind. …
They enter and remain in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
This pertains to their accomplishment in mind.
This, Kassapa, is that accomplishment in mind.
When their mind is immersed like this,
they extend and project it toward knowledge and vision …
This pertains to their accomplishment in wisdom. …
They understand: ‘… there is no return to any state of existence.’
This pertains to their accomplishment in wisdom.
This, Kassapa, is that accomplishment in wisdom.
And, Kassapa, there is no accomplishment in ethics, mind, and wisdom that is better or finer than this.
The Lion’s Roar
There are, Kassapa, some ascetics and brahmins who teach ethics.
They praise ethical conduct in many ways.
But as far as the highest noble ethics goes, I don’t see anyone who’s my equal, still less my superior.
Rather, I am the one who is superior when it comes to the higher ethics.
There are, Kassapa, some ascetics and brahmins who teach mortification in disgust of sin.
They praise mortification in disgust of sin in many ways.
But as far as the highest noble mortification in disgust of sin goes, I don’t see anyone who’s my equal, still less my superior.
Rather, I am the one who is superior when it comes to the higher mortification in disgust of sin.
There are, Kassapa, some ascetics and brahmins who teach wisdom.
They praise wisdom in many ways.
But as far as the highest noble wisdom goes, I don’t see anyone who’s my equal, still less my superior.
Rather, I am the one who is superior when it comes to the higher wisdom.
There are, Kassapa, some ascetics and brahmins who teach freedom.
They praise freedom in many ways.
But as far as the highest noble freedom goes, I don’t see anyone who’s my equal, still less my superior.
Rather, I am the one who is superior when it comes to the higher freedom.
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say:
‘The ascetic Gotama only roars his lion’s roar in an empty hut, not in an assembly.’
They should be told, ‘Not so!’
What should be said is this: ‘The ascetic Gotama roars his lion’s roar, and he roars it in the assemblies.’
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say:
‘The ascetic Gotama roars his lion’s roar, and he roars it in the assemblies. But he doesn’t roar it boldly.’
They should be told, ‘Not so!’
What should be said is this: ‘The ascetic Gotama roars his lion’s roar, he roars it in the assemblies, and he roars it boldly.’
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say:
‘The ascetic Gotama roars his lion’s roar, he roars it in the assemblies, and he roars it boldly. But they don’t question him. …
Or he doesn’t answer their questions. …
Or his answers are not satisfactory. …
Or they don’t think him worth listening to. …
Or they’re not confident after listening. …
Or they don’t show their confidence. …
Or they don’t practice accordingly. …
Or they don’t succeed in their practice.’
They should be told, ‘Not so!’
What should be said is this: ‘The ascetic Gotama roars his lion’s roar; he roars it in the assemblies; he roars it boldly; they question him; he answers their questions; his answers are satisfactory; they think him worth listening to; they’re confident after listening; they show their confidence; they practice accordingly; and they succeed in their practice.’
The Probation For One Previously Ordained
Kassapa, this one time I was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain.
There a certain practitioner of self-mortification named Nigrodha asked me about the higher mortification in disgust of sin.
I answered his question.
He was extremely happy with my answer.”
“Sir, who wouldn’t be extremely happy after hearing the Buddha’s teaching?
For I too am extremely happy after hearing the Buddha’s teaching!
Excellent, sir! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, so too the Buddha has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
Sir, may I receive the going forth, the ordination in the Buddha’s presence?”
“Kassapa, if someone formerly ordained in another sect wishes to take the going forth, the ordination in this teaching and training, they must spend four months on probation. When four months have passed, if the mendicants are satisfied, they’ll give the going forth, the ordination into monkhood.
However, I have recognized individual differences in this matter.”
“Sir, if four months probation are required in such a case, I’ll spend four years on probation.
When four years have passed, if the mendicants are satisfied, let them give me the going forth, the ordination into monkhood.”
And the naked ascetic Kassapa received the going forth, the ordination in the Buddha’s presence.
Not long after his ordination, Venerable Kassapa, living alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute, soon realized the supreme end of the spiritual path in this very life. He lived having achieved with his own insight the goal for which gentlemen rightly go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
He understood: “Rebirth is ended; the spiritual journey has been completed; what had to be done has been done; there is no return to any state of existence.”
And Venerable Kassapa became one of the perfected.
Long Discourses
With Jāliya
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Kosambi, in Ghosita’s Monastery.
Now at that time two renunciates—
the wanderer Muṇḍiya and Jāliya the pupil of Dārupattika—came to the Buddha and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, they stood to one side and said to the Buddha,
“Reverend Gotama, are the soul and the body the same thing, or they are different things?”
“Well then, reverends, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, reverend,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Take the case when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha …
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics. …
They enter and remain in the first absorption …
When a mendicant knows and sees like this, would it be appropriate to say of them:
‘The soul and the body are the same thing’ or ‘The soul and the body are different things’?”
“It would, reverend.”
“But reverends, I know and see like this.
Nevertheless, I do not say:
‘The soul and the body are the same thing’ or ‘The soul and the body are different things’. …
They enter and remain in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
When a mendicant knows and sees like this, would it be appropriate to say of them:
‘The soul and the body are the same thing’ or ‘The soul and the body are different things’?”
“It would, reverend.”
“But reverends, I know and see like this.
Nevertheless, I do not say:
‘The soul and the body are the same thing’ or ‘The soul and the body are different things’. …
They extend and project the mind toward knowledge and vision …
When a mendicant knows and sees like this, would it be appropriate to say of them:
‘The soul and the body are the same thing’ or ‘The soul and the body are different things’?”
“It would, reverend.”
“But reverends, I know and see like this.
Nevertheless, I do not say:
‘The soul and the body are the same thing’ or ‘The soul and the body are different things’. …
They understand: ‘… there is no return to any state of existence.’
When a mendicant knows and sees like this, would it be appropriate to say of them:
‘The soul and the body are the same thing’ or ‘The soul and the body are different things’?”
“It would not, reverend.”
“But reverends, I know and see like this.
Nevertheless, I do not say:
‘The soul and the body are the same thing’ or ‘The soul and the body are different things’.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the two renunciates were happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
With Kevaddha
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Nālandā in Pāvārika’s mango grove.
Then the householder Kevaddha went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, this Nāḷandā is successful and prosperous and full of people.
Sir, please direct a mendicant to perform a demonstration of superhuman psychic power.
Then Nāḷandā will become even more devoted to the Buddha!”
When he said this, The Buddha said,
“Kevaddha, I do not teach the mendicants like this:
‘Come now, mendicants, perform a demonstration of superhuman psychic power for the white-clothed laypeople.’”
For a second time, Kevaddha made the same request,
and the Buddha gave the same answer.
For a third time, Kevaddha made the same request,
and the Buddha said the following.
The Demonstration of Psychic Power
“Kevaddha, there are three kinds of demonstration, which I declare having realized them with my own insight.
What three?
The demonstration of psychic power, the demonstration of revealing, and the demonstration of instruction.
And what is the demonstration of psychic power?
It’s a mendicant who wields the many kinds of psychic power: multiplying themselves and becoming one again; going unimpeded through a wall, a rampart, or a mountain as if through space; diving in and out of the earth as if it were water; walking on water as if it were earth; flying cross-legged through the sky like a bird; touching and stroking with the hand the sun and moon, so mighty and powerful; controlling the body as far as the Brahmā realm.
Then someone with faith and confidence sees that mendicant performing those superhuman feats.
They tell someone else who lacks faith and confidence:
‘It’s incredible, it’s amazing! The ascetic has such psychic power and might!
I saw him myself, performing all these superhuman feats!’
But the one lacking faith and confidence would say to them:
‘There’s a spell named Gandhārī.
Using that a mendicant can perform such superhuman feats.’
What do you think, Kevaddha?
Wouldn’t someone lacking faith speak like that?”
“They would, sir.”
“Seeing this drawback in psychic power, I’m horrified, repelled, and disgusted by demonstrations of psychic power.
The Demonstration of Revealing
And what is the demonstration of revealing?
In one case, someone reveals the mind, mentality, thoughts, and reflections of other beings and individuals:
‘This is what you’re thinking, such is your thought, and thus is your state of mind.’
Then someone with faith and confidence sees that mendicant revealing another person’s thoughts.
They tell someone else who lacks faith and confidence:
‘It’s incredible, it’s amazing! The ascetic has such psychic power and might!
I saw him myself, revealing the thoughts of another person!’
But the one lacking faith and confidence would say to them:
‘There’s a spell named Māṇikā.
Using that a mendicant can reveal another person’s thoughts.’
What do you think, Kevaddha?
Wouldn’t someone lacking faith speak like that?”
“They would, sir.”
“Seeing this drawback in psychic power, I’m horrified, repelled, and disgusted by demonstrations of psychic power.
The Demonstration of Instruction
And what is the demonstration of instruction?
It’s when a mendicant instructs others like this:
‘Think like this, not like that. Focus your mind like this, not like that. Give up this, and live having achieved that.’
This is called the demonstration of instruction.
Furthermore, a Realized One arises in the world …
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics. …
They enter and remain in the first absorption …
This is called the demonstration of instruction.
They enter and remain in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
This too is called the demonstration of instruction.
They extend and project the mind toward knowledge and vision …
This too is called the demonstration of instruction.
They understand: ‘… there is no return to any state of existence.’
This too is called the demonstration of instruction.
These, Kevaddha, are the three kinds of demonstration, which I declare having realized them with my own insight.
On the Mendicant In Search of the Cessation of Being
Once it so happened, Kevaddha, that a mendicant in this very Saṅgha had the following thought,
‘Where do these four primary elements cease without anything left over, namely, the elements of earth, water, fire, and air?’
Then that mendicant attained a state of immersion such that a path to the gods appeared.
Then he approached the Gods of the Four Great Kings and said,
‘Reverends, where do these four primary elements cease without anything left over, namely, the elements of earth, water, fire, and air?’
When he said this, those gods said to him,
‘Mendicant, we too do not know this.
But the Four Great Kings are our superiors.
They might know.’
Then he approached the Four Great Kings and asked the same question.
But they also said to him,
‘Mendicant, we too do not know this.
But the gods of the Thirty-Three …
Sakka, lord of gods …
the gods of Yāmā …
the god named Suyāma …
the Joyful gods …
the god named Santussita …
the gods who delight in creation …
the god named Sunimmita …
the gods who control the creation of others …
the god named Vasavattī …
the gods of Brahmā’s Host.
They might know.’
Then that mendicant attained a state of immersion such that a path to Brahmā appeared.
Then he approached those gods and said,
‘Reverends, where do these four primary elements cease without anything left over, namely, the elements of earth, water, fire, and air?’
But they also said to him,
‘Mendicant, we too do not know this.
But there is Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born. He is our superior.
He might know.’
‘But reverends, where is that Brahmā now?’
‘We also don’t know where he is or what way he lies.
But by the signs that are seen—light arising and radiance appearing—we know that Brahmā will appear. For this is the precursor for the appearance of Brahmā, namely light arising and radiance appearing.’
Not long afterwards, the Great Brahmā appeared.
Then that mendicant approached the Great Brahmā and said to him,
‘Reverend, where do these four primary elements cease without anything left over, namely, the elements of earth, water, fire, and air?’
The Great Brahmā said to him,
‘I am Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born.’
For a second time, that mendicant said to the Great Brahmā,
‘Reverend, I am not asking you whether you are
Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born.
I am asking
where these four primary elements cease without anything left over.’
For a second time, the Great Brahmā said to him,
‘I am Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born.’
For a third time, that mendicant said to the Great Brahmā,
‘Reverend, I am not asking you whether you are
Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born.
I am asking
where these four primary elements cease without anything left over.’
Then the Great Brahmā took that mendicant by the arm, led him off to one side, and said to him,
‘Mendicant, these gods think that there is nothing at all that I don’t know and see and understand and realize.
That’s why I didn’t answer in front of them.
But I too do not know where these four primary elements cease with nothing left over.
Therefore, mendicant, the misdeed is yours alone, the mistake is yours alone, in that you passed over the Buddha and searched elsewhere for an answer to this question.
Mendicant, go to the Buddha and ask him this question. You should remember it in line with his answer.’
Then that mendicant, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, vanished from the Brahmā realm and reappeared in front of me.
Then he bowed, sat down to one side, and said to me,
‘Sir, where do these four primary elements cease without anything left over, namely, the elements of earth, water, fire, and air?’
The Simile of the Land-Spotting Bird
When he said this, I said to him:
‘Once upon a time, mendicant, some sea-merchants set sail for the ocean deeps, taking with them a land-spotting bird.
When their ship was out of sight of land, they released the bird.
It flew right away to the east, the west, the north, the south, upwards, and in-between.
If it saw land on any side, it went there and stayed.
But if it saw no land on any side it returned to the ship.
In the same way, after failing to get an answer to this question even after searching as far as the Brahmā realm, you’ve returned to me.
Mendicant, this is not how the question should be asked:
“Sir, where do these four primary elements cease without anything left over, namely, the elements of earth, water, fire, and air?”
This is how the question should be asked:
“Where do water and earth,
fire and air find no footing;
where do long and short,
fine and coarse, beautiful and ugly;
where do name and form
cease with nothing left over?”
And the answer to that is:
“Consciousness that’s invisible,
infinite, entirely given up:
that’s where water and earth,
fire and air find no footing;
and that’s where long and short,
fine and coarse, beautiful and ugly,
that’s where name and form
cease with nothing left over—
with the cessation of consciousness,
that’s where this ceases.”’”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the householder Kevaddha was happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
The Great Steward
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain.
Then, late at night, the fairy Pañcasikha, lighting up the entire Vulture’s Peak, went up to the Buddha, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, I would tell you of what I heard and learned directly from the gods of the Thirty-Three.”
“Tell me, Pañcasikha,” said the Buddha.
The Council of the Gods
“Sir, it was more than a few days ago—on the fifteenth day sabbath on the full moon day at the invitation to admonish held at the end of the rainy season—when all the gods of the Thirty-Three were sitting together in the Hall of Justice.
A large assembly of gods was sitting all around, and the Four Great Kings were seated at the four directions.
The Great King Dhataraṭṭha was seated to the east, facing west, in front of his gods.
The Great King Virūḷhaka was seated to the south, facing north, in front of his gods.
The Great King Virūpakkha was seated to the west, facing east, in front of his gods.
The Great King Vessavaṇa was seated to the north, facing south, in front of his gods.
When the gods of the Thirty-Three have a gathering like this, that is how they are seated.
After that come our seats.
Sir, those gods who had been recently reborn in the company of the Thirty-Three after leading the spiritual life under the Buddha outshine the other gods in beauty and glory.
The gods of the Thirty-Three became uplifted and overjoyed at that, full of rapture and happiness, saying,
‘The heavenly hosts swell, while the demon hosts dwindle!’
Seeing the joy of those gods, Sakka, lord of gods, celebrated with these verses:
‘The gods rejoice—
the Thirty-Three with their Lord—
revering the Realized One,
and the natural excellence of the teaching;
and seeing the new gods,
so beautiful and glorious,
who have come here after leading
the spiritual life under the Buddha!
They outshine the others
in beauty, glory, and lifespan.
Here are the distinguished disciples
of he whose wisdom is vast.
Seeing this, they delight—
the Thirty-Three with their Lord—
revering the Realized One,
and the natural excellence of the teaching!’
The gods of the Thirty-Three became even more uplifted and overjoyed at that, full of rapture and happiness, saying,
‘The heavenly hosts swell, while the demon hosts dwindle!’
Eight Genuine Praises
Seeing the joy of those gods, Sakka, lord of gods, addressed them,
‘Gentlemen, would you like to hear eight genuine praises of the Buddha?’
‘Indeed we would, sir.’
Then Sakka proffered these eight genuine praises of the Buddha:
‘What do the good gods of the Thirty-Three think
about how much the Buddha has acted for the welfare and happiness of the people, out of compassion for the world, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans?
I don’t see any Teacher, past or present, who has such compassion for the world, apart from the Buddha.
Also, the Buddha has explained the teaching well—visible in this very life, immediately effective, inviting inspection, relevant, so that sensible people can know it for themselves.
I don’t see any Teacher, past or present, who explains such a relevant teaching, apart from the Buddha.
Also, the Buddha has clearly described what is skillful and what is unskillful,
what is blameworthy and what is blameless, what should be cultivated and what should not be cultivated, what is inferior and what is superior, and what is on the side of dark and the side of bright.
I don’t see any Teacher, past or present, who so clearly describes all these things, apart from the Buddha.
Also, the Buddha has clearly described the practice that leads to extinguishment for his disciples. And extinguishment and the practice come together,
as the waters of the Ganges come together and converge with the waters of the Yamuna.
I don’t see any Teacher, past or present, who so clearly describes the practice that leads to extinguishment for his disciples, apart from the Buddha.
Also, possessions and popularity have accrued to the Buddha, so much that you’d think it would thrill even the aristocrats. But he takes his food free of vanity.
I don’t see any Teacher, past or present, who takes their food so free of vanity, apart from the Buddha.
Also, the Buddha has gained companions, both trainees who are practicing, and those with defilements ended who have completed their journey.
The Buddha is committed to the joy of solitude, but doesn’t send them away.
I don’t see any Teacher, past or present, so committed to the joy of solitude, apart from the Buddha.
Also, the Buddha does as he says, and says as he does, thus: he does as he says, and says as he does.
I don’t see any Teacher, past or present, who so practices in line with the teaching, apart from the Buddha.
Also, the Buddha has gone beyond doubt and got rid of indecision. He has achieved all he wished for regarding the fundamental purpose of the spiritual life.
I don’t see any Teacher, past or present, who has achieved these things, apart from the Buddha.’
These are the eight genuine praises of the Buddha proffered by Sakka.
Hearing them, the gods of the Thirty-Three became even more uplifted and overjoyed.
Then some gods thought,
‘If only four fully awakened Buddhas might arise in the world and teach the Dhamma, just like the Blessed One!
That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, out of compassion for the world, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans!’
Other gods thought,
‘Let alone four fully awakened Buddhas; if only three fully awakened Buddhas,
or two fully awakened Buddhas might arise in the world and teach the Dhamma, just like the Blessed One!
That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, out of compassion for the world, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans!’
When they said this, Sakka said,
‘It’s impossible, gentlemen, for two perfected ones, fully awakened Buddhas to arise in the same solar system at the same time.
May that Blessed One be healthy and well, and remain with us for a long time!
That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, out of compassion for the world, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans!’
Then the gods of the Thirty-Three, having considered and deliberated on the matter for which they were seated together in the Hall of Justice, advised and instructed the Four Great Kings on the subject.
And each stood at their own seat without departing.
The Kings were instructed,
and heeded good advice.
With clear and peaceful minds,
they stood by their own seats.
Then in the northern quarter a magnificent light arose and radiance appeared, surpassing the glory of the gods.
Then Sakka, lord of gods, addressed the gods of the Thirty-Three,
‘As indicated by the signs—light arising and radiance appearing—Brahmā will appear. For this is the precursor for the appearance of Brahmā, namely light arising and radiance appearing.’
As indicated by the signs,
Brahmā will appear.
For this is the sign of Brahmā:
a light vast and great.
On Sanaṅkumāra
Then the gods of the Thirty-Three sat in their own seats, saying,
‘We shall find out what has caused that light, and only when we have realized it shall we go to it.’
And the Four Great Kings did likewise.
Hearing that, the gods of the Thirty-Three agreed in unison,
‘We shall find out what has caused that light, and only when we have realized it shall we go to it.’
When Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra appears to the gods of the Thirty-Three, he does so after manifesting in a solid corporeal form,
for the gods of the Thirty-Three aren’t able to see a Brahmā’s normal appearance.
When Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra appears to the gods of the Thirty-Three, he outshines the other gods in beauty and glory,
as a golden statue outshines the human form.
When Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra appears to the gods of the Thirty-Three, not a single god in that assembly greets him by bowing down or rising up or inviting him to a seat.
They all sit silently on their couches with their joined palms raised, thinking,
‘Now Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra will sit on the couch of whatever god he chooses.’
And the god on whose couch Brahmā sits is overjoyed and brimming with happiness,
like a king on the day of his coronation.
Seeing the joy of those gods, Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra celebrated with these verses:
‘The gods rejoice—
the Thirty-Three with their Lord—
revering the Realized One,
and the natural excellence of the teaching;
and seeing the new gods,
so beautiful and glorious,
who have come here after leading
the spiritual life under the Buddha!
They outshine the others
in beauty, glory, and lifespan.
Here are the distinguished disciples
of he whose wisdom is vast.
Seeing this, they delight—
the Thirty-Three with their Lord—
revering the Realized One,
and the natural excellence of the teaching!’
That is the topic on which Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra spoke.
And while he was speaking on that topic, his voice had eight qualities: it was clear, comprehensible, charming, audible, rounded, undistorted, deep, and resonant.
He makes sure his voice is intelligible as far as the assembly goes, but it doesn’t extend outside the assembly.
When someone has a voice like this, they’re said to have the voice of Brahmā.
Then the gods of the Thirty-Three said to Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra,
‘Good, Great Brahmā! Knowing this, we rejoice.
And there are the eight genuine praises of the Buddha spoken by Sakka—
knowing them, too, we rejoice.’
Eight Genuine Praises
Then Brahmā said to Sakka,
‘It would be good, lord of gods, if I could also hear the eight genuine praises of the Buddha.’
Saying, ‘Yes, Great Brahmā,’ Sakka repeated the eight genuine praises for him.
Hearing them, Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra was uplifted and overjoyed, full of rapture and happiness.
Then Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra manifested in a solid corporeal form, taking on the appearance of the youth Pañcasikha, and appeared to the gods of the Thirty-Three.
Rising into the air, he sat cross-legged in the sky,
like a strong man might sit cross-legged on a well-appointed couch or on level ground.
There he addressed the gods of the Thirty-Three:
The Story of the Steward
‘What do the gods of the Thirty-Three think about the extent of the Buddha’s great wisdom?
Once upon a time, there was a king named Disampati.
He had a brahmin high priest named the Steward.
Disampati’s son was the prince named Reṇu,
while the Steward’s son was the student named Jotipāla.
There were Reṇu the prince, Jotipāla the student, and six other aristocrats; these eight became friends.
In due course the brahmin Steward passed away.
At his passing, King Disampati lamented,
“At a time when I have relinquished all my duties to the brahmin Steward and amuse myself, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation, he passes away!”
When he said this, Prince Reṇu said to him,
“Sire, don’t lament too much at the Steward’s passing.
He has a son named Jotipāla, who is even more astute and expert than his father.
He should manage the affairs that were managed by his father.”
“Is that so, my prince?”
“Yes, sire.”
The Story of the Great Steward
So King Disampati addressed one of his men,
“Please, mister, go to the student Jotipāla, and say to him,
‘Best wishes, Jotipāla! You are summoned by King Disampati; he wants to see you.’”
“Yes, Your Majesty,” replied that man, and did as he was asked.
Then Jotipāla went to the king and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side, and the king said to him,
“May you, Jotipāla, manage my affairs—please don’t turn me down!
I shall appoint you to your father’s position, and anoint you as Steward.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Jotipāla.
So the king anointed him as Steward and appointed him to his father’s position.
After his appointment, the Steward Jotipāla managed both the affairs that his father had managed, and other affairs that his father had not managed.
He organized both the works that his father had organized, and other works that his father had not organized.
When people noticed this they said,
“The brahmin is indeed a Steward, a Great Steward!”
And that’s how the student Jotipāla came to be known as the Great Steward.
Dividing the Realm
Then the Great Steward went to the six aristocrats and said,
“King Disampati is old, elderly and senior, advanced in years, and has reached the final stage of life. Who knows how long he has to live?
It’s likely that when he passes away the king-makers will anoint Prince Reṇu as king.
Come, sirs, go to Prince Reṇu and say,
‘Prince Reṇu, we are your friends, dear, beloved, and cherished. We have shared your joys and sorrows.
King Disampati is old, elderly and senior, advanced in years, and has reached the final stage of life. Who knows how long he has to live?
It’s likely that when he passes away the king-makers will anoint you as king.
If you should gain kingship, share it with us.’”
“Yes, sir,” replied the six aristocrats. They went to Prince Reṇu and put the proposal to him.
The prince replied, “Who else, sirs, in my realm ought to prosper if not you?
If I gain kingship, I will share it with you all.”
In due course King Disampati passed away.
At his passing, the king-makers anointed Prince Reṇu as king.
But after being anointed, King Reṇu amused himself, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation.
Then the Great Steward went to the six aristocrats and said,
“King Disampati has passed away.
But after being anointed, King Reṇu amused himself, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation.
Who knows the intoxicating power of sensual pleasures?
Come, sirs, go to Prince Reṇu and say,
‘Sir, King Disampati has passed away, and you have been anointed as king. Do you remember what you said?’”
“Yes, sir,” replied the six aristocrats. They went to King Reṇu and said,
“Sir, King Disampati has passed away, and you have been anointed as king. Do you remember what you said?”
“I remember, sirs.
Who is able to neatly divide into seven equal parts this great land, so broad in the north and narrow as the front of a cart in the south?”
“Who else, sir, if not the Great Steward?”
So King Reṇu addressed one of his men,
“Please, mister, go to the brahmin Great Steward and say that
King Reṇu summons him.”
“Yes, Your Majesty,” replied that man, and did as he was asked.
Then the Great Steward went to the king and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side, and the king said to him,
“Come, let the good Steward neatly divide into seven equal parts this great land, so broad in the north and narrow as the front of a cart in the south.”
“Yes, sir,” replied the Great Steward, and did as he was asked.
All were set up like the fronts of carts,
with King Reṇu’s nation in the center.
Dantapura for the Kaliṅgas;
Potana for the Assakas;
Mahissati for the Avantis;
Roruka for the Sovīras;
Mithila for the Videhas;
Campā was made for the Aṅgas;
and Varanasi for the Kāsīs:
these were laid out by the Steward.
Then those six aristocrats were delighted with their respective gains, having achieved all they wished for,
“We have received exactly what we wanted, what we wished for, what we desired, what we yearned for.”
Sattabhū and Brahmadatta,
Vessabhū and Bharata,
Reṇu and the two Dhataraṭṭhas:
these are the seven Bhāratas.
The first recitation section is finished.
A Good Reputation
Then the six aristocrats approached the Great Steward and said,
“Steward, just as you are King Reṇu’s friend, dear, beloved, and cherished,
you are also our friend.
Would you manage our affairs? Please don’t turn us down!”
“Yes, sirs,” replied the Great Steward.
Then the Great Steward managed the realms of the seven kings. And he taught seven well-to-do brahmins, and seven hundred bathed initiates to recite the hymns.
After some time he got this good reputation,
“The Great Steward sees Brahmā in person! The Great Steward discusses, converses, and consults with Brahmā in person!”
The Great Steward thought,
“I have the reputation
of seeing Brahmā in person, and discussing with him in person.
But I don’t.
I have heard that brahmins of the past who were elderly and senior, the teachers of teachers, said:
‘Whoever goes on retreat for the four months of the rainy season and practices the absorption on compassion sees Brahmā and discusses with him.’
Why don’t I do that?”
So the Great Steward went to King Reṇu and told him of the situation, saying,
“Sir, I wish to go on retreat for the four months of the rainy season and practice the absorption on compassion.
No one should approach me, except for the one who brings my meal.”
“Please do so, Steward, at your convenience.”
Then the Great Steward went to the six aristocrats to put the same proposal, and received the same reply.
He also went to the seven well-to-do brahmins and seven hundred bathed initiates and put to them the same proposal, adding,
“Sirs, recite the hymns in detail as you have learned and memorized them, and teach each other how to recite.”
And they too said,
“Please do so, Steward, at your convenience.”
Then the Great Steward went to his forty equal wives to put the same proposal to them, and received the same reply.
Then the Great Steward had a new meeting hall built to the east of his citadel, where he went on retreat for the four months of the rainy season and practiced the absorption on compassion.
And no one approached him except the one who brought him meals.
But then, when the four months had passed, the Great Steward became dissatisfied and anxious,
“I have heard that brahmins of the past said that
whoever goes on retreat for the four months of the rainy season and practices the absorption on compassion sees Brahmā and discusses with him.
But I neither see Brahmā nor discuss with him.”
A Discussion With Brahmā
And then Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra, knowing what the Great Steward was thinking, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, vanished from the Brahmā realm and reappeared in the Great Steward’s presence.
At that, the Great Steward became frightened, scared, his hair standing on end, as he had never seen such a sight before.
So he addressed Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra in verse:
“Who might you be, sir,
so beautiful, glorious, majestic?
Not knowing, I ask—
how am I to know who you are?”
“In the Brahmā realm they know me
as ‘The Eternal Youth’.
All the gods know me thus,
and so you should know me, Steward.”
“A Brahmā deserves a seat and water,
foot-salve, and sweet cakes.
Sir, I ask you to please accept
these gifts of hospitality.”
“I accept the gifts of hospitality
of which you speak.
I grant you the opportunity
to ask whatever you desire—
about welfare and benefit in this life,
or happiness in lives to come.”
Then the Great Steward thought,
“Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra has granted me an opportunity.
Should I ask him about what is beneficial for this life or lives to come?”
Then he thought,
“I’m a skilled in what is beneficial for this life, and others even ask me about it.
Why don’t I ask Brahmā about the benefit that specifically applies to lives to come?”
So he addressed Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra in verse:
“I’m in doubt, so I ask Brahmā—who is free of doubt—
about things one may learn from another.
Standing on what, training in what
may a mortal reach the deathless Brahmā realm?”
“He among men, O brahmin, has given up possessions,
become one, compassionate,
carrion-free, and refraining from sex.
Standing on that, training in that
a mortal may reach the deathless Brahmā realm.”
“Sir, I understand what ‘giving up possessions’ means.
It’s when someone gives up a large or small fortune, and a large or small family circle. They shave off hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
That’s how I understand ‘giving up possessions’.
Sir, I understand what ‘oneness’ means.
It’s when someone frequents a secluded lodging—a wilderness, the root of a tree, a hill, a ravine, a mountain cave, a charnel ground, a forest, the open air, a heap of straw.
That’s how I understand ‘oneness’.
Sir, I understand what ‘compassionate’ means.
It’s when someone meditates spreading a heart full of compassion to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of compassion to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
That’s how I understand ‘compassionate’.
But I don’t understand what you say about carrion.
What among men, O Brahmā, is carrion-stench?
I don’t understand, so tell me, wise one:
wrapped in what do people stink,
headed for hell, shut out of the Brahmā realm?”
“Anger, lies, fraud, and deceit,
miserliness, vanity, jealousy,
desire, stinginess, harassing others,
greed, hate, vanity, and delusion—
those bound to such things have carrion;
they’re headed for hell, shut out of the Brahmā realm.”
“As I understand what you say about carrion-stench, it’s not easy to quell while living at home.
I shall go forth from the lay life to homelessness!”
“Please do so, Steward, at your convenience.”
Informing King Reṇu
So the Great Steward went to King Reṇu and said,
“Sir, please now find another high priest to manage the affairs of state for you.
I wish to go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
As I understand what Brahmā says about carrion-stench, it’s not easy to quell while living at home.
I shall go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
I announce to King Reṇu,
the lord of the land:
you must learn how to rule,
for I no longer care for my ministry.”
“If you’re lacking any pleasures,
I’ll supply them for you.
I’ll protect you from any harm,
for I command the nation’s army.
You are my father, I am your son!
O Steward, please don’t leave!”
“I’m lacking no pleasures,
and no-one is harming me.
I’ve heard a non-human voice,
so I no longer care for lay life.”
“What was that non-human like?
What did he say to you,
hearing which you would abandon
our house and all our people?”
“Before entering this retreat,
I only liked to sacrifice.
I kindled the sacred flame,
strewn about with kusa grass.
But then Brahmā appeared to me,
the Eternal Youth from the Brahmā realm.
He answered my question,
hearing which I no longer care for lay life.”
“I have faith, O Steward,
in that of which you speak.
Having heard a non-human voice,
what else could you do?
We will follow your example,
Steward, be my Teacher!
Like a gem of beryl—
flawless, immaculate, beautiful—
that’s how pure we shall live,
in the Steward’s dispensation.
If the Steward is going forth from the lay life to homelessness, we shall do so too. Your destiny shall be ours.”
Informing the Six Aristocrats
Then the Great Steward went to the six aristocrats and said,
“Sirs, please now find another high priest to manage the affairs of state for you.
I wish to go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
As I understand what Brahmā says about carrion-stench, it’s not easy to quell while living at home.
I shall go forth from the lay life to homelessness!”
Then the six aristocrats withdrew to one side and thought up a plan,
“These brahmins are really greedy for wealth.
Why don’t we try to persuade him with wealth?”
They returned to the Great Steward and said,
“In these seven kingdoms there is abundant wealth. We’ll get you as much as you want.”
“Enough, sirs. I already have abundant wealth, owing to my lords.
Giving up all that, I shall go forth.”
Then the six aristocrats withdrew to one side and thought up a plan,
“These brahmins are really greedy for women.
Why don’t we try to persuade him with women?”
They returned to the Great Steward and said,
“In these seven kingdoms there are many women. We’ll get you as many as you want.”
“Enough, sirs. I already have forty equal wives.
Giving up all them, I shall go forth.”
“If the Steward is going forth from the lay life to homelessness, we shall do so too. Your destiny shall be ours.”
“If you all give up sensual pleasures,
to which ordinary people are attached,
exert yourselves, being strong,
and possessing the power of patience.
This path is the straight path,
this path is supreme.
Guarded by the good, the true teaching
leads to rebirth in the Brahmā realm.”
“Well then, sir, please wait for seven years.
When seven years have passed, we shall go forth with you. Your destiny shall be ours.”
“Seven years is too long, sirs. I cannot wait that long.
Who knows what will happen to the living?
We are heading to the next life. We must think about this and wake up! We must do what’s good and lead the spiritual life, for no-one born can escape death.
I shall go forth.”
“Well then, sir, please wait for six years,
five years,
four years,
